Part 4. Chapter 161 to 224.

The autumn season had deepened in Inghel, the Imperial
Capital.
Each day, the leaves that had been swept away would pile
up again by the following morning. Yellow, red, and brown
leaves continually fell from the trees.
Just as the trees gradually lost their foliage, altering the
outdoor scenery, the estate’s appearance began to change
as well—reverting, to be precise. To how it was in late
autumn of the previous year, before Elise Schuvan had
arrived.
Cardale, seemingly intent on punishing or frightening the
mistress who dared attempt to escape, had purposefully
reintroduced elements to the estate that he had once
hidden or removed for her sake.
Releasing the wolfhounds onto the estate grounds had only
been the beginning.
The man, who had once nearly abandoned his hunting habit,
took to the forest more frequently with his rifle as autumn
wore on, and each beast he hunted was soon mounted. The
heads displayed one by one in his bedchamber.
Unable to return to her former room, Elise was confined to
the Duke’s chamber, where she had no choice but to wait
for his return amidst these trophies.
Slowly, in a way so gradual she scarcely realized it, Elise
began to lose her vitality.
Linda and Norman, noticing the change in their young
mistress, reassured themselves that it was merely a
temporary adjustment due to the strain of her pregnancy.
They told themselves she would soon adapt to the situation.
After all, they hoped as they had several times before, that
time would eventually resolve matters between the duke
and his mistress.
But in truth, their reassurances came from a fearful instinct
to avoid facing an uncomfortable reality—an intuition that
uncovering this delicate truth would shatter the fragile
peace they lived under, leaving them helpless to restore it.
Meanwhile, Cardale sensed the shift in Elise—her silence,
her lack of laughter—since the day he had forced her
submission by threatening the life of her unborn child. Yet
he paid it no mind.
He had achieved his goal: Elise’s absolute submission.
Desperate, she clung to him, pleading as he had
anticipated. He didn’t care if she was broken or withered, so
long as she never thought to escape again.
As the guards, the house staff, and even Elise herself
continued to ignore the signs, she was slowly crumbling.
Bound by an unbreakable leash, a captive doe in a narrow
pen, her only wish was to safely deliver her child, gain
Cardale’s acknowledgment, and secure their child’s status
as the Duke’s offspring.
For the sake of that single fervent hope, Elise endured
everything that was destroying her. Through the pain, she
tried to forget her own sorrow, even as her tears welled
uncontrollably.
“My baby…” 
During her hardest moments, she would close her eyes and
lay her hand on her belly, praying for her child.
‘I hope you resemble the Duke.’
She prayed that the baby would take after him, born with
hair as dark as the night sky and eyes as strikingly red as
the sunset—features that might earn her child his
recognition.
Unlike her own miserable childhood, she hoped her child
might experience a father’s affection, however slight.
As long as this hope remained, she felt able to endure.
Every time she wanted to surrender, imagining a happy
future for her child gave her strength.
And so Elise persisted, clinging desperately, day by day.

The first words from the Duke upon his return to the estate
were not a greeting.
“Elise.”
Norman, accustomed to this same question from the
previous days and even weeks, responded calmly.
“She has been as she always is, my lord.”
It was a way of indicating there was nothing new to report.
And yet, there was more that needed to be said.
“However…” 
Norman glanced at Linda, who began speaking hesitantly
after receiving his look.
“The young mistress has remained inside her room all day.
We’re somewhat concerned…”
“As long as she’s behaving herself, that’s enough,” Cardale
interrupted, brushing off her words as he moved to leave.
Adding, “Let her get some fresh air and go for a walk when
the midday sun is warm.”
Linda considered explaining that she had already suggested
several times for Elise to go for a walk, only for her to refuse
each time. But she thought better of it.
“Yes, my lord. I will do that,” she replied, reasoning that
Elise might reconsider if she knew it was a direct instruction
from the Duke.
No one, except for the Duke and Elise herself, knew
precisely what had occurred in the bedchamber on the night
she was dragged there by him. But since that night, Elise
had obeyed the Duke’s every command, which left Linda
with a nagging discomfort.
Though the staff had always complied with the Duke’s
orders, something about Elise’s submission felt different.
As if she were no more than a spiritless servant…
Linda sighed softly, exchanging a look with Norman, who
wore a similar expression of concern. But neither spoke a
word.

Cardale entered the bedchamber.
Noticing his presence, Elise flinched, rising from her seat
slowly. Her face, with its reddened eyes, made him narrow
his gaze.
“Crying again?”
“I… I was just feeling sleepy…”
Stumbling over her words, she tried to excuse it as a yawn.
Though technically a lie, it was a reluctant one from
someone not used to lying.
It seemed Elise believed he disliked seeing her cry. That
wasn’t necessarily true, but Cardale saw no reason to
correct her.
Instead, he reached out, gently brushing over her puffy
eyelids.
“Shall I… assist with your bath?”
Her attempt to appease him was obvious, her desperation
apparent, but he cut her off without hesitation.
“Just go back to your spot and wait quietly.”
He had casually voiced his concern that she might slip in the
wet bathroom, though neither he nor Elise realized this.
On his way to the bathroom, he noticed the weakening
embers in the fireplace. Knowing she was only in her thin
nightgown, his brows furrowed.
Although the room was warm enough to be comfortable
even unclothed, it still wasn’t sufficient in his eyes.
Instead of summoning a servant, he added fresh logs to the
fire himself, watching it blaze to life, before stepping into
the bathroom for a quick wash—as if he was mindful of
someone waiting, though he wasn’t aware of this.
When he returned to the bedroom in a robe, he found Elise
kneeling on the plush rug layered with furs, her head
lowered to avoid looking at the mounted gray wolf’s head on
the wall.
Coming up behind her, Cardale placed his hands gently on
her shoulders. Startled, her small form shuddered.
“I displayed it for enjoyment. Why, don’t you like it?”
“I… I…”
Her wide blue eyes, full of fear and vulnerability, met his
own—a gaze as helpless as prey stripped of hope.
“Anything valuable should be preserved,” he whispered
slowly, in a voice that held a note of warning.
“Mounted creatures never run away. They remain forever by
their master’s side, frozen in their most beautiful state.”
The pale color of her cheeks revealed her comprehension of
his words, and a slight smile twisted his lips.
“But you won’t make such mistakes anymore, will you?”
“Y-yes…”
Her desperate nod was endearing in its own way. He stroked
her cheek and kissed her, watching as her pale face flushed
under his touch.
“Now, do what you’re meant to do.”
He rose, standing before her, and she reached out to untie
the belt of his robe, as if she had been waiting for this
signal.
“Hah…”
Though her warm hands or mouth couldn’t match his own
heat, the sight of her delicate hands moving with diligence
was an enjoyable experience on its own.
Yet, instead of showing satisfaction, he pushed her further
with his words.
“Didn’t you say you learned how to please a man?”
After all, it would be troublesome if she bored him.
Her large, round eyes glistened with tears. A common sight
from someone so timid.
“S-sorry… I’ll do better…”
Her obedient response was as expected, yet it left him
strangely unsatisfied. Oddly, something irked him.
Why?
Choosing to ignore the question, Cardale lifted Elise and
seated her on his lap on the sofa.
As he caressed her soft, rounded form, the irritation faded.
Her body had become softer with the pregnancy, clinging to
him more intimately.
Being in the early stages of pregnancy, full intimacy was offlimits.
Even if she were further along, he had no intention of going
further. Her already frail body wasn’t fit to withstand his
intense encounters in her current state.
So Cardale merely held her close, savoring the closeness.
And with just that, Elise’s body trembled in pleasure.
“Hah…”
He watched her face in the flickering firelight as she
approached her peak, her expression striking something
deep within him.
That familiar face that always stirred something in the
recesses of his heart.

Cardale lightly caught the fragile body that collapsed into
his arms, quivering slightly as Elise shuddered in the
lingering waves of pleasure, soft sobs escaping her lips.
A woman carrying a child tired easily, exhausted after just a
single encounter.
“I… I can… do it again…”
“That’s enough.”
He could sense her gaze searching him, filled with
apprehension.
Cardale knew exactly what his doe wanted—security for her
child, recognition.
Once, she had offered her entire being to protect her
mother; now, Elise seemed ready to give everything for the
life within her.
But Cardale had no intention of granting her wishes just yet
—not until the baby was born and became a perfect leash,
ensuring her complete submission.
“Rest if you wish.”
Her lips parted as though she wanted to say something, but
then she seemed to resign herself and lowered her head.
Moments later, her soft breathing told him she’d fallen into
an exhausted sleep.
Cardale listened to the crackling of the fire, savoring the
calm.
His decision had been the right one. He had bound her with
a strong, unbreakable leash, stripping away any thought of
escape, provoking fear to her very core. The results were
precisely as he’d intended.
And yet, inexplicably, something felt off, like a thorn caught
in his throat. It was as if he’d missed something essential,
as though sand were slipping from between his tightly
grasped fingers…
No.
He stifled the feeling. Failures always stemmed from
moments of hesitation, from needless introspection and
doubt.
Regret was unnecessary, now as ever.
Suppressing the unsettling feeling, Cardale wrapped his
arms around Elise’s delicate form, holding her tightly.

A child’s unsteady steps shuffled before her.
Elise’s eyes opened wide.
Black hair—the same as his. Instinctively, she recognized
the child.
“My baby?”
But the child didn’t seem to hear her, walking forward on
chubby little legs.
“Where… where are you going?”
She rose urgently, following the child. Yet strangely, despite
the child’s small steps, she couldn’t catch up.
“My baby!”
Panicked, she called out louder, but the child didn’t turn
back, only drifting further from her.
“Baby, Mommy’s right here! Baby!”
Her heart raced with desperation. She ran as hard as she
could, gasping for breath, but the distance only grew, until
the child was no more than a distant speck.
“My baby…”
Tears began to stream down her face as if sensing an
eternal farewell.
“Please… please…”
When the child finally vanished into the light, Elise collapsed
to the ground, sobbing uncontrollably.
“You left without even letting Mommy see your face…”
Her heart ached bitterly at the image of her child, slipping
away without a backward glance.
It was then that voices reached her, muffled and distant.
The sound drew closer and then faded like waves, gradually
bringing her out of her dream.
‘Thank goodness…’
Elise felt a glimmer of relief as she woke, realizing that it
had only been a nightmare.
‘It was just a dream.’
The canopy surrounding her bed blocked the light, making it
dark as night. But a beam of light filtered in through a tiny
gap, telling her that morning had arrived.
‘The Duke must have left already…’
Recently, she’d been sleeping more, often waking long after
he’d left the room.
‘I should get up before it’s too late. I can’t be lazy…’
Reprimanding herself, Elise was about to sit up when she
heard a voice.
“What shall we do next, Your Grace?”
Halfway through rising, she froze.
“We’ll make them pay.”
The chilling voice that followed doused her with dread,
waking her fully.
“Look into the slave market.”
At the sound of those cold, brutal words, her blood ran icy.
“The slave market… are you certain?”
“Yes.”
His response was as steady as stone, contrasting the slight
hesitation in the question.
“Make sure it’s handled without complications.”
Elise trembled, feeling like a deer caught in a trap, awaiting
her fate.
Price to pay, slave market, handled without complications…
Her mind, blank and pale with terror, tried to process the
words she’d just heard.
“Hold on.”
Footsteps sounded, and suddenly the curtains around the
bed were pulled back.

Bright sunlight flooded in as she met the man’s gaze.
Her delicate hands clenched tightly around the sheets. Her
lips trembled as she managed to utter a single word.
“Your Grace…”
Her tearful, pleading eyes searched his face, desperate for
an explanation.
What… What were those things you just said? Could it be… I
heard you wrong?
“How much did you hear?”
His response was a calm, detached question. Elise’s tearful
eyes wavered.
It hadn’t been a mistake. She hadn’t misheard.
“Elise.”
Stepping into the enclosed space, Cardale brushed her
cheek and leaned close, whispering.
“It’s improper to eavesdrop on your master.”
Elise’s lips opened soundlessly, her breath caught as if she
were being strangled. The fear and chill that gripped her
were bone-deep.
“Behave yourself today.”
He grazed her lips lightly, as if taking a sip, before
straightening. The curtains fell back, blocking the light.
“The rest… in the study.”
“Yes, Your Grace.”
Footsteps retreated, followed by the sound of a door
opening and closing, leaving a silence over the room.

Left alone, Elise remained motionless, sitting as though
frozen in place.
“Do you not know what happens to the daughter of a
traitorous house?”
“Born into slavery, your child will be sold the moment it
arrives.”
A tear slipped silently down her vacant gaze.
She had borne cruel words; she had endured being treated
no better than a common harlot. Her own pain no longer
mattered to her.
So long as he would acknowledge her child.
Though her lowly womb carried the child, it bore the noble
blood of the House of Vassenberg. It was his child, after all.
‘My baby…’
She was willing to be nothing more than a stranger to her
child, willing to disappear from their life if she became a
burden. Even leaving without ever seeing her child would be
bearable.
It was the only thing she could do for her baby.
But…
Elise lowered her head, her tears landing on her hands,
protectively cradling her belly.
The memory of his cold voice filled her mind.
‘Stupid woman. The Duke never intended to accept your
child.’
All her desperate pleas, her obedience, her sacrifices…
None of it had mattered.
The biting words ordering her fate to the slave market left a
pain so raw, it felt like her heart was breaking apart.
‘You mean everything to me… more than my own life…’
Perhaps a child born of someone as lowly as her, could
never truly be family to someone of noble birth.
It all seemed like a punishment, a curse rooted in her own
unworthy existence…
‘You won’t be able to protect your child, no matter what you
do.’
The crushing weight of that cruel reality fell over her,
shattering her already-battered heart into dust.
Leaving nothing but a hollow emptiness.
“Oh… oh…”
Curling up, Elise hugged herself against the icy emptiness
that seeped into her bones.
And yet, she continued to sink deeper, falling into a cold,
endless abyss.
‘My baby.’
An innocent child, doomed to bear a mother’s sins from
birth, to face a world that would treat them with cold disdain
and harsh scorn.
How much would they suffer? How many tears would they
shed? How deep would their wounds run?
If only they didn’t have to endure that pain… if only they
didn’t have to be born at all.
The thought that she could offer her beloved child nothing
but suffering and heartache plunged Elise into despair.
If she couldn’t protect them, if her meager life held no
power to save them…
Elise searched for one last thing she could do for her baby.
One final act remained.

Autumn deepened in the capital of Ichel.
As leaves piled thickly where they had been swept just the
day before, the trees gradually bared their branches to the
cold. Within the estate, servants could often be seen
coughing or sniffling. To keep the indoor temperature stable,
most of the estate’s windows had been shuttered closed
and curtains drawn, especially in the evenings.
Meanwhile, the supplies ordered in preparation for winter
had been arriving for several days without pause, filling the
estate with bustling activity. Servants, including Norman,
were busy inspecting, distributing, and storing the various
goods.
Elise sat in an armchair by the window, gazing blankly at the
scene outside.
Since “that day,” the door leading to the terrace had been
locked tightly, yet she could still observe the world beyond
the back garden through the glass. She watched the carts
filled with supplies and the servants unloading them.
Linda, watching Elise, was filled with concern.
‘Lady Elise…’
It had been days since Elise had done anything but stare out
the window.
If anyone asked what was wrong with that, it would be hard
to explain.
Though she seemed to eat, albeit in small amounts, and
took walks when urged to do so by the Duke’s command,
her eyes were empty, her gaze hollow, and her demeanor
listless. As though she had surrendered to everything
around her.
‘I thought everything would be fine once she returned to the
estate…’
But Linda couldn’t shake the feeling that something was not
right.
Images of the previous Duke and Duchess in their long,
miserable standoff crept into her mind, stirring her unease.
But unlike the former Duchess, who would raise her voice in
defiance, Lady Elise was silent, avoiding even the smallest
resistance. And unlike the former Duke, who had been
indifferent to his wife, the current Duke kept Elise close,
ensuring she was well cared for…
Crash!
The sharp sound of something breaking jolted Linda from
her thoughts. She looked over to see that a vase had fallen
to the floor, shattered into pieces.
“Lady Elise!”
“I’m… I’m sorry.” 
Elise rose awkwardly, apologizing.
“It’s all right, my lady. Are you hurt?”
“No, I’m fine… I’ll help clean up.”
“We’ll take care of it. There could be sharp fragments that
might injure you. Would you mind sitting on the sofa for a
moment?”
Elise hesitated, then stepped aside. As maids hurried in to
clean up the mess, Linda focused on picking up every
fragment of the shattered vase.
But she missed something important: a large, sharp shard
had bounced over to the edge of the sofa, which Elise
discreetly picked up and tucked into her sleeve.

Michael poured hot sealing wax onto the envelope and
pressed the Duke’s ring to mark it with the Vassenberg
crest.
“Send this to Damian Schuvan,” Cardale instructed.
“Yes, Your Grace.”
After Michael left with the letter, Norman entered the room
upon being called.
“Your Grace, the crib for the baby’s room has arrived, and all
other furniture has been set up.”
Cardale had ordered the room next to Elise’s chambers to
be converted into a nursery. The walls had been papered
anew, curtains with charming designs hung, and baby
furniture placed inside, transforming the once-formal room
into a warm nursery.
“All that remains is to add the final touches, but we weren’t
sure whether to prepare for a girl or a boy…”
Realizing he had spoken too freely, Norman immediately
regretted it. As he raised his head, he saw the Duke
watching him expressionlessly.
After all, this child was an unrecognized illegitimate
offspring. And it was hardly fitting to discuss whether the
child would be a lady or lord when no marriage bound their
parents.
Norman was about to apologize when the Duke spoke.
“Then prepare for both.”
“…Both, Your Grace?”
“Have everything ready so that it can be easily adapted.”
Swallowing, Norman nodded, barely hiding his surprise.
Could it be that the Duke intended to acknowledge the
child?
“Yes, Your Grace.”
He paused, wondering whether to report something he’d
recently heard from Linda.
It had seemed too minor to mention, but with this recent
conversation, he thought it might be worth noting.
“Is there something else?” Cardale asked.
“Ah, yes… I heard that Lady Elise recently broke a vase.”
Cardale stopped in his tracks.
“Is she hurt?”
“Thankfully, only the vase was damaged.”
The Duke’s frown deepened.
“Has the estate fallen on such hard times that we must
account for every broken vase?”
What he meant was clear: was it really worth reporting the
breaking of a single vase?
Caught off guard, Norman hesitated. Indeed, it was hardly
noteworthy. After all, neither Elise nor anyone else had been
hurt.
“No, Your Grace. I apologize.”
Bowing, Norman exited the office, sighing once he was
outside.
He didn’t mean to blame anyone for his anxiousness, but…
‘Why do I feel so uneasy?’
The estate was running like clockwork, yet he couldn’t shake
the ominous feeling, like a stockpile of explosives awaiting a
spark.
‘I hope it’s just my imagination…’
Taking a deep breath, Norman returned to overseeing the
incoming supplies.

‘The vase…’
Dismissing the matter as trivial hadn’t entirely put Cardale’s
mind at ease. Stopping what he was doing, he stood and
walked out of his office.
“Your Grace?” Michael asked.
“I’ll be back shortly.”
There was only one person the Duke would leave his duties
for without prior notice.
Cardale descended the stairs and headed toward Elise’s
room.
Not bothering to announce himself, he opened the door and
saw Elise surrounded by maids.
“Lady Elise, it gets quite cold here in late autumn, especially
in the evenings. Please be sure to dress warmly.”
Seeing Elise bundled in warm layers closer to winter
clothing than autumn, Cardale felt pleased. Better for her to
be slightly warm than cold.
“Your Grace.”
Noticing him, Linda quickly curtsied. Startled, Elise turned
toward him but moved too quickly, her feet tangling in her
skirts as she tried to regain her balance.

Just as her eyes widened and a silent gasp left her lips,
Cardale reached out and caught her.
Pulling her close, he whispered into her ear.
“You must be more careful, carrying a child.”
Yet Elise said nothing in response. Frowning slightly, Cardale
looked down to see her pale face and hear her shallow,
shaky breaths.
He narrowed his eyes, but quickly reasoned that the fall
must have frightened her, especially in her condition.
She was trembling slightly beneath her thick clothing.
“If you’re this shaken, you won’t be able to walk properly.”
With that, Cardale lifted Elise in his arms. Her mouth opened
in surprise, and her hands fluttered as though she were
startled by the sudden motion.
“Stay still. I’ll carry you to the bed.”
Finally, her fidgeting calmed. But something felt off.
She held her breath, remaining perfectly silent.
Now that he thought of it, she’d barely made a sound
despite the fright. She had always been quiet, but not to
this degree.

He realized this was how Elise had been damaged.
Everyone broke differently, and for Elise, this was how.
Not entirely bad.
Wasn’t this what he’d once imagined—a broken, dependent
woman who could do nothing but rely on him?
He rationalized her state. Yet her thin, frail body, growing
even more emaciated despite carrying a child, left him
unsatisfied.
Without taking his eyes off her, he addressed Linda.
“Have you been seeing to her meals properly?”
Linda lowered her head apologetically.
“Her nausea is still severe… I’ll be more diligent.”
After laying her in bed, Cardale stayed, watching as Elise
ate and eventually fell asleep. Though she hadn’t cried in
front of him, her eyes were red, as if she’d been weeping.
The sight stirred an uncomfortable feeling in his chest.
Blaming it on the room’s temperature, he spoke.
“The room is cold.”
“I’ll add more wood to the fire.”
Already warm, the room became stifling with heat.
Before leaving to finish his work, Cardale glanced back at
Elise.
As she slept, her cheeks appeared ghostly pale, almost
lifeless…
…It was only his imagination.
He turned away abruptly, shutting down any unwelcome
sentiments.
Linger too long and his carefully honed edge would begin to
dull, the walls he’d built to shield himself would crumble.
And yet, wasn’t it precisely his momentary lapse that had
led to her betrayal?
He clenched his jaw.
Only until she had the baby.
Loosening her leash could wait until after that.
He was certain.
Yet it wouldn’t take long before that certainty shattered.

Elise took the shard of glass from her sleeve and gazed at it
absently. Her gaze then drifted up to the long beam
connected to the canopy of her four-poster bed.
It looked sturdy enough to hold her weight and more. She
even had a piece of cloth long enough for her purpose. But
the chance to follow through never came; there was rarely a
time when she was left alone. Linda seldom left her side,
and if she did, it was only for a few minutes at a time. Then
by nightfall, Cardale would return.
But Elise knew that these were merely excuses. She lacked
the courage to end a life, even her own. So she hesitated,
and more time slipped by. Yet she knew she couldn’t delay
forever. Each day she waited would bring more suffering for
both herself and her child.
Slowly, she walked over to the blazing fireplace, knelt before
it, and removed the necklace she always wore—the locket
her mother had given her.
With a soft click, the locket opened to reveal her mother’s
portrait.
“Mother… I hope you’re doing well… wherever you are.” She
whispered, committing her mother’s face to memory as
though for the last time. 
“I love you. I’m so grateful for everything. I wished I could
see you again…”
She bit her lip, struggling to keep her emotions at bay. Now
wasn’t the time for tears; she had something she needed to
say.
“I… I’m having a baby.”
It must sound strange, surprising even. This child was from
her union with the Duke—a child with hair as black as a
summer night, she’d seen in her dreams.
She shared every detail of the baby’s appearance, hoping
that it would somehow help.
“Mother, if my baby reaches your side, please go and meet
them. Please tell them how much I loved them.”
With that last request, Elise closed the locket and pressed
her lips to its cold, metallic surface. Then, she tossed it into
the flames.
The fire eagerly consumed it, leaving no trace of the
treasured keepsake.
Wiping away the tears that had welled up, Elise stood, just
as Linda was returning.
“My lady, I hope I didn’t keep you waiting too long,” Linda
said.
“No, not at all,” Elise replied, forcing a faint smile. She knew
how worried Linda was and felt guilty for causing her so
much concern.
“It’s warmer today than usual—perfect for a walk,” Linda
suggested.
“Is it?” Elise murmured with a weak smile.
The Duke had commanded her to walk every day at noon, to
take in the fresh air when the sun was at its highest. Today,
for the first time since her return to the estate, the weather
was clear enough for her to go outside.
After a slow walk through the gardens, Elise sat on her
favorite bench, glancing habitually at the trellised walkway.
‘The morning glories…’
They were gone. The dry, withered vines had been pulled
out, leaving the trellis bare and pristine. Elise’s gaze
lingered on the clean, empty trellis, and she felt a chill creep
through her.
“My lady, are you cold?” Linda asked, mistaking Elise’s
tremor for a reaction to the temperature. Without another
excuse, Elise nodded slightly.
“Let me fetch a blanket for you. Just a moment.”
Linda hurried off, but her return was delayed when she ran
into Norman on her way.
“Ah, Linda, I was just looking for you,” he said.
“Oh? Is something the matter?”
“It’s about the report from the villa.”
The Duke’s physician regularly sent reports on the health
and well-being of Lady Marissa, Elise’s mother.
“There’s a note that Lady Marissa has been asking
frequently about when she’ll be able to see her daughter,”
Norman continued.
Linda sighed. 
“I’m sure she has. She’s waited far too long already.”
Norman nodded. 
“The report mentions she’s become increasingly anxious.
It’s only natural that her worry would grow the longer she
waits.”
Linda couldn’t keep a glimmer of hope from her voice. 
“Does that mean… His Grace intends to allow a visit?”
But Norman’s face fell. 
“No. His response was the same—it’s still impossible.”
Disappointment flickered over Linda’s features. She knew a
reunion would help Elise regain her spirits and perhaps even
recover her former self. Yet the Duke continued to keep the
truth from Elise, that he had faked her mother’s death to
bring her back to the estate.
‘What is he hoping to achieve?’
With a heavy sigh, Linda excused herself. 
“I’m sorry, Norman, but I must return to Lady Elise.”
“Of course, my apologies for delaying you,” Norman replied,
stepping aside.

Alone once again, Elise turned her gaze toward the rear
gate, unable to bear looking at the trellis any longer.
Another cart filled with supplies was being unloaded.
Beyond the open gate, she could see the edge of the forest.
The cart was overloaded, and the weight caused it to start
tilting to one side. Startled, the servants and even the
guards rushed to steady it, struggling to keep it from tipping
over entirely.
“Hurry and get more help!” one of them shouted, as the
others used all their strength to hold the cart in place.
Amidst the commotion, Elise saw it—a clear path through
the open rear gate, unguarded and inviting.
‘This… this is a sign. A final chance.’
Before she could think, her body was already moving, her
once-feeble legs carrying her toward the open gate. She
slipped through unnoticed.
Beyond the gate lay the forest.
No other route crossed her mind. She knew she couldn’t
escape; Linda would return soon, and her absence would be
discovered before long.
The forest seemed darker and colder than the last time
she’d seen it.
“Out there, the prey changes.”
“Stay within the bounds I’ve set, and nothing will happen.”
Ignoring the haunting memory of his voice, Elise walked
toward the trees.
She was choosing to become the prey.
In her time among the nobility, she’d often thought she
would never fully understand them—their cruelty, their cold,
unfeeling ways.
Count Schuvan, Fritz, the countless nobles who saw others
as pawns… and then, the one man who had once offered
her warmth. She had once let herself believe that the Duke
was different, that he might be someone she could trust.
But it had all been an illusion.
To him, she was nothing. Her beloved child was nothing.
‘Someone he could send to the slave markets without a
second thought.’
‘Forgive me, little one.’
‘I couldn’t protect you. I couldn’t change him.’
With each step into the forest, Elise shed the remnants of
her hopes and dreams—her wish for a life of happiness, her
longing to protect her mother, her foolish wish to stay by his
side. Even the love she’d kept hidden in her heart.
But there was one thing she couldn’t release, one last,
desperate wish: to meet her baby, to see the tiny life she
carried.
‘If I stop here, if I give up… my baby will live a life of nothing
but pain.’
Her lips bled from how hard she bit down on them, holding
back her despair.
‘Little one…’
‘I’ve given you no name, my poor, innocent child…’
‘But I promise, I won’t leave you alone. I’ll stay with you
until the very end…’
Elise whispered to her child as she walked deeper into the
forest, knowing that this was their last goodbye.
And then, finally, the dark forest swallowed her whole.

At that very moment, Cardale was in his study, poring over
the family’s genealogical records.
Michael watched him with quiet bewilderment.
It wasn’t just that the Duke had unexpectedly asked for the
family records; it was the way he was flipping through the
pages, jotting down notes at irregular intervals.
‘What could he be looking for?’
Michael’s curiosity got the best of him, and he leaned in to
glimpse what Cardale was writing.
‘Names…?’
Liselotte, Beatrix, Brunhilde, Adelaide…
The list continued with male names: Richard, Matthias,
Aloysius, Kilian, Theodor…
Each entry had a corresponding nickname noted beside it.
‘Is His Grace… is he actually choosing names for the child?’
Realization dawned on Michael just as Linda burst into the
room.
“Your Grace!” she gasped, barely catching her breath. It was
almost unthinkable for her to barge into the Duke’s study
like this.
“What is it?” 
Michael began to admonish her for her lack of decorum, but
she cut him off, her voice trembling with urgency.
“My lady—Lady Elise—she’s gone!”

Cardale’s face turned frighteningly hard.
The quill he had been holding cracked in half with the force
of his grip. Its sturdy, flexible feather split cleanly.
“Miss Elise… she was out for a walk when I left to fetch a
blanket,” Linda stammered, but Cardale didn’t wait to hear
the full explanation. Instead, he issued a curt order to
Michael.
“Seal off all entrances to the manor and begin the search
immediately.”
“Yes, Your Grace.” Michael bolted from the room without
hesitation.
Narrowing his gaze, Cardale turned to the housemaid. 
“Where was the last place you saw Elise?”

The staff and guards divided into search parties and scoured
the manor and gardens.
Leaving his study, Cardale made his way to the bench near
the colonnade, where Elise had last been seen.

Even after the alarming news, Cardale’s composure
remained eerily steady. To an outsider, he might have even
seemed calm. He held onto a strong confidence that Elise
Schuvan was somewhere within the manor’s grounds.
The manor’s defenses were impenetrable, secure enough to
prevent any intrusions, whether by common thieves or
trained assassins. It was an arrogance that now fed his
complacency, as he found it inconceivable that a pregnant
woman could breach his defenses and escape.
Cardale arrived at the spot where Elise had been. 
This was it.
He took in the view from where she must have sat. The
white walls of the colonnade and the arches stood out. As
he slowly turned his head to the side, his gaze fell upon
something that made his stomach twist.
The back gate.
And beyond it, the forest.
In that instant, a chilling sensation crept over him, as
though an icy blade were trailing along his neck, mocking
his carelessness.
Before he knew it, Cardale was moving toward the gate, his
steps quickening with an urgency that was new to him. Any
sign of calm had long vanished from his face, replaced by a
rare glimmer of anxiety.
The soldiers guarding the back gate were in the process of
shutting it after allowing a supply cart into the manor. Upon
seeing their master, they snapped to attention, stiff and
alert.
“Your Grace!” they greeted.
Cardale’s voice was harsh as he demanded, “How long has
the gate been open?”
“F-For about an hour, sir.”
The soldiers exchanged nervous glances.
They were all aware of whom the Duke was searching for.
As the gate was used by both staff and external suppliers, it
seemed a plausible escape route. One of the soldiers, eager
to deflect blame, hurriedly added, “Your Grace, if I may…
none of the individuals who exited through the gate
appeared suspicious.”
Cardale’s attention, however, wasn’t on the visitors. “And
what about yourselves?”
“P-Pardon?”
“What I am asking,” Cardale said, his crimson eyes
gleaming with chilling precision, “is whether any of you left
your post, even briefly.”
His intense gaze was so sharp it sent shivers down their
spines, making lying an impossible task, even for the
boldest among them.
The soldier, visibly trembling, confessed, “W-Well… one of
the carts tipped, and we had to help restack it, so we did
briefly—very briefly—leave our position.”
As he spoke, he realized the magnitude of their mistake,
and all words left him. The blood drained from the soldiers’
faces as they recognized their error.
“When was this?” Cardale pressed.
“…About twenty minutes ago.”
It matched perfectly with the time Elise had been left alone.
A cold dread settled in Cardale’s chest, and for the first
time, his face twisted with an emotion close to fury.
“Open the gate. Now.”
“Y-Yes, sir!”
Without sparing them another glance, Cardale ripped the
sword from the waist of one of the guards.
“Y-Your Grace, please…”
But he no longer looked at them.
A sharp whistle summoned his jet-black steed, who bolted
from the stables and thundered to a halt before him.
Without slowing, Cardale seized the reins and mounted.
The gate was opened just in time for him to charge through
it, his horse galloping at full speed toward the forest.
It was more than a guess; he was almost certain she had
fled toward the forest.
‘Elise.’
Cardale spurred the horse forward, replaying in his mind the
subtle signs from the past few days, each one forming a
haunting picture of her mental state, like a hidden imprint
now fully revealed.
‘Elise.’
He had believed he had broken her, molded her into
something entirely his own, obtained her complete
surrender and submission.
He had shattered her, casting her into the depths, and the
sight of her helpless compliance had brought him nothing
but satisfaction.
So when had she begun to harbor thoughts of escape? Since
when?
Even if it meant choosing the forest—despite knowing the
dangers that lurked there.
His fingers gripped the reins with such force that his
knuckles whitened.
It made no sense.
Elise Schuvan had something to protect—a life more
precious to her than her own.
She had wept, clinging to him with desperate pleas,
yearning to have the child, to have it bear the name of
Vasenberg, to have him acknowledge it as his.
So why? Why the forest of all places?
Had she truly desired to escape him so desperately that she
would venture into such a deadly place?
The discomfort in his chest grew more insistent, demanding
his attention. His heart pounded, each beat painful, unlike
anything he’d experienced. It wasn’t just the gallop of the
horse that made his pulse race.
By the time Cardale reached the edge of the forest, his
heart felt like it was about to explode.
He brought his horse to a stop. His sharp gaze scanned the
area, searching for any trace of her presence.
It didn’t take long to spot footprints that did not belong to
any animal.

The forest was far darker within than it had appeared from
the outside.
Elise looked up at the tangled branches and withered leaves
overhead.
While some trees had shed all their leaves, others like the
oaks and chestnuts still cast deep shadows with their
autumn-colored canopies.
Crunch, crunch.
The leaves, damp from rain the day before, muffled her
footsteps, but the mud clung to her shoes and made her
progress slow.
It was hard to keep track of her direction in the dense forest,
and before long, Elise had lost sight of where she had
entered.
‘…It’s all right.’
She had entered the forest with no intention of ever
returning.
Elise steeled herself, pushing through her fear and stepping
deeper and deeper into the shadows.
She jumped each time a bird suddenly took flight or a ripe
acorn dropped to the ground.
Then, a thick silence fell around her, catching her off guard.
It was too quiet.
As if the forest were luring her in, whispering reassurances
to frightened prey.
A chilling wind stirred the leaves, its cold touch sinking into
her bones.
She shivered, her tear-streaked cheeks now freezing as she
brushed them dry.
And that’s when she saw it.
A pair of dark eyes stared back at her.
“Grrr…”
The creature snarled, baring sharp fangs as it scrunched its
snout in a menacing growl.
Elise froze, yet her mind was clear.
It had finally come.
Unable to bring herself to end her own life, she had come
into the forest, knowing full well this might happen. She
couldn’t fault the predator for seeing her as prey.
“Grrrr…!”
Another growl sounded from behind. Elise turned slightly,
her breath hitching.
There wasn’t just one. She was surrounded.
The creatures salivated, their hot breathing pooling in the
cool air as they eyed their trapped prey.
Paralyzed by fear, Elise clutched her belly instinctively.
Even if their teeth pierced her flesh, even if they tore into
her shoulders, she wanted her last moments to be to protect
her child from any pain. She would bear it all.
“Grrrraaah!”
The pack leader finally lunged, its vicious growl tearing
through the air as it leaped at her.
Elise clenched her eyes shut, lowering herself to the ground,
wrapping her arms around her knees to shield her child.
‘Mother… please, protect my child.’
In those final moments, she prayed for the unborn life she
was about to lose, a life that would return to the heavens
before even seeing the world.
The pounding of paws and the heavy breaths of the beasts
grew closer, until she felt the raw danger closing in on her
neck.
Crack.
A blade cut through the air, slicing through the beast’s
throat with deadly precision.
Before she could register what had happened, she felt a
familiar weight—a man’s coat—drape over her trembling
body.
“Elise.”
It was Cardale.

The man’s sword cut through the beasts without mercy. With
each swing, blood sprayed, and the creatures’ death howls
filled the air.
As several of the beasts fell, limp and lifeless, the remaining
ones sensed the danger and regrouped, reassessing their
odds against this formidable foe.
In the brief pause afforded by the standoff, Cardale flicked
the blood from his blade, casting a glance behind him to
check on Elise, who he assumed was cowering nearby.
‘…!’
But Elise, who had been huddled there moments before,
was gone. His gaze shifted urgently.
In the distance, he caught sight of her—a fleeing figure like
a startled deer, her pale dress fluttering like the throat of a
prey animal in flight.
“Elise Schuvan!”
The brief distraction of calling her name cost him. He barely
saw the flash before the pain ripped into his side.
“Argh!”
Cardale reacted instantly, slicing his sword through the
beasts that had seized the opportunity. Ignoring the pain
that flared from his torn side, he set off after Elise.
Branches and thorn-laden underbrush tore at his path, his
surroundings devolving into a mess of tangled brush that
barely resembled a path.
Dismounting from his horse to press on more quickly,
Cardale sprinted with all his strength.
In ordinary circumstances, he would have closed the
distance quickly, but his injury slowed him. With frustration
spilling over, he called out again:
“Elise!”
The figure in the distance halted briefly, turning to glance
back, her pale face filled with unmistakable fear.
‘Yes, stop. Just like always. I’ll catch you before you suffer
greater consequences.’
But Elise turned away again and, with renewed desperation,
continued to run forward.
Cardale ground his teeth.
The forest, now shadowed with winter’s chill, grew more
dangerous. Should she encounter another predator, she
could lose her life. He quickly assessed her direction.
They were still within the forest’s outer edge, but…
Wait. A sudden realization hit him, and he halted,
remembering what lay ahead in her path.
“Elise!”
The trees opened up as the forest gave way to a stretch of
open ground, but the clearing ahead marked the edge of the
most perilous point.
Ahead of him, she paused to catch her breath, visibly worn
down. Seizing the moment, Cardale shouted.
“Stop! It’s a cliff!”
She froze.
Her small figure slowly turned to look down at the cliff’s
steep edge. Then, she looked back at him, her wide, blue
eyes shimmering with tears.
Cardale extended his hand, his voice firm.
“It’s dangerous there. Come here.”
In the end, she would come back to him. By now, she knew
that he was the only one who could protect her in the
wilderness. For the sake of the child, she would reach out for
his hand.
And so he expected her to turn from the cliff and walk
toward him. He was certain, without a doubt.
But then, Cardale witnessed something he could hardly
believe.
Elise shook her head—slowly, but unmistakably.
Her face reflected pain and resolve.
“The… the baby…”
She took a step back, lips trembling as she spoke barely
above a whisper.
“The baby will go to heaven. I… I’ll make sure of it.”
Her voice quivered, barely holding back a sob. Cardale’s
brow furrowed, struggling to understand her fragmented
words.
“It won’t… live a life like mine… so… wretched…”
“What are you—”
Suddenly, an icy realization struck him like a blow to the
chest, freezing him in place.
No.
The reason she had come into the forest—perhaps it wasn’t
what he had assumed.
Could it be… that she hadn’t come here to escape?
Why had she entered the woods without even a cloak for
protection? Why had she faced down the beasts without
fleeing, as if offering herself to them? Why did she not stop,
even when she saw the cliff ahead?
The word she had whispered, “heaven,” echoed in his mind,
heavy as a death knell.
In an instant, a chill swept over him, numbing his body.
It felt as if his veins, from his fingertips to his heart, were
freezing over. Cardale felt an aching tightness in his chest, a
breath-stopping sensation he had never known.
For the first time, he was overwhelmed by something he
had never known to fear, his red eyes quivering slightly as
he looked at the woman who stood only a few steps away.
“Elise.”
Unconsciously, he murmured her name. His voice, never
before unsteady, now carried an unfamiliar tremor.
Elise turned to face the cliff.
“No, Elise!”
Cardale lunged forward. The beast’s wound on his side tore
open, his blood soaking through the layers of his clothes.
But he didn’t feel it. His entire focus was on her.
He reached her in a heartbeat, catching her in his arms,
pulling her close.
Yet his step was just a fraction too late to find stable footing.
Realizing this, Cardale instinctively cradled her head,
shielding her from the fall.
Together, they plummeted over the cliff’s edge, hurtling
toward the fast-moving river below.

When Cardale’s horse returned without its rider, the
manor’s staff scrambled to organize a search party.
But before Michael and the soldiers even reached the back
gate, Cardale appeared, drenched, carrying Elise in his
arms.
Water dripped from his soaked hair. His shirt, stained a dark,
ominous red, clung to his form.
Michael gasped in shock, his voice catching as he called out,
“Your Grace!”
But Cardale’s gaze remained solely on the unconscious
woman in his arms.
In a tone as cold as steel, he issued his command.
“Summon the physician.”
Elise, still unconscious, was laid upon his bed.
Linda, keeping her composure, carefully removed Elise’s wet
clothes and dressed her in fresh indoor garments. The
physician arrived to examine her, while Cardale remained
by her side, not once breaking his gaze.
“The baby… the baby is unharmed,” the physician reported
quietly.
Linda sighed with relief. But it wasn’t the answer Cardale
was waiting for.
“And Elise?”
“She has no serious injuries and should regain
consciousness soon. She appears to have fainted from
exhaustion.”
The physician, offering to prepare a strengthening tonic,
hesitated before asking, “Your Grace… and your side?”
By now, the smell of blood in the room was unmistakable,
the deep wound on his side visible through his torn shirt.
“I’ll tend to it myself.”
“B-but… Very well.”
“Everyone. Out.”
Linda quickly ushered everyone from the room.
Cardale stood for a long moment, staring at Elise’s pale,
worn face.
Finally, he moved, entering the bathroom without further
hesitation.
As he removed his clothes, each blood-soaked piece fell to
the floor with a damp thud.
He washed himself under hot water, tended to his wound,
stitched and bandaged it with practiced skill, all without so
much as a grimace.
But when he finished, and returned to the bedroom, he
paused.
Elise’s eyelashes were fluttering, and her eyes were slowly
opening, just barely.
Without realizing it, Cardale crossed the room in hurried
strides.
His movements were tense, his gaze desperate as it met her
dazed, blue eyes.
“Elise.”
As her vision cleared, her eyes traced over the ceiling, the
bedposts, and finally landed on his face.
Tears welled up in her gentle gaze.
“Does it hurt? Are you in pain?”
Cardale didn’t even realize how unlike him these questions
were.
Ordinarily, he would have demanded explanations the
moment she woke, scolded her, berated her, filled her with
dread.
But he felt none of that now. Or rather, he simply couldn’t
bring himself to.
Not after the shock of witnessing the final choice of the
woman he had broken so utterly.
The helplessness and terror he had felt watching her run
toward that cliff, and the overwhelming relief of pulling her
back, still gripped his heart.
Yes, for the first time, he was afraid. And this fear was
suffocating him.
“Why…?”
A fresh wave of tears rolled down her cheeks, soaking into
the pillow beneath her.
“Why did you save me… Why…?”
Elise’s voice broke as she sobbed, her small hands covering
her face, her frail body trembling.
“You should have just let me die… Someone like me, so…
Worthless…”
The woman, so shattered that she had chosen death over
life, now cried in despair. Still struggling to understand why
he had pulled her back from the edge.

Cardale stood there, his throat tight, speechless.
‘…To think this place was a hell for you.’
Seeing the desolation of his shattered fawn laid bare, he
could only stand, silent, finally facing what he had wrought.

Elise cried as though she could pour out all the tears within
herself, and Cardale could only stand by helplessly, unable
to speak or even reach out a hand. He feared that any touch
might shatter her completely.
He was haunted by the terrible feeling that if he tried, she
might crumble to dust, leaving nothing but a pale handful of
remains.
Only a short while later, Elise, exhausted herself and slipped
back into unconsciousness.
Startled, Cardale checked her immediately. Feeling the faint
breaths and the small, steady pulse at her neck, he finally
exhaled in relief, reassured that her life continued albeit
faintly.
Then, he reached out toward her tear-soaked cheek, where
he had wanted so many times to wipe away her tears. Yet
her face was so damp that his own hand quickly became
wet. Realizing he needed something to dry her tears, he
dampened a cloth and gently wiped her face with a
newfound tenderness.
Her pale, soft features emerged, innocent and vulnerable.
In the silence, as the light slowly faded, he found himself
gazing at her youthful face. And then, layered over that
face, he saw her expression as she threw herself toward the
cliff’s edge. He felt again the fear, cold as ice, that had
gripped him, making his heart feel as though it had dropped
to his feet.
He could find her wherever she might hide and stop any
attempt to run, but even his power couldn’t bring back a
soul that had left this world.
Cardale, who had never felt attachment to anyone’s life or
death, not even his own, clenched and unclenched his damp
fist repeatedly, unsettled. This turbulent mix of emotions
stirred inside him, and he didn’t know how to resolve it.
In that moment, he felt a strange sense of detachment from
himself.
‘Why am I so afraid?’
He had seen countless deaths, taken many lives, and
carried out ruthless interrogations, using any means
necessary to achieve his goals. So why was he so shaken by
a single act of despair from a mere mistress?
Even after bringing her back safely, he couldn’t shake his
anxiety. It was unlike him.
Biting down on his frustration, Cardale reviewed the events
of the day and examined the emotions he struggled to
understand.
Elise.
She was, after all, just a woman he had taken in for a
momentary diversion of pleasure, someone he’d planned to
discard once he tired of her.
And yet, she had deceived him, betrayed him, and even
attempted to escape twice. If such a woman chose death…
But Cardale could not finish that thought.
The mere thought of Elise’s death sent a chill through him,
filling him with an unshakeable, awful dread that made it
hard to breathe.
The intensity of the feeling startled him. Slowly, the
emotions he had kept buried, the truth he had denied,
surfaced and laid bare before him.

A seemingly serene lake, though hiding a deadly mire
below, had been disturbed by an innocent, unsuspecting
fawn who had wandered in, unaware of the danger.
Though he could have pulled her under at any moment, he
hadn’t.
Even as he became aware of her presence, and even as she
played at the water’s edge, he allowed her to stay. He didn’t
stop her, though he had watched her every move, her
reflection, her tentative steps.
And as his darker nature grew restless, he couldn’t bear the
idea of her leaving. He’d bound her slender ankles and
pulled her into his depths, watching her struggle as she
begged for forgiveness, cried to be spared. It had satisfied
him.
Yet in doing so, he had broken her, and by the time he
realized something was wrong, it was too late.
All he knew was how to take and destroy; restoring was
beyond him.
All he could do was watch the strength fade from her small,
delicate frame, her desperate struggle growing fainter as
she slipped from his grasp.
No.
It was then that a silent scream tore through him.
A high-pitched ringing filled his ears, his vision blurring with
a blinding ache. Before he could process it, agony clutched
at his chest, as though something were prying open his ribs
to crush his heart.
His body betrayed him. His own strength became
uncontrollable, failing him as though punishing him for
refusing to accept the truth.
Breathing heavily, Cardale fought to steady his breath. Yet
even as he calmed, the depths within him posed a question.
Why not?
She was an annoying little fawn, a source of amusement
he’d enjoyed enough. Why not just consume her, use her as
nourishment, and be done with her?
Cardale could not answer. Not because he didn’t know, but
because the realization was piercingly clear.
The fragments of emotion he had ignored finally,
undeniably, made themselves known.
‘I…’
With his eyes half-lowered, Cardale’s long lashes cast
shadows that trembled almost imperceptibly.
‘I didn’t want her to die.’
What he had once found irritating had gradually drawn his
attention. Amidst a world of cold ruthlessness, this small
warmth had intrigued him. The more he saw, the more
captivating she became, stirring a desire to keep her, a
longing to bind her to his side forever.
But his arrogance, his refusal to acknowledge this, had
driven him to break her.
He hadn’t realized that the fragile fawn had, in her own way,
tamed him.

The intensity of these revelations struck him like a
hurricane, leaving a stillness and wreckage behind.
As late afternoon faded and crimson light painted the sky,
slowly giving way to darkness, Cardale remained frozen, his
mind racing.
He stood in the unlit room long after sunset, his gaze fixed
upon the figure lying on the bed. His eyes, deeper and more
vivid than the last light of dusk, were the only sign of the
turmoil within him.

Suddenly, the chill of the room caught his attention, his
fingers brushing against the cool air.
Noticing the fire in the hearth nearly extinguished, he
quickly moved to rekindle it.
She was prone to catching a cold. If she fell ill, she would
likely be sick for days. And now, with a child, the strain
would be even greater.
As he knelt by the fireplace, searching for fresh wood to
stoke the fire, something strange caught his eye amid the
soft ash.
Furrowing his brow, Cardale pulled it out with a poker.
Blackened but familiar in shape, it was a piece of metal with
a round body and a long chain, resembling a necklace.
A necklace.
As he wiped it with a handkerchief, his breath caught.
Though misshapen by the flames, it was unmistakably the
pendant she had cherished as her life’s treasure.
She had clung to it as if it were a lifeline, pleading with him
when he tried to take it away as punishment.
But she had thrown it into the fire herself.
‘You really…’
Cardale felt the breath catch in his throat. His hand
tightened around the pendant.
The memory of her tearful plea, her final words before she
threw herself toward freedom, haunted him.
He knew he would never be able to erase that image from
his mind.

Elise’s body began to burn with fever by nightfall.
Sweating so profusely that her clothes were soaked, she
shivered uncontrollably from the chills. 
The physician, summoned to the Duke’s bedroom in the
middle of the night, withstood the piercing gaze boring into
his back as he examined the Duke’s woman once more.
“It appears her body and mind weakened after the fall into
the icy valley water.”
However, he hesitated to administer strong medication.
“Forgive me, Your Grace, but the medications I can use are
limited.”
“Why?” 
The Duke’s chilling question caused the doctor, who had
already assured his master that Elise was stable, to shudder
in fear. Feeling as if his throat could be crushed at any
moment by the Duke’s fierce intensity.
With great effort, the physician gathered his courage and
replied, “The most effective medicines contain some
toxicity. It would be manageable for the lady, but the child
may not endure it…”
“What does that matter?”
The Duke, caring more about Elise’s well-being than the
child’s, immediately ordered the use of the medication.
“Your Grace.” 
Thankfully, Linda intervened at the right moment, her
intuition grasping the situation. She had been observing
both the Duke and Elise closely and understood the broader
implications.
“If anything were to happen to the child, the lady would not
be able to bear it.” 

The Duke was reminded that the child within her was Elise’s
sole anchor. 
Linda was right. Even if she recovered physically, any harm
to the child would drive her to despair all over again.
Begrudgingly, he turned his ire back on the hapless
physician.
The doctor, pledging loyalty as if his life depended on it,
repeatedly promised to brew the gentlest possible medicine
and dedicate himself entirely to restoring the lady’s health
before finally escaping his master’s relentless scrutiny.
Fortunately, Elise’s fever broke the next day.
But she was slow to regain her strength, repeatedly drifting
in and out of a death-like slumber. Linda, ever by her side,
held her hand each time she stirred.
“The baby is safe. Everything will be fine, so please rest
without worry.” 
When Linda reassured her, Elise would show the faintest
glimmer of relief, tearful at the corners of her eyes, before
slipping back into sleep.
Meanwhile, Cardale stayed up through the night, repeatedly
missing the moments Elise opened her eyes.
By the third time this happened, he could no longer restrain
himself and decided to conduct all his work from the
bedroom.
A large desk was promptly set up in the corner of the room,
positioned so that he had a direct view of Elise’s sleeping
form.
He had the canopy bed’s curtains drawn and draped with
heavy dark fabric on three sides to shield her, leaving only
the front side, veiled in a light, sheer fabric through which
he could see her. Only then did he seem content.
As Elise wandered in and out of dreams, the bedroom began
to transform little by little.
The first to go was the taxidermy. Though none of the
Duke’s staff dared to comment on his sudden change of
heart, they were silently grateful to remove the mounted
animals. They’d been hoping to clear those remnants long
before now.
Afterward, the curtains on each window were changed.
The weighty, dark fabric had lent a solemn, antique
elegance, but Linda suggested they gave the room a
somber atmosphere.
Instead, she chose a deep green fabric with small floral
patterns that Elise would favor.
“Isn’t this too bright?” Norman voiced his concerns, unsure
if the Duke would approve of such a lively choice for his
private quarters.
“Trust me,” Linda replied confidently. “His Grace will allow
it.”
Sure enough, Cardale gave his silent approval with a nod.
And the room brightened significantly.
The locked terrace door was reopened, and the balustrade
was painted ivory. Gentle, elegant decor suitable for a lady
adorned the room.
While the bedroom underwent its transformation, more days
passed, and Elise still hadn’t regained full consciousness. To
Cardale’s frustration, she continued to stir only when he was
forced away for work.
Each time he heard from Linda that Elise had woken briefly,
his face twisted with disappointment, though he masked it
well in her presence.
Whenever his disappointment became too much, Cardale
would return to his desk and resume his work, sneaking
glances at the sleeping woman.
Deep into his work, the slightest quiet would make him snap
his head up and rush to her bedside to ensure she was still
there.
He would check her slow, steady breathing, the faint rise
and fall of her chest. Then, when finally reassured, he’d
return to his desk.
“She loves flowers,” Linda mentioned to him. “She used to
sit on the garden bench near the trellis every day just to
look at the morning glories.”
For Cardale, who could only wait, Linda’s words offered him
something to do.
Though flowers were rare in this season, he was a hunter
who owned the surrounding woods, where certain hardy
flowers still bloomed even in the cold.
Between tasks, Cardale rode out to the forest, picking any
flowers he could find to fill the vase by Elise’s bedside.
“When she wakes, make sure she can see the flowers.”
Under his repeated instructions, Linda nodded, though not
entirely certain she understood.

“Your Grace, it has been restored.”
Michael retrieved a cloth-wrapped item from his pocket and
presented it.
It was Elise’s pendant, fresh from the jeweler’s repairs.
Cardale opened the pendant with his thumb. With a click,
the case opened, revealing the now-empty space where the
portraits of her mother and the young girl had once been.
“The pendant itself could be repaired, but the portraits
within were lost in the flames,” Michael explained.
The paper portraits had likely turned to ash the instant they
caught fire.
Cardale studied the pendant before speaking.
“What of the portrait artist I requested?”
“I found several skilled artists, but none were willing to draw
based on description alone. However…”
Michael hesitated, watching his master’s expression
carefully as he continued.
“There was one who said he could attempt to recreate the
past portraits if he could see their current faces.”
“Summon him.”
The prompt answer surprised Michael slightly, though he
showed no sign of it as he bowed.
“Yes, Your Grace.”
He thought to himself that it was also time Lady Elise met
her mother. She had waited long enough.
Though Michael was deeply loyal, even he couldn’t help but
feel his master had been overly harsh with the lady.
“And what of the situation with the Count of Schuvan?”
Having been asked about it daily, Michael answered
immediately.
“We have received reports that Damien Schuvan will make a
move soon.”
“Good,” Cardale replied with a slight smile. “I was ready to
prod him if he delayed much longer.”
Damien Schuvan, Elise’s older brother, was a promising
man. Intelligent, determined, and tactful, though still far too
inexperienced to be considered a real threat.
“No word from him?”
“None, Your Grace. It appears he feels he must seize control
of the Schuvan family himself if he is to avoid being
manipulated later.”
“Foolish.”
Since beginning his role as Schuvan’s heir, Damien had
cautiously tried to loosen his connection to Cardale without
entirely severing it. His mother’s continued stay at the
Vassenberg estate tied him down.
Unaware that Cardale knew everything he was planning,
Damien remained unknowingly indebted to him.
“Since Vanessa Lockseed’s disappearance, he’s become
even more cautious.”
In truth, Damien’s subtle maneuvers within the family were
only successful because of the Vassenberg’s agents
embedded in the Schuvan household by Cardale.
“And how does he intend to handle it?” Cardale asked.
“He’s planning to stage a carriage accident.”
“Clever enough,” Cardale replied, though his gaze remained
cold.
Still, the plan had its flaws. If it failed, it would be easy to
trace back to him.
“Make sure Gerhard Schuvan is finished for good this time.
Use the shadows if you must.”
“Yes, Your Grace.”
Michael left, and Cardale glanced briefly at Elise before
taking up his hunting rifle.
He would bring fresh flowers.
By the time the vases beside Elise’s bed were overflowing
with vibrant blooms, Elise finally opened her eyes.

As Elise’s mind slowly cleared, she let out a faint groan. Her
throat felt dry and scratchy, as though she had swallowed
sand, and her eyes stung with a prickling ache.
What had happened?
As her muddled thoughts tried to piece things together, a
voice cut through her haze.
“My lady, are you awake?”
It was Linda’s voice. And with it, a flood of memories surged
back, dragging Elise down into them.
‘Ah… I was on the cliff…’
She remembered that final desperate attempt, the arms
that had caught her as she’d tried to plunge into oblivion. As
well as the heartbreak she had felt, knowing that even her
last wish—to die—had been denied her.
“My lady.” 
The maids helped her sit up as Linda’s calm voice soothed
her, and a cup touched her dry lips. 
“Here, drink some water. It will help.”
As the tepid water moistened her parched throat, Elise
recalled the blurred days that had passed in and out of fitful
sleep. Each time she had regained her senses, Linda had
been there, giving her sips of water, coaxing some soup and
medicine down her throat before she’d once again sunk into
exhaustion.
Elise struggled to move her dry lips, wanting to thank the
person who had so tirelessly tended to her, even though she
herself had been ready to abandon all will to live.
“Thank you…”
“My lady!”
Linda’s eyes sparkled with joy at hearing Elise’s first words
in days.
“Oh, it’s a relief. We were all so worried…”
Her face softened with a mix of relief and sympathy. 
“Don’t worry now. Everything will be alright.”
Elise forced a faint smile, understanding Linda’s effort to
reassure her.
But under the covers, her hands tightly clutched the fabric
over her abdomen.
‘Things will never be alright…’
It hadn’t been long since she was caught after her escape.
And now she had tried to escape again. This time, she had
even tried to die. She had defied his command to return and
had thrown herself off the cliff.
Her prayers had failed, and now all that awaited her was the
price of her actions.
‘The Duke will never forgive me now…’
Remembering the cold, merciless eyes and the icy tone on
the day he had dragged her back to his bedroom, Elise
began to tremble. She could still feel the terror and dread as
though it had only just happened.
Imagining his rage, his fury—far greater than anything she
had faced before—made her feel as though her chest was
being crushed.
And the most agonizing part was knowing that she wouldn’t
be the only one to suffer for her actions.
‘The baby…’
A ghostly pallor spread across her face as she instinctively
clutched her stomach, cold sweat dampening her hands.
“The baby is safe, my lady,” Linda’s voice murmured
nearby, but Elise barely registered it. Her mind was haunted
by another voice.
‘You fool. This is all your fault.’
The voice was rough and hoarse, echoing from her past,
from countless people: her father, her mother, her brother
Fritz, maybe even Vanessa. She had heard it so many times,
always about her worthlessness.
In her mind, Elise tried to plead, ‘I… I just wanted…’
She had only wanted to protect the baby, realizing she could
do nothing else. She had wanted to shield her child from a
world of pain, to offer the warmth and peace of God’s
embrace instead of a life of suffering.
‘Then you should have died properly.’
The voice sneered.
‘Yet you’re still clinging to life.’
She felt a phantom grip around her throat, as though
invisible hands were tightening and choking her. She
gasped, her lips parting in a silent plea.
“Your Grace, you’ve arrived.”
The voice of a maid announcing the Duke’s arrival sent a jolt
through her body. She stiffened instinctively, trembling as
she heard his deliberate footsteps.
“Prepare a meal,” he commanded.
“Yes, Your Grace.”
Linda and the other maids quickly left the room. Now alone
with him, Elise shrank back in fear, her body tense and
coiled.
“Elise.”
His deep voice reverberated, calm and composed, without a
trace of anger.
Yet she knew how mercilessly he could deliver cruelty with
that same dispassionate tone.
‘The same voice that had coldly spoken of selling their baby
into slavery.’
“How are you feeling?”
His large, warm hand touched her cheek.

Though his touch was gentle, she flinched hard, squeezing
her eyes shut. She couldn’t bear to look at him, even though
she knew she would have to face him sooner or later. Her
hands clutched her stomach tighter.
His hand moved to tilt her chin up. Despite the tender
touch, she couldn’t perceive it as anything other than
threatening. The terror gripped her too tightly.
“Look at me.”
‘I’m scared…’
She could feel her eyelids quivering but couldn’t bring
herself to open them. She knew this hesitation, this
defiance, would only anger him further.
She would probably be locked in this room forever, never
allowed outside again, just as her mother had been
imprisoned in the separate wing without reprieve.
Her own status as a fallen noble and the disgrace of her
family’s betrayal weighed on her.
Tears pricked at her closed eyes, realizing she would have to
bear the sight of her child living in shame and hardship.
No, she would likely be denied even that much. As a mere
servant, she had no right to witness her child’s suffering.
“Elise.”
‘If I beg, would he show mercy to the baby? If I plead,
promising to do anything he asks, would he grant the baby
freedom from a life of slavery?’
Even though she had begged him countless times before,
Elise tried to convince herself that maybe she just hadn’t
pleaded earnestly enough.
For the sake of her child, she gathered what courage she
had left and slowly opened her eyes.
But the instant her gaze met his, an overwhelming flood of
tears spilled over, rolling down her cheeks.
‘No, if I anger him…’
As her hands shook, Elise quickly wiped her eyes,
stammering.
“Y-Your Grace…”
But she regretted speaking the moment she saw his
expression harden.
‘How stupid and foolish I am.’
It would have been better to stay silent, to bite off this
useless tongue.
Slowly, Elise tried to shift her weak body, intending to kneel,
but he stopped her, his brow creasing with irritation.
“Don’t.”
She froze halfway, her hands on the edge of the bed, her
eyes downcast and trembling.
‘What does he mean, ‘Don’t’? Oh, maybe it’s because this is
the bed. I should get down on the floor…’
Resolving herself, she attempted to move again. Her feet
touched the plush rug, and her hands clenched in distress.
‘I can’t… my tears will ruin this expensive rug. I shouldn’t
ruin it. I’m not worth the cost.’
“I said don’t.”
Before she could kneel, Cardale caught her, lifting her back
onto the bed.
She looked up, startled, finally meeting his gaze. His eyes,
vivid with a strange intensity, softened as he frowned
deeply.
“You… Do you have any idea how long you’ve been
unconscious…? Damn it.”
He muttered a curse, raking a hand through his hair, and
Elise’s heart seized with dread.
‘Did I anger him by persisting? Am I annoying him? It must
be exhausting to deal with such a worthless girl, one who
keeps begging and pleading.’
“I… I’m sorry… Please forgive me.”
The words spilled out automatically, and Cardale’s
expression grew stonier. But Elise forced herself to continue,
gripping his arm with trembling hands.
“Please, just once more…”
And she began to stammer her confessions, listing every
offense: sneaking into the forest, fleeing from him,
disobeying his command and jumping off the cliff, even
accusing him of denying her the right to die.
Cardale listened in silence, looking down at the frail woman
who, barely able to sit upright, wept as she pleaded for
forgiveness.
‘Why are you the one asking for forgiveness?’
If suffering so intensely had driven her to the brink of death,
was not the one who had caused that pain equally guilty?

It was painful to watch her like this. 
Cardale’s heart pounded harder and more erratically,
overtaken by a discomfort that had only grown each time he
pushed Elise, each time she begged him with tears in her
eyes. Finally, he understood that this gnawing feeling was
not the sadistic satisfaction he had once thought he felt.
Unlike his rational mind, his heart had known it all along.
He was disturbed, shaken to the core, by her suffering and
sorrow.
“Stop,” he said at last, gripping her frail shoulders.
“There’s no need for that anymore.”
Her eyes filled with fear and darted wildly, betraying the
thoughts that raced through her mind. He knew exactly
what she was afraid of, her single plea that had always been
the same—because he had instilled this fear in her himself.
Cardale steadied his voice. He didn’t know how to be gentle
or kind, but one thing was certain: he no longer wanted to
treat her as he had. He didn’t want to intimidate her with
harsh, frightening words.
Instead, he said what he believed she most needed to hear.
“Nothing will happen to your child. I promise.”
Her round, blue eyes widened, looking as though she could
hardly believe what he had just said. Of course she’d be
shocked. He had never once reassured her about the safety
of the child before. He had only instilled fear, relentlessly
pushing her into submission.
Elise’s eyes wavered in confusion, and Cardale leaned down,
meeting her gaze on her level.
“When the baby is born, you’ll be able to stay together in a
new room—”
A knock at the door interrupted him.
“Your Grace, I have brought your meal,” Linda announced,
as she and Norman entered with a tray.
Cardale straightened, his thoughts shifting momentarily.
There were still many things he wanted to say, but for now,
he thought she needed something to eat.
He glanced at her thin wrist, exposed beneath the sleeve of
her nightgown. Her body, already frail, had become even
thinner.
“Eat first,” he said. Then, as she hesitated, he added, “Focus
only on resting and recovering for now.”
She looked momentarily confused, then her expression
cleared, and she nodded.
“Yes, so I can serve Your Grace well… I’ll recover quickly.”
For a moment, Cardale was speechless, taken aback by her
automatic assumption that her recovery was only to serve
him.
He wanted to tell her it wasn’t like that, that this wasn’t his
intention. But he kept silent, realizing that her mindset was
entirely his doing.
The table was set beside her bed, and the dishes were
arranged before her. The meal looked unsatisfactory to
Cardale, but with her severe morning sickness, options were
limited. Rather than criticize, he motioned for Linda to step
back.
“I’ll handle this,” he said, taking a seat beside her. Elise’s
surprise was evident.
“But I can eat on my own…”
“I know.”
He stirred the steaming soup until it cooled slightly. 
“I’ll just help you get used to it.”
Once it had reached a comfortable temperature, Cardale
lifted a spoonful to her lips. But as it neared her mouth, Elise
suddenly gagged, bending over.
“Elise!” Cardale cried out, alarmed.
In her distress, the spoon clattered to the floor, and the
soup splattered everywhere. Elise, pale with worry, looked
at the mess on the floor with dread.
Cardale quickly supported her, directing his ire toward the
oversight.
“Shouldn’t her morning sickness be more carefully
considered by now?”
“I apologize, Your Grace,” Linda said. “She was able to
handle it until yesterday…”
But Elise’s eyes were fixed on the floor, staring at the spilled
soup with a blank expression.
Then, as the maids rushed to clean the mess, Elise suddenly
dropped to the floor.
Before anyone could react, she leaned down, her tongue
outstretched, as though to lick the floor clean.
“Elise!” Cardale cried, pulling her back to him. 
“What are you doing?”
“I… I dirtied it, so I should clean it…”
“What?”
He froze, feeling as though he’d been struck. His gaze
drifted to the pale soup splattered on the floor, memories
rushing back.
‘I ordered her to kneel, berated her like a slave for her
deception, branding her with fear.’
“Did I permit you to spit it out?”
“I’m sorry. Next time, I’ll swallow everything…”
“You dirtied it, so you must clean it, right?”
“Your Grace…”
“Lick it up, every drop.”
Under the guise of punishment, he had cornered a
vulnerable woman with no options, no support.
Her face from that day flashed vividly in his mind.
“I’m sorry. I’ll clean it all up now…” she murmured, trying to
pull away to face the floor again. But Cardale held her
tightly, shielding her face against his chest so she couldn’t
see the mess.
“Elise…” 
His expression twisted with a pain he couldn’t describe.
When had it started? At what point?
Blinded by anger, he had forgotten that the delicate
creature he held was already wounded and suffering.
The once beautiful white doe that had captivated him was
now bloodied, her pure white fur stained.
‘What have I done to you?’
A sudden, piercing clarity hit him. The person who had
reduced her to such a pitiful state, who had dragged her
down to the lowest point, stripping her of any remaining
pride or dignity… was him.
“It’s my fault, Your Grace… I was wrong,” she whimpered,
trapped in his embrace. An intense surge of heat rose within
him, his fist clenching as he fought back his emotions. But
he reined in the churning turmoil, not wanting to frighten
her further.
Instead, he gently whispered over and over, “It’s not your
fault. It’s okay. You don’t have to do this anymore.”
Yet she continued trembling, unable to calm herself. Cardale
changed the subject, hoping to redirect her thoughts.
“After you finish eating, there’s somewhere I’d like to take
you.”
He wanted to show her the nursery he had prepared for
their child, hoping it might ease the fears that had plagued
her.
The meal took longer than expected.
Elise struggled with each bite, but Cardale, determined to
see her nourished, waited patiently. Once she finished, he
lifted her fragile form into his arms, feeling the
weightlessness of her body.
Carrying her, he made his way to her bedroom. As she
looked around the familiar space, she cast him a puzzled
look.
“I had a door installed,” he explained.
In the inner wall, an arched opening led to another room,
separated by a white curtain. Pulling it aside, Cardale
guided her inside.
‘Oh…’
Elise’s eyes widened, her lips parting in surprise.
“It’s the nursery.”
He didn’t need to explain further. The room, with its small
bed, hanging mobile, soft fabrics, and gentle decor, was
clearly meant for a child.
“I didn’t know if it would be a boy or a girl, so I prepared for
both.”
Gently, he placed her on the couch, and on the low table in
front of her lay a small set of baby clothes.
Elise’s trembling hands reached out, softly grazing the tiny,
neatly folded garments.

Elise’s fingers grazed the fabric of the small garments as if
even touching them felt too delicate a task. 
Cardale watched her trace the collar of the swaddling
clothes, her eyes already welling with tears. He regretted
not telling her sooner—showing her this space, the nursery
prepared for their child. It might have given her hope, might
have stopped her from making the desperate decision to
give up on life. Even the faintest hope to protect her child
could have held her together.
But it was he who had severed that final, fragile thread,
plunging her into despair.
Now, he intended to give back what he had taken, starting
with acknowledging the child as his own blood.
Lowering himself to meet her gaze, he said, “You don’t have
to worry about the child’s status. I’ll see to it myself.”
It was a promise that their child would bear the title of
Vassenberg.
No one knew better than he did that Elise had no one else to
turn to, no one else who could protect her or her child. If
necessary, he was even prepared to pass down one of his
titles to the child she would bear.
But instead of the joy he expected, Elise’s face was marked
with guilt and sorrow. 
“I almost… I almost killed our child.” 
She whispered through a voice thick with anguish. 
“I was so foolish, so ignorant of your intentions…”
She was blaming herself again, as she always did,
internalizing every fault.
Cardale gently took her small hand in his own, his voice soft,
“Elise, that wasn’t—”
But before he could say it wasn’t her fault, her lips moved in
a hushed whisper, “I should’ve been the only one to die…”
The words lodged in his throat, choking him with the weight
of stones. Why was she still thinking like this? Why did
thoughts of death continue to haunt her?
Summoning his voice, he carefully restrained any hint of
reproach. 
“You need to be healthy, for the child’s sake.”
“But…” Elise looked at him with tearful eyes. “I’m just… a
slave, a burden to my child.” Her words tumbled out in
fragments, her fears surfacing with desperation.
She clutched his hand, pleading, “After I have the baby, I’ll
leave. I won’t bother you anymore. If you order me to, I’ll
end my life…”
“Elise!” Cardale couldn’t contain himself any longer, his
voice sharp. Elise flinched violently, trembling like a bird
caught in a trap.
“I… I’m sorry. Please don’t be angry,” she whispered, her
eyes wide with a mixture of terror and sorrow, pleading for
her child’s mercy in her stead.
Looking into her fear-filled blue eyes, Cardale realized the
depth of her self-loathing and terror was far greater than he
had imagined, ingrained to the point of no return.
She was like a wounded deer, paralyzed and barely
breathing, counting down the days until her life ended. But
he couldn’t bear to lose her. He needed her—not as a trophy
or as hunted prey, but as the complete, unbroken Elise
Schuvan.
For the first time, he questioned the choices he had made
up to now.
“You are not a slave,” he said, revealing truths he had
concealed, shackling her to him under false pretenses.
He told her that only Fritz had been punished, not her entire
family. Her mother’s funeral had been staged, and she was
in good health. Finally, he shared that her brother Damien
was alive, grown, and now heir to the Schuvan estate.
When he finished, Elise stared at him, stunned, her tearstreaked eyes blinking slowly as if unable to believe what
she’d just heard.
“Is it… true?” she finally whispered.
Cardale nodded, “It’s true.”
He waited patiently, thinking that this news might require
some time for her to process, perhaps even shocking her
into disbelief. But he was certain this revelation would
ultimately bring her joy. She was finally granted everything
she had wished for, and he had no doubt that her desire to
live would return, that she would eventually recover her
strength. He believed she would mend with time.
He was that arrogant.
“Thank you… thank you,” Elise murmured at last, as tears
trailed down her cheeks, dripping from her chin.
He thought those tears were from relief and gratitude.
But he would soon realize, with bitter clarity, just how
mistaken he had been.

Three days later, Cardale noticed Elise’s strange behavior.
Though she could have returned to her own quarters, she
was still living in his room. He didn’t fully understand why
he felt unsettled by the thought of her returning to her
room, but he rationalized it by telling himself she needed
care.
He found peace in watching over her as she slept,
sometimes even lying beside her, drawing her small body
close to him, a comforting presence in his arms.
That night, Cardale returned from bathing, moving
soundlessly to avoid waking her. But Elise was already
awake, sitting up and fiddling anxiously with something in
her hands.
“Elise,” he called softly.
She flinched as if startled by the most terrifying sound in the
world, dropping what she had been holding.
He watched as it rolled across the floor toward him.
Reflexively, she reached out, whispering, “No… please…”
Cardale bent down to pick it up, examining it with narrowed
eyes.
It was a shard—a piece of something broken.
He quickly put the pieces together, recalling the broken
vase he’d been informed about earlier.
“The vase,” he muttered, though confusion nagged at him.
The maids would have cleaned up any fragments. How had
Elise managed to get one?
Looking at the shard again, he noticed something odd: one
side had been filed down to a sharp point. If she had
intended to aim this at a vital point…
Cardale’s gaze shifted to Elise, who was watching him with
wide, fearful eyes.
“Elise—”
“I-I was only looking at it!” she stammered, her voice
trembling. “I wasn’t going to do anything bad, please
believe me.”
Bad… he understood all too well what she meant.
And with that, he realized the vase hadn’t been broken by
accident. Elise, who had never damaged anything, had done
it on purpose.
How had he missed it? All along, she had been signaling her
despair.
“I believe you,” he said, closing the distance between them
and gently stroking her cheek as though to calm a
frightened animal.
“But you shouldn’t keep things like this. It’s too dangerous.”
“Yes… I won’t. I promise,” she whispered, nodding
repeatedly.
Cardale acted as though nothing was amiss.

The very next morning, Elise broke another vase.
This time, Cardale saw it happen.
He watched her glance around to ensure no one was looking
before subtly nudging the vase over the edge of the table.
As it shattered on the floor, she discreetly hid a large shard
amidst the commotion.

Elise clenched the shard in her palm, trying desperately to
keep it hidden, her face a mixture of guilt and anxiety. Her
uneasy expression caught Linda’s attention, who was
overseeing the cleanup.
“Are you all right, Miss?” 
Linda asked once more.
“I’m… I’m fine.”
“Still, you might have cut yourself…” 
“No, really, I’m not hurt anywhere.”
But as Elise’s knuckles tightened with tension around the
shard, Cardale’s composed expression finally faltered, his
face contorting slightly. If she kept gripping it that way, her
delicate skin was bound to be hurt—she bruised and cut so
easily.
With a touch of irritation, he ordered, “Everyone, leave us.”
“Yes, my lord.”
Once they were alone, Elise’s worry only grew. She clutched
her skirt with her free hand, repeating the motion nervously,
as if terrified he might discover what she was hiding.
He could have taken the shard from her immediately. But
Cardale didn’t want to see her cry and plead in fear again—
or rather, he was afraid himself. Afraid that if Elise realized
he knew everything, she might entirely lose hope and cast
herself away, might even hurt herself in desperation.
So instead, he masked his concern and gave her a
moment’s escape.
“Wash your hands,” he said, gesturing toward the bathroom.
“Oh, y-yes… of course.”
Clearly relieved, Elise nodded and hurried off.
Cardale pretended to turn on the water and leaned against
the doorframe, watching Elise as she scurried over to her
dresser. She quickly stashed the shard in the deepest
corner, glancing back toward the bathroom as she closed
the drawer with a shaky hand.
After giving her time to settle, Cardale re-entered the room,
taking out a first aid kit as if nothing had happened.
“M-My lord…” Elise whispered, startled.
Without a word, he guided her to sit down, taking her hand
and turning it over. It wasn’t serious, but her hand bore
several small scrapes and scratches.
“Did you… fall?” 
Cardale offered her an excuse, watching her expression.
Her lips parted in surprise before she nodded quickly. 
“Yes. I… I slipped.”
She couldn’t have hurt herself simply by slipping on the
thick rug covering the floor. But instead of pressing the
issue, he just carefully cleaned and dressed her wound.
Finally, he looked at her and said, “Would you like to go for a
walk?”
Her eyes widened at the unexpected offer. After hesitating,
she replied, “As you wish…”
Cardale felt a pang, realizing she had taken his question as
a command. He gently added, “I’m asking if you want to
go.”
Elise fidgeted nervously, fingers twisting, and replied softly,
“If it’s what you wish, then… I’d like it too.”
But this wasn’t the response he wanted. He yearned to hear
her true desires—whether she wanted to see the garden or
stay inside. Anything genuine.
He couldn’t press further without risking her retreating even
more. “Then let’s go for a short walk,” he said and called for
Linda to prepare.
Moments later, bundled in warm clothes, Elise left the room
beside Cardale.
“Be careful; the stones may be icy from the frost,” he
warned gently.
“Yes…”
As they walked, Cardale took her hand, interlocking their
fingers as he had done before, remembering how her
cheeks would flush with shy delight.
He hoped the memory might comfort her, even remove
some of her fear. But as he gazed down at her, Cardale felt
his own breath catch.
Gone was any smile or blush. Her face was pale, lips
trembling, her wide eyes darting in fear, her hand barely
resting in his.
For the first time, Cardale faced a truth he could not deny.
Elise was terrified—no longer wanting even his touch, like a
small creature caught in a predator’s claws.
He quickly released her hand. Surprised, Elise glanced up,
and he forced his voice into a calm tone. 
“It seems too cold for a walk. We’ll do this another day.”
When relief flooded her pale face, a sharp pain shot through
his chest. He ignored the ache, telling himself she was still
here, and that would have to be enough.

Later that day, Elise discovered the shard missing.
“W-Where did it go…?” she muttered, searching the drawer
with trembling hands.
After checking the entire room, she sat heavily on the floor,
her mind racing.
“Maybe… maybe Linda found it and threw it away?”
It never crossed her mind that Cardale could have
discovered it. If he had, she doubted he’d allow her any
peace.
“What should I do…? I feel so unsettled…”
She twisted her hands, her nervous habit she couldn’t seem
to stop. Her gaze landed on the vases of flowers by the bed
and window—beautiful, out-of-season blooms that, despite
the cold, filled the room with color.
But her eyes moved past the flowers to the vases below
them.
“Just… one more time…”
Moving as if compelled, she reached for a vase. Her hand
was inches away from knocking it over when a firm voice
stopped her.
“Elise.”
Her body went rigid, her mind blank.
She turned slowly, facing Cardale, who was watching her
with a calm expression.
“I heard you like flowers,” he said softly. “It seems you really
do.”
She took a deep, shaky breath, relief flooding her as she
managed a weak smile. “Y-Yes… I do.”
“I’ll bring them more often,” he added, trying to put her at
ease.
But all Elise could do was murmur, “I’m sorry…”
Cardale looked at her, finally accepting just how deeply her
fear of him ran. He realized now that her strange behavior
was likely rooted in that same fear.
If so, then staying with him might be the very thing that was
poisoning her spirit.
“From tomorrow, you’ll stay in your own room,” he said
quietly. “You can arrange the nursery however you like.”
He hoped the change would bring her some peace. But
instead, fear flashed across her face.
“Is it because… because I’ve grown tiresome?” Elise’s voice
quivered. 
“If that’s it, I can try harder—I can…”
“Elise, no,” he interrupted quickly.
But she began to frantically pull at her collar. “I can… I can
satisfy you… I’ll do whatever you want, just don’t…”
“Elise!”
Understanding what she was trying to do, Cardale grabbed
her hands, stopping her. Yet, she continued to tremble, voice
breaking.
“I’ll keep going until you’re satisfied… Please…”
Cardale stared at her, his mind reeling as he held her
shaking hands.

Once, he dismissed her as just a woman prone to tears,
telling himself it was no big deal.
As long as he could control her, indulge his desires and
pleasure, he thought it didn’t matter.
But it wasn’t like that anymore. It did matter, and he
couldn’t just ignore it.
Every time tears dripped from her blue eyes, his heart
clenched painfully.
His chest felt tight, and his fingertips tingled to the point of
aching.
‘…’
Now, it was him who was being swayed, not her. Her tears
stirred his emotions completely.
He wanted to make her stop. He wanted to keep her from
crying any longer.
Hadn’t she shed enough already? Why did her tear ducts
never seem to dry?
Yet he had no idea how to make her stop.
To a man who had neither comforted nor needed to soothe
anyone before, it was something foreign and incredibly
difficult.
But watching her cry silently, stifling her sobs, was even
more agonizing, so he forced himself to open his tightly
closed throat.
“Don’t cry.”
As he spoke, a wave of nausea rose in him.
Such a command-like remark, offering no real comfort, was
worse than saying nothing at all.
It would’ve been better to keep his mouth shut. With a bitter
sigh, Cardale reached out his arm.
But just as his hand was about to touch Elise’s cheek, he
stopped.
He remembered how she had frozen up the moment he’d
interlocked their fingers just a little while ago.
…She’d be afraid.
The image of her trembling helplessly, too scared to pull
away or resist, was vivid and unerasable in his mind.
In the end, his hand that failed to even brush a single soft
hair of his deer-like girl, was withdrawn.
“Please… don’t abandon me… even if it’s just for the baby.
Please…”
“I won’t abandon you. Not you, nor your child.”
Instead, he softened his tone as much as he could, trying to
reassure the terrified woman.
“It’s just to give you some time to recover. We’ll move your
room for now, so you can regain your strength and go to
meet your mother soon.”
Mother…
Elise, sitting motionless, mouthed the word soundlessly
before slowly nodding.
“Yes…”
However, her face was blank, as if she was in a daze.
It seemed less like she was understanding his words and
more like a doll reacting to a specific cue.
The persuasive eloquence that had once given him control
over the social circles and central politics was useless here.
Just as Cardale, still searching for a way to reassure her, had
a flash of inspiration and spoke.
“Elise.”
He hastily pulled a fine piece of paper from his chest pocket.
Neatly folded in half, it had a single, graceful word written
on it.
“I’ve chosen a name for the baby.”
At that moment, a flicker of life returned to Elise’s dull,
fawn-like eyes.
Noticing this, Cardale carefully unfolded the paper in front of
her.
“The top one is for a girl, and the bottom one is for a boy.”
Her delicate, white fingers touched the letters, her
movements so cautious that they seemed almost heartwrenching.
“Do you like it?”
Waiting for her answer, Cardale felt an unusual sense of
nervousness.
Her gaze lingered on the paper for a long time, her blue
eyes fixed on it as if anchored, before a breath of wonder
escaped her cracked lips.
“It’s so… beautiful…”
Her frail voice trembled as if she’d been given the most
precious gift in the world.
“I thought… I’d never get to name the baby…”
The sorrow of a woman who had likely resolved to leave
with her unborn child, unnamed, struck deep into his heart.
For the first time all day, Elise raised her head and looked
up at Cardale with a desperate expression.
“May… may I keep it…?”
By now, she was clutching the paper tightly to her chest. He
had no reason to refuse.
As he nodded, a faint smile spread over her previously pale
face.
“Thank you… thank you so much…”
Seeing that smile, his heart ached sharply.
He wondered briefly how things might have been if he’d
shared the baby’s name with her sooner, but he chose to
brush the thought aside.

Elise’s bedroom was moved back to the room she originally
used.
The room looked almost the same as before, but one thing
had changed—every breakable item had been removed.
Early in the morning, a man entered the woman’s bedroom,
carrying an armful of flowers he’d gathered from the forest
throughout the night.
The room was quiet. A maid who had been tidying up alone
lowered her head in a bow.
Instead of asking where Elise was, Cardale crossed the
bedroom and headed to the baby’s room.
His guess was spot-on; she was, as expected, in the baby’s
room.
Around her were baby clothes, colorful threads, soft fabrics,
and an embroidery hoop that was spread over the couch
and table.
“My lord, you’re here.”
Linda, who was nearby, noticed him first and greeted him,
prompting Elise to stop what she was doing and lift her
head.
He placed the enormous bouquet carefully on the table in
front of her couch and spoke.
“These flowers caught my eye.”
The freshly-picked blooms from the forest’s purest area
were large and vibrant. Even in spring, when flowers were
plentiful, these vivid colors were hard to find.
The subtle fragrance spread throughout the room.
Elise bowed her head in gratitude but did nothing more; she
neither touched nor even looked at the flowers.
She didn’t even glance at the bouquet, almost as if she were
indifferent.
Didn’t she once love flowers…?
Seeing the flowers he’d taken such care to prepare left
untouched, Cardale felt puzzled.
He distinctly remembered her staring endlessly at the
flowers while she stayed in her bedroom just days ago.
And then he realized.
It wasn’t the flowers she’d been looking at—it was the vase.
She could no longer bring herself to properly see even the
flowers she had once loved so much.
Suppressing a heavy ache in his heart, he changed the
subject.
“Were you embroidering?”
Elise hesitated and then nodded.
“I was… embroidering the baby’s name…”
On her lap was a baby’s shirt, with the name nearly
completed at the hem.
The neat letters showed how much care she’d put into it.
Cardale offered genuine praise.
“You have a remarkable talent.”
“M-me…?”
“Who else would have done it?”
His attempt at humor caught her off guard, and Elise looked
bewildered.
Glancing back and forth between her own embroidery and
his face, she nearly pricked her other thumb with the
needle.
“Ah…”
Fortunately, Cardale noticed just in time, grasping her wrist
and preventing her finger from getting pricked.
“Careful. It hurts quite a bit if you get pricked.”
Sensing her body trembling faintly again, he released her
wrist and stood up.
He knew that as long as he was close, nervous Elise
wouldn’t be able to relax.
His steps felt heavier as he left her room.

The awaited message arrived at the duke’s residence.
“Your Grace, Damian Schuvan’s plan was successful.”
This was a matter the Duke had been watching for quite
some time. Michael wasted no time in delivering the core
details.
“Gerhard Schuvan barely survived but was left paralyzed.”
The duke leaned back in his chair, narrowing his eyes.
“In that case, it’s more beneficial to let him live.”
“Yes, he was quite lucky.”
Even though Gerhard had named Damian as his successor,
Damian was born with an inherent flaw.
The side branches of the family wouldn’t let a child born out
of wedlock inherit the family name so easily.
This was a prime opportunity for them to take over the
count’s estate.
At least until the Emperor authorized the title succession, it
was better for Gerhard Schuvan to stay alive.
It was a favorable picture, after all: a legitimate son, albeit
acknowledged after birth, taking over the family from his
gravely injured father.
“Secretly approach the Emperor and offer him a deal. He’ll
need significant funds if he wants his only remaining son to
rise to the throne.”
Rumors had spread quietly among some high-ranking
nobles that the crown prince was implicated in the recent
scandal involving the kingdom of Helmut.
The only way to suppress such rumors and silence the
nobles was a hefty sum of gold.
And few in the empire could afford that amount.
“Make sure to secure a public declaration that the Emperor
will guarantee the title for the next Count Schuvan.”
“Yes, Your Grace.”
Michael looked at his master with reverent eyes.
Everything was progressing exactly as the Duke had
predicted.
“Your Grace, and…”
Except for one small detail.
“Damian Schwan is adamantly demanding the return of his
mother and sister.”
Having seized control of the count’s estate, Demian was
firmly expressing his intent to bring his only family members
back into the household.
Michael had expected the Duke to respond with strong
disapproval and promptly dismiss Demian’s demand, as he
always had before.
However, there was no immediate reply. Michael stole a
glance at his master’s face.
The man, half-lidded eyes downcast, seemed lost in thought
before he finally spoke in a low, somewhat hoarse voice.
“…Tell him I’ll consider it.”

“What?”
Michael, who had instinctively responded, quickly realized
his mistake and lowered his head hastily.
“Apologies, Your Grace. I’ll deliver your message exactly as
you instructed.”
Was he merely buying time?
Given the extent of his failures, one might expect Damian
Schuvan to give up, but he was relentless.
If he formally assumed the title of Count, ignoring his
demands would indeed be difficult.
Still, Michael could hardly believe that his master would
truly send Elise Schuvan back.
The Duke had always grown easily bored. From the
beginning, few things interested him.
Yet Elise Schuvan was the one exception.
To prove this, the Duke had kept her confined to his domain
with an obsession that was almost obsessive.
Even after two escape attempts, instead of abandoning her,
he had held her tighter within a fortress-like confinement.
Whether he treated her harshly as he once had, or like
delicate glass now, the Duke’s possessive nature toward her
was unchanging.
So, he would surely find a way to keep his mistress by his
side.
By any means necessary.
“What happened to the painter I sent to the villa?”
Lost in thought, Michael snapped back to attention at
Cardale’s question, thankful he could answer without
hesitation.
“They say the portrait of Lady Elise’s mother will be finished
in a day or two.”
“Bring him back to the Duke’s estate as soon as it’s done.”
“Yes, sir.”
Michael got the sense that his master had lately been more
attentive to the progress of the portrait meant for the
pendant, though he didn’t think much of it.
‘He’s never been one to tolerate delays.’
The slight impatience he sensed was probably just his
imagination.
Words like impatience or anxiety didn’t suit this man at all.
Even on the battlefield, where lives were at stake, the Duke
was always composed.
His calm, almost bored demeanor, even amidst life-anddeath crises, was intimidating even to his allies.
However…
Though he hadn’t intended to pry, Michael was aware of the
recent series of events in the manor, given his position.
Even without Linda or Norman saying a word, he had a
rough idea of what had transpired between the Duke and
Elise Schuvan.
The woman who had headed to the forest despite countless
other options, the man who had returned with her in his
arms, disheveled and in a state he’d never seen before, and
the pendant, thrown into the fire and destroyed…
The clues were more than enough to piece the situation
together.
‘If the Lady was willing to risk her life… then she must have
something to hold onto.’
The Duke’s drastically changed behavior toward her likely
wasn’t unrelated.
In that sense, Elise Schuvan was truly unique.
She was the only one to have shaken a man born with
everything, a man who looked upon the world with haughty
indifference.
But even Michael couldn’t guarantee how long this
relationship would last.
Like a glass shard perched on the edge of a table, their
connection seemed precarious.
‘But if Damian Schuvan becomes Count, her position will be
secure…’
Most importantly, she was carrying his child—an undeniable
heir to the Duke of Basenberg.
‘If His Grace desires, perhaps he may even marry her…’
Lost in thought, Michael nodded to himself.
“Michael Walter.”
A cold voice intruded into his musings, snapping him to
attention.
Lifting his head, he met Cardale’s piercing gaze.
A dry swallow slid down his throat in tension.
“What has you so deep in thought?”
“My apologies, Your Grace.”
“Focus.”
“Yes, sir.”
Michael swiftly moved on to the next report.
But even as he spoke, his mind continued to wander to the
thoughts he’d just entertained.
‘If Lady Elise were to become the Duchess…’

“How is the lady?”
The worry in Norman’s lowered voice was unmistakable.
“Just look…”
The head maid cast a troubled glance toward the nursery.
Inside, Elise was deeply absorbed in her embroidery.
“She hasn’t budged from that spot for hours, clinging to the
baby’s clothes,” Linda said, sighing softly.
“She hardly ever leaves the nursery. I have to insist she
returns to her bed, or else she tries to sleep on the floor.”
“And her appetite? I heard His Grace asked for special
attention to be paid to it.”
“Thankfully, her appetite has improved,” Linda said, her
face lighting up a bit.
Since hearing that proper nutrition was essential for the
baby’s health, Elise had made a conscious effort to eat her
meals regularly.
As a result, at least Linda could breathe a bit easier
regarding her eating habits.
“She’s still very selective about what she can eat, though. I
hope her nausea eases soon…”
The helpless frustration in Linda’s fading words was evident.
The elderly butler, Norman, glanced toward Elise.
Focused so intently, she hadn’t even noticed the visitors
while engrossed in her embroidery.
Norman watched her quietly for a moment before
murmuring, as if to himself.
“There are things that only time can heal.”
Some things simply couldn’t be resolved through human
effort.
He turned back to Linda, meeting her gaze.
“For now, all we can do is watch over her from a distance—
not too far, but not too close.”
“But…”
“Don’t forget.”
Linda looked at him with an expression of mild reproach, but
Norman remained firm.
“In the end, only His Grace can untangle this knot.”

It was deep in the night.
Cardale rose after finally finishing his last document.
It was well past midnight, and Michael had already retired.
His steps naturally led him toward the window, to the spot
with the clearest view of Elise’s bedroom.
The day had been gloomy with thick clouds, and now even
the moon was obscured, casting a blanket of darkness over
everything. Still, he found her window instantly.
Naturally, the lights were off.
Although the curtains were drawn tightly, hiding anything
within, he imagined her asleep inside.
Elise had no restless habits. Once she laid down neatly, she
stayed that way until morning.
On the rare occasions he’d watched her sleep. Her soft,
barely-there breathing had been surprisingly soothing to
him.
Her long, silver lashes, gleaming faintly in the moonlight,
were beautiful.
Perhaps he should go see her, just for a moment.
He didn’t want to disturb her during the day, knowing how
frightened she was of him.
Because of this, even the painter visiting each day to work
on her portrait stirred a pang of irritation.
The thought of a stranger gazing upon her every day grated
on him.
The man who’d hired the artist, intending to restore her
cherished pendant, was himself caught in the turmoil of
possessive jealousy and a desire to gift her something
precious.
Yet, watching her sleep each night eased the tightly wound
tension within him.
So his nightly visits had become natural…
A sudden rushing sound snapped him out of his thoughts,
and he flung open the window.
As soon as he saw the rain pouring down, he cursed under
his breath.
“Damn it.”
Without a second thought, he bolted out of the study.
‘…She’ll be fine.’
He’d had her bedroom windows specially replaced to keep
out the rain, knowing how frightened she was of storms.
Linda would have drawn the curtains tightly, so she wouldn’t
see or hear the rain.
And by now, she would be fast asleep, he told himself,
willing away the anxiety.
But for some reason, unease gnawed at him. His heart was
pounding erratically. His steps quickened as he walked,
becoming a near-run as he approached her room.
The guard posted at the door bowed as the Duke arrived, as
he did every night, but Cardale ignored him and went
straight to the door.
The heavy door opened soundlessly. His red eyes scanned
the darkness of the room. And then—
Thump. His heart plummeted like a stone.
The bed was empty.
A dreadful thought flashed through his mind, chilling his
blood. He fought desperately to shake off the encroaching
fear.
No.
Elise wouldn’t have run.
She had promised him she would never do anything reckless
again.
As he forced himself to calm his racing mind, a small sound
broke the silence.
A quiet sob.
His head snapped toward the source.
It was coming from the nursery.

Cardale moved immediately to the nursery, his footsteps
absorbed by the rug beneath.
The maid’s cautious words echoed in his mind:
‘Forgive me for speaking out of turn, but… it seems the lady
is tormented by guilt over nearly ending the baby’s life.’
Elise had not forgiven herself for her misguided decision to
erase the baby’s future, and it was as though she was
festering from the inside, consumed by guilt.

It’ll be alright. Nothing will happen.
For a fleeting moment, he struggled to suppress the dark
thoughts threatening to surface.
‘Elise.’
His hand was hurried as he pulled aside the screen dividing
the rooms, his crimson gaze sweeping the dim room, quickly
locating her.
“…I’m sorry, baby.”
Cardale exhaled deeply, a mix of relief and pain.
Elise was curled up in the farthest corner of the room,
wedged where two walls met.
“I know I’m supposed to protect you, I know that…”
Her voice was soft, almost as faint as a whisper, with bits of
sobbing mixed in, but thankfully, no real harm seemed to
have been done.
It appeared she hadn’t yet realized it was raining outside.
‘Still awake at this hour.’
The fireplace had long since gone cold. The sight of her
sitting alone in her nightgown in the chilly room pained him,
though he wasn’t truly upset with her.
The moment he finally felt his heart ease, he took a step
toward her to comfort her.
“The Duke is so terrifying…”
‘…!’
Cardale froze.

Since moving back to her bedroom, Elise found herself
gripped by unease. In truth, every moment was filled with
surges of fear.
Whenever she drifted off due to the fatigue of her growing
body and awoke in the middle of the night, the fear would
intensify.
It was mostly fear of her master.
Elise thought she was strange for feeling this way.
Ever since she’d jumped from the cliff, he had changed, as if
by magic.
His gaze had softened, his voice gentler. Even when he held
her hand or embraced her, he was surprisingly tender.
Just like a certain summer day from her memories—the day
they’d gone out together and she’d tasted wild strawberries
for the first time.
But oddly, the fear never disappeared.
“The Duke is so terrifying…”
If anything, the pain only grew harder to bear.
“Every time he looks at me, every time he speaks to me… it
feels like a sharp blade is piercing my heart…”
It hurt so deeply, an agony she could barely withstand, and
her body would tremble no matter how hard she tried to
hide it.
Yet there was a fear that surpassed even this.
Her face twisted with sorrow as she placed a hand over her
belly.
“I’m afraid he’ll look at you with cold, merciless eyes, that
he’ll say cruel and painful things to you…”
You’ve done nothing wrong, yet I’m afraid you’ll be hated
simply because you’re born from me.
Tears fell down her bowed head. She shouldn’t cry. If she
kept crying, the baby would feel sad too.
Elise hastily wiped her tears with the back of her hand,
sniffing.
“I’m sorry. I’ve only said sad things and made you worry.”
She was a pitiful mother, confessing her sorrows when she’d
done nothing for the baby, even burdening it with an
unforgivable sin.
She should’ve been telling the baby happy stories,
especially when she didn’t know how much longer they had
together.
Rummaging through her foggy mind, one good memory
surfaced.
How could she have forgotten such an important thing?
She hurriedly reached into her clothes and pulled out the
folded piece of paper.
The room was too dark to see the letters, but she had
looked at them so many times that she knew the shape of
the letters by heart.
“Actually, the Duke gave you a name.”
“It’s so beautiful, isn’t it?” Elise’s eyes shone with tears as
she smiled.
‘How happy I’d be to meet you this coming spring, to call
you by this beautiful name…’
The fleeting, sorrowful smile vanished as quickly as it had
come.
She knew her baby’s fate depended on her. She needed to
ensure her master didn’t lose interest in her or grow weary
and abandon her.
But it was difficult.
Every time she gathered her courage, her mind was filled
with terrifying images of his cold, merciless face, his icy
voice stirring up turmoil within her.
What had his face looked like when he saw her trembling?
His gaze darkening, his expression sinking, his mouth set in
a firm line…
It was probably why she’d been moved back to her old room
—because he no longer wanted her in his bed, because he
no longer wanted to hold her.
A chill crept through her, biting deep into her bones.
“It’s useless…”
The hope she had briefly felt from the baby’s name
crumbled once again. She tried to hold back the despair, but
it kept rising, threatening to drown her.
“In the end… the Duke will change too…”
She had heard that even her father, who had never felt like
it once before, had been kind the night he held her mother.
His kindness was probably no different—a momentary
warmth for a woman who warmed his bed, or perhaps just
common whimsy.
A familiar ache bloomed in her empty chest.
Elise clutched her chest, her hands blindly feeling around
the dark floor.
She had found a solution for moments like this, and it had
already proven effective a few times.
Her fingers soon brushed against a basket, tipping its
contents with a clatter. Ignoring the mess, she searched for
the embroidery hoop and pulled out the needle embedded
in the center.
She felt an odd sense of relief as she positioned it just
above her exposed instep under her skirt.
Without hesitation, she raised the needle high, ready to
plunge it downward.
“Elise!”
In an instant, a sharp cry echoed, and Cardale moved
reflexively, grabbing her wrist just above her ankle.
“You…”
Cardale was at a loss for words as he stared at her exposed
foot.
The skin near her toes was covered with puncture marks,
some festering and oozing, hidden cleverly in a spot that
her indoor shoes would cover completely.
She must have chosen this area on purpose to avoid
detection.
“To this extent…”
He had known nothing. While he’d left her alone under the
pretense of respecting her, her wounded heart and body
had continued to fester.
“Ma-master… when did you…”
Watching her shrink back in terror after self-harming so
brazenly, he felt a surge of revulsion toward himself.
Anger surged within him, making him want to throttle
himself for having broken this once-beautiful deer.
“Did… did you hear…”
“You promised!”
But his fury found a misplaced outlet.
“You said with your own lips that you wouldn’t do anything
bad. So why are you doing this again? Why?”
“I… I just…”
Her pale blue eyes wavered with fear, and the hand he held
twitched, as though to continue what she had started.
Cardale forced her fingers open, taking the needle from her
and flinging it far away.
“I told you to stop! If you’re going to do that to yourself,
you’d be better off stabbing me!”
At his fierce shout, Elise flinched, her frail body beginning to
shake violently.
Realizing he’d lost control, Cardale ran a rough hand over
his face.
Damn fool. How long had it been since he swore he wouldn’t
frighten her? The curse rose involuntarily to his lips.
“I’m not angry at you; I just—”
But his words trailed off.
The light had left her blue eyes, as if her soul had
withdrawn, as though the life within her had been snuffed
out.
“Why…”
Elise’s vacant murmur echoed like the words of someone
who had lost her mind.
“Why am I… the only one who has to keep promises?”
The despair in her voice struck him hard, and Cardale barely
managed to say her name.
“Why! Why am I the only one who has to?”
Elise screamed, losing all control.
“The Duke lies without a second thought, carries on as if it’s
nothing, and yet… why am I the only one who has to keep
promises?”
Her blue eyes welled with tears, which spilled over, tracing
down her pale cheeks.
“You promised you wouldn’t abandon me, that you’d let me
stay by your side… that you’d reward me… by letting me
see my mother…”
Her brief outburst subsided quickly, leaving only the
sorrowful, plaintive cries of a doe, desperately protecting
her unborn fawn.
“You even asked… if I wanted… to have the baby… if I
wanted to keep it…”
His heart, which had ached from the moment he’d heard her
whispers, twisted painfully at the sight of her scarred foot,
and now it felt as if it was being torn apart.
Elise.
There was nothing he could do to change the past or to heal
her wounded heart. He couldn’t promise her a future either.
All of it was a foolish delusion, born of his own arrogance.
“Master…”
With her face covered in tears, Elise, now weeping openly,
began to beg.
“I ask for nothing else. Just… please… save my baby.”
Cardale’s face turned pale as he closed his eyes tightly,
facing the cruel reality.
Elise no longer believed in him.
Nor in any of his promises.

The icy rain signaling the onset of winter continued into the
following day, only clearing by the third afternoon.
“Allow me to help with that.”
As Linda adjusted the hastily wrapped bandage on Elise’s
foot, Elise couldn’t bring herself to lift her head, overcome
with guilt.
“I’m… I’m sorry, Linda.”
“It’s nothing, miss. I was worried, but it’s a relief to see your
wounds starting to heal. You must continue to apply the
medicine regularly. And….”
For your sake, please refrain from doing this again.
However, instead of voicing this plea, Linda shifted the
topic.
“Would you like to try on the new winter shoes?”
“New… shoes?”
Linda nodded with a smile, and a maid brought over a box
adorned with a ribbon.
“These were specially ordered by His Grace, and they
arrived just in time.”
The maid’s words hinted at the urgency with which they
were made, though Elise didn’t notice, focused instead on
the one who had gifted them.
‘The Duke… gave me these?’
Hesitating to open the box, Linda urged her gently.
“Go on, open it.”
At last, Elise pulled at the ribbon and carefully lifted the lid.
“What do you think?”
Inside was a pair of winter shoes with a white satin body
lined with fur. The sides were embroidered with silver
thread, and a satin bow adorned the toe, with a clear
gemstone in the center that sparkled in the light.
Though the colors were different, the elegant and graceful
design reminded her of him—and his shoes—as if they were
a reflection of his dignified appearance, one she felt she
could never match.
“Let me help you try them on.”
“Oh, no!”
Elise shook her head in a rush.
“Do you not like them?”
“It’s… it’s not that… It’s just… I don’t think they suit me…”
Her voice grew quieter as she spoke.
Linda reassured her, as though she had expected this
reaction.
“I think they’ll suit you perfectly. Just try them on once. If
you don’t like them, you can always take them off.”
Yielding to Linda’s encouragement, Elise nodded, and Linda
eagerly helped her into the shoes.
Linda went on to fuss over her, declaring how well they
suited her. She even dressed her in a new outfit, draping a
cloak over her shoulders and adding gloves, so Elise was
outfitted to go outside immediately.
“My lady.”
After helping her get ready, Linda knelt before Elise, holding
her gloved hands gently.
“Take good care of yourself. Don’t miss your meals, sleep
well, and always think of happy things.”
“Linda…?”
Elise looked at her in confusion, unsure of what to make of
Linda’s sudden solemnity.
Looking back, the atmosphere in the mansion had been
unusual since that morning. There was a bustle and a sense
of urgency in the air.
Could it be related to her?
Just as her heart began to flutter uneasily, there was a
knock at the door.
“Elise, it’s Norman.”
When the gray-haired butler entered, Linda quickly
interjected.
“We haven’t explained things to the lady yet. Please give us
a moment.”
“Of course. Take your time; there’s no rush.”
Elise’s gaze shifted anxiously between the two,
apprehensive as they conversed.
What could this be about? Why did Linda and Butler Norman
look so grave?
“Please don’t misunderstand and listen to me carefully.”
Fear gnawed at her, a dread she couldn’t ignore. Her chest
tightened painfully as Linda spoke in a kind voice, delivering
the news.
“You’ll be going to see your family, my lady.”
The color drained from Elise’s face in an instant.
Norman, standing beside Linda, added, “We apologize for
ignoring your longing for them. We feared that bringing it up
would only deepen your sorrow.”
Elise’s lips trembled, her face ashen.
Going to see her family? Her mother had passed away
recently.
The only family she had left was her unborn child, and even
that might not be hers for long.
“They’re waiting for you at the Schuvan estate,” Linda said
with a gentle smile, but Elise’s heart plummeted.
The Schuvan family had fallen. Fritz had likely been
executed for treason, and her father, the head of the family,
would not escape accountability.
A horrific conclusion surfaced in her mind.
He was abandoning her, along with their child.
With a voice barely audible, Elise forced herself to ask.
“Did… did the Duke order you to send me away?”
“Heavens, no!” Linda hastily reassured her, and Norman
added, “The Duke has arranged this so you may spend time
with your family.”
Elise lowered her head, tears welling in her eyes. She
couldn’t believe it. The situation was far too bleak for any
hope.
‘I have nowhere to go.’
Her blue eyes shimmered with tears, like those of an animal
being led to slaughter.
Perhaps it was because she had disgraced herself a few
days ago…
She had marred her body, which belonged to her master,
with scars in secret. It wasn’t intentional.
But she couldn’t control it, no matter how hard she tried.
Fear would surge, filling her mind with sorrow and agony.
Without an outlet, the only way to endure was to harm
herself.
Though the pain was sharp, it quelled the feeling of
impending death that engulfed her.
Yet, the Duke had discovered her broken promise, and in her
shock and shame she lashed out at him.
How loathsome she must have seemed to him now—an
irksome woman he could hardly bear to look at. Discarding
her was only natural.
‘I hate myself, too…’
Elise had anticipated this outcome in the days that followed,
foolishly bracing herself for the inevitable. But now that it
was here, the fear overwhelmed her.
Clutching at a final sliver of hope, Elise looked at Linda and
Norman.
“Could… could I see the Duke…?”
Seeing the discomfort on their faces, she lost her courage.
“I’m sorry, my lady. The Duke is away on urgent business.”
“I’ll see to it that you’re safely escorted there. Please don’t
worry too much.”
Their words offered no solace, but Elise rose unsteadily,
knowing it was futile to resist.
She fished a letter out from her pocket—a letter she’d
prepared, hoping it would never be needed.
“Please… give this to him.”
Norman nodded as he took the letter.
“I’ll make sure he receives it.”
“And… please…”
She blinked away the tears that threatened to fall.
“Please… don’t let him forget our child…”
Her throat tightened, and she couldn’t speak further.
Forcing a final smile, she bowed to Norman, who returned
the gesture with a respectful bow.
“We await the day we see you again at the Duke’s
residence.”
He was certain that she would return in a different status,
no longer the Duke’s mistress, yet he kept this thought to
himself, offering her his blessing instead.
“May happiness fill the path ahead of you, my lady.”

Elise staggered as she walked outside, leaning on Linda’s
arm as she climbed into the carriage. Her frail figure
seemed precarious.
Cardale watched her silently, his gaze filled with a tumult of
emotions.
Michael, who had stayed by his side, finally spoke
cautiously.
“Your Grace, are you certain you won’t see her off?”

There was no answer, yet Michael noticed the clenched jaw,
the tension in his master’s fists.
“Your Grace.”
“Go and ensure her safe passage. She must reach the
Schuvan estate without incident.”
Cardale’s gaze remained fixed in one direction, not even
glancing at his subordinate as he gave the order.
“…I’ll report back upon my return.”
Once Michael left, the calm mask Cardale had worn cracked
slightly.
She doesn’t want to see me.
Her whispered words to her unborn child lingered in his
mind like a brand, burning deep within.
“The Duke is so terrifying…”
“Every time he looks at me, every time he speaks to me… it
feels like a blade piercing my heart…”
…So he hadn’t gone to see her off.
He didn’t want to instill fear in her at this final moment.
Though she would likely still feel afraid, he selfishly wished
that the reason wasn’t him.
The carriage carrying Elise departed soon after.
Cardale’s gaze followed the carriage, unblinking, until it
grew smaller and smaller, disappearing from sight entirely.

The butler arrived shortly after seeing off the departing
carriage.
“Your Grace.”
Cardale slowly turned from the window, his usual indifferent
expression firmly in place.
“The carriage has just left for the Schuvan estate,” Norman
reported.
He explained that Linda had boarded the carriage with the
young lady, and that Sir Walter and the guards were
accompanying them to the Schuvan estate.
But Cardale wasn’t interested in this information.
“Did she seem frightened?”
“Well, given the sudden news… she seemed taken aback
and perhaps misunderstood.”
So, he’d made her cry on her departure as well.
Cardale smiled bitterly.
For once, he had wished he was wrong. She was, after all,
on her way to see the family she’d longed for so deeply. He
had selfishly hoped she might feel a bit of joy.
But Elise had not trusted her freedom even up until the
moment she crossed beyond his walls.
Because he had stripped everything from her, confined and
conditioned her, giving her no choice but to surrender. And
in the end, he had shattered the last bit of hope she’d clung
to.
What must she have felt, believing she was abandoned, as
she climbed into that carriage?
He could still picture her unsteady steps, her head bowed,
not even allowing him a final glimpse of her face.
“My lady… wanted to see you before she left, Your Grace.”
He’d expected that, too. That was why he hadn’t gone to
see her. He knew she’d only end up pleading tearfully,
kneeling and clasping her hands together in desperation.
After all, she must have believed that was the only way to
maintain his interest.
‘Because it was entertaining.’
‘Watching her cling to me desperately, fearing she’d be
abandoned, groveling—it was amusing, even enjoyable.’
He remembered her wounded gaze, her trembling
shoulders, the quiet sobs she tried to muffle.
He no longer wanted to see her in such despair.
No longer wanted to witness her breaking in such a cruel,
pitiful state. After all, his decision to send her to the
Schuvan estate would not change.
…No, that was an excuse.
In truth, he was afraid. Afraid that he would let her tearful
pleas undo the painful choice he’d made for her, the first he
had ever made in her interest.
He knew that if his desire resurfaced, he would end up
keeping Elise by his side, giving in to his selfish need for her
presence.
He foresaw himself justifying his actions under the guise of
her wishes, so he gave her no chance to change his mind.
In a way, not bidding farewell to Elise as she finally left the
hell he’d put her through, was a form of punishment he’d
imposed upon himself.
“Your Grace,” Norman said, taking a letter from his coat and
holding it out with respectful hands. 
“This was left by the young lady.”
The envelope was unsealed, likely because she’d written it
quickly in secret so the maids wouldn’t notice.
Cardale looked down at the neatly folded envelope. He
could imagine what it would say.
Elise only ever wrote letters when she was asking for
forgiveness.
A letter filled with her anguish and apologies. And yet, it
was her final message.
With conflicting feelings, Cardale finally opened the
envelope.
The paper was soft at the edges from repeated handling,
and he recognized it instantly.
It was the note he’d given her, with the names for the baby
written on it.
The image of her clutching it to her chest, asking if she
could keep it as if it were the most precious thing, was still
fresh in his mind.
Then why had she returned it? What had she been
thinking…?
His fingertips trembled almost imperceptibly as he unfolded
the paper.
The familiar, delicate handwriting encircled the baby’s name
in a round, tender curve, with her message filling the empty
spaces around it.
[…Thank you for allowing someone as insignificant as
me the chance to serve you, Your Grace.]
Her letters always began with gratitude.
Even though she had been forced into his bed against her
will, she had always called it an opportunity.
[…Please forgive me.]
Then came the apologies. Long, unending words of
contrition, where she blamed herself and begged for
forgiveness.
[I apologize for the audacity of carrying your child
without permission, for being a mere maid who
dared. But I swear, I’ve done nothing dishonorable.
Please, believe me.]
Some of the letters were smudged, likely by tears, as if she
had tried to wipe them away in haste.
[Your Grace, please have mercy on the baby.]
She implored him, asking that he view the child with
kindness, as he had when he named it. That he show mercy
and give it a simple, peaceful life.
As the letter neared its end, her writing became shaky, the
ink smudged, as if each word had been choked with tears.
A heaviness pressed down on Cardale’s chest.
He stared at the letter for a long time, his voice low as he
finally asked, “Did she leave any message for me?”
“She asked that… you not forget our child.”
Our child.
Those words struck him like a bolt of lightning.
In that moment, the composure he’d struggled to maintain
shattered entirely.
He finally understood why Elise had felt so insecure and
fearful, why she hadn’t trusted him until the very end.
“Your child will be safe, I promise.”
“I won’t abandon you. You or your child.”
Your child. Not their child. Not our child.
Only now, when it was far too late to undo it, did he
understand.
Cardale closed his eyes tightly, his heart heavy with regret.

Even after boarding the carriage, Elise continued to tremble.
“My lady…”
Linda watched her with a pained expression.
“She won’t believe anything we say, not until she sees her
family for herself.”
Cardale had given her prior warning, so she’d expected as
much. Yet Elise’s distrust ran deeper than Linda had
anticipated.
Not only did she not believe she was truly going to the
Schuvan estate, she didn’t even trust in the safety of herself
or her unborn child.
“Make sure to stay close to her. She might try to harm
herself again on the way, so don’t let her out of your sight.”
Recalling the disarray of scars on Elise’s pale foot, Linda’s
heart clenched.
Elise, sitting with her hands tightly clasped, lifted her head.
“Linda.”
Her voice was small, barely audible, but Linda heard her and
responded immediately.
“Yes, my lady. Is something wrong?”
“No… it’s not that…”
Elise managed a faint, trembling smile, her eyes glistening
with unshed tears.
“Thank you… for everything.”
Stumbling over her words, she expressed her genuine
gratitude.
She said that thanks to Linda, she had managed to live at
the Duke’s residence and that she was sorry for causing so
much trouble.
It felt like a farewell to someone she would never see again.
Linda’s heart tightened with guilt and sadness.
She’d watched as the once-bright young lady had gradually
lost her light, slowly withering away, and had done nothing
to intervene.
“I only did what I was supposed to do, my lady.”
“Even so…”
At that moment, the carriage began to slow. Linda glanced
outside and let out a small sigh of relief.
Not because they’d arrived safely at the Schuvan estate,
but because her poor lady’s suffering and pain had finally
reached an end.
The carriage came to a complete stop.
The door cracked open, and Michael appeared, announcing
their arrival with his usual calm demeanor.
“We have arrived at the Schuvan estate.”
Elise blinked rapidly, as if in disbelief.
“Waiting outside is the new Count Schuvan.”
“…The new Count Schuvan?”
Her blue eyes showed her confusion, and Michael, his usual
sternness softened by a gentle smile, explained.
“Yes. Damian Schuvan, your elder brother, has assumed the
countship in place of Gerhard Schuvan, who is bedridden.”
Elise’s lips moved soundlessly, struggling to process this
unfamiliar reality.
“My lady,” Linda said, clasping Elise’s hands warmly. “Now
that you’re with your family, you can catch up on everything
you missed. Eat good food and go out as much as you like.”
She smiled softly.
“I may not be with you, but from afar, I will pray for your
health and happiness, for you and your child.”
With these parting words, Linda looked to Michael and
nodded.
Receiving the signal, he stepped aside, opening the carriage
door fully.
“Oh…”
Light poured in through the once-dim carriage, revealing the
bright view outside.
Servants lined up before the mansion, and standing among
them was a man.
‘Fritz?’
Elise’s eyes widened with a startled gasp, but then
realization dawned.
It wasn’t Fritz.
He had a strong gaze, but it was not cruel, and his eyes
were a vivid blue, not the cold violet she remembered.
Eyes the same shade as her own, and their mother’s.
Even without anyone telling her, she knew.
The man stepped toward the carriage.
His silver hair caught the sunlight, glinting as he
approached, embodying the Schuvan bloodline.
When he reached the door, he spoke his first words to her
with a gentle voice.
“It’s a pleasure to finally meet you.”
Her lips moved instinctively.
“Brother Damian…”
Hearing his sister’s voice, Damian’s eyes softened warmly.
Extending his hand to escort her, he replied.
“Welcome home, Elise.”

As Elise stepped down from the carriage, still clutching
Damian’s hand, everything felt surreal, as if she were
floating through a dream. Her new shoes touched the soil of
the Schuvan estate, solid and grounding, yet her heart was
still suspended in disbelief.
“The ground’s still a bit slippery from the rain yesterday,”
Damian noted, his grip on her hand tightening slightly for
support.
They walked slowly, side by side, and after a moment, he
turned to her with a gentle question.
“Are you feeling alright? If it’s difficult to walk, just let me
know.”
“Oh, I’m fine…” She began.
Only for him to add with a playful gleam in his eye, “You can
lean on me if you need to. Or I can carry you if you’re too
tired.”
“Pardon?” Elise gasped, momentarily forgetting her
manners, astonished by his offer.
Damian chuckled, casually shrugging. “This brother of yours
may not look it, but I’m actually quite strong.”
He flexed his arm with a mischievous grin, making a lighthearted show of strength. Elise, flustered, quickly shook her
head.
“No, no, I’m alright!”
“Those are new shoes, aren’t they? They look like they
might be uncomfortable.”
“Oh no, they’re… they’re very comfortable.”
It wasn’t a lie. Though the shoes were brand new, they fit
her perfectly, soft and cushioned as if made for a long
journey.
“Well, if you’re sure,” Damian replied with a slightly
disappointed look. “But if you feel uncomfortable, promise
you’ll let me know.”
“Yes…”
A strange, childlike warmth settled over her, and she
couldn’t help but feel a bit shy. Damian laughed at her quiet
response.
“You’re quite the shy one, aren’t you?”
Listening to his warm laughter, Elise found herself thinking,
‘He really is a good person.’
Friendly and easy-going, he spoke to her as though they’d
known each other all their lives, closing the distance
between them with gentle humor.
‘To think this man is my brother…’
Growing up, Elise had often imagined what it might be like
to have a kind and gentle sibling, especially after suffering
so much under Fritz’s cruelty.
‘If only I hadn’t been born a bastard… if I had truly been
Fritz’s little sister…’
Now, standing beside her was the very brother she’d once
dreamed of. Warm and affectionate, almost like the fantasy
she’d created in her mind.
‘Maybe I am dreaming,’ she thought.
In her dreams, her deepest wishes always came true.
After she’d fallen from the cliff, during her days of
unconsciousness, Elise had dreamt often—beautiful,
impossible dreams.
In those dreams, she’d found herself living a life that reality
had denied her.
And, truth be told, she hadn’t wanted to wake up. She
hadn’t wanted to return to the harshness of her real life.
‘If this is a dream… then that’s alright,’ she told herself,
trying not to expect too much.
If she let herself believe it was real and it turned out to be
an illusion, she feared she might never recover.
“Welcome, my lady!”
“It’s a pleasure to finally meet you!”
The estate staff greeted her warmly, with bright smiles as
she walked toward the grand entrance.
Although they were strangers to her, Elise, absorbed in the
presence of her new brother, barely registered their faces.
Only murmuring her greetings in a small, shy voice.
“Welcome home, Lady Elise.”
As she climbed the steps to the entrance, the double doors
opened, revealing the grand central hall.
The room was familiar yet unfamiliar, as if someone had
gently reshaped her memories of it.
“It’s a bit different, isn’t it?”
Reading her curious expression, Damian explained, “We
changed the curtains, some of the lighting, and a few
decorations. We didn’t have time to touch the marble floors
or the columns, but… we’re hoping to complete it by next
spring.”
He laughed softly, sounding slightly embarrassed.
“I think it looks wonderful as it is,” Elise replied quickly, her
words lighting up his face with a smile.
“You like it?”
She nodded.
“It feels bright and warm. I especially love the curtains…
they’re so beautiful.”
“Oh, Mother chose those. She’ll be thrilled to know you like
them.”
Her steps halted abruptly, and her eyes darted up to him,
wide with surprise and a hint of trepidation.
“Mother…?”
“Yes. She arrived here a few days ago,” Damian began to
explain gently.
“Elise?”
At the sound of that voice, Elise froze, her body tense with
shock.
It was a voice she had yearned to hear, one she had
dreamed of meeting again, even if only in a dream.
Slowly, she lifted her head in the direction of the voice.
Standing on the staircase across the hall was someone she
never expected to see again.
Her eyes widened, and her heart raced.
‘This must be a dream…’
This must be a figment of her mind, a mirage conjured by
the sheer force of her longing.
‘No, I mustn’t get my hopes up. There’s no way… no way
Mother could be here.’
She blinked hard, trying to dispel the illusion.
But then, the warm, familiar voice sounded again, gentle
and unmistakably real.
“My dear girl.”
In that instant, her resolve crumbled, and the conviction
she’d clung to shattered into pieces.
“M… Mother…”
Tears streamed down Elise’s cheeks, while Marisa’s eyes
glistened with her own unshed tears.
“My precious daughter,” her mother said, descending the
stairs with open arms, and then wrapped her tightly in an
embrace.
Warmth surrounded her, the comforting scent of her
mother’s embrace.
“Why are you so thin, my darling?”
There was no denying it.
This was her mother, alive and breathing.
Not resting in a cold grave, not gone beyond her reach, but
standing here, holding her.
As reality sank in, Elise’s voice came in a broken sob.
“Mother…”
She began to cry.
Though happiness filled her heart, the tears wouldn’t stop.
All the words she had practiced for their reunion slipped
away, replaced by the pure relief and joy of seeing her
mother again.
Marissa, too, began to cry, unable to hold back her own
tears at the sound of her daughter’s long-suppressed grief.
Damian, watching the reunion between mother and
daughter, felt his own eyes misting, unable to keep his
composure.

After some time, the two finally managed to calm down.
Worried that the emotional reunion might overwhelm his
frail mother and sister, Damian led them to Marissa’s sitting
room.
While he instructed a maid to bring warm fruit tea, mother
and daughter sat together on the sofa, hands clasped.
Elise gazed at her mother’s face, examining her carefully.
The Marissa she remembered had been so thin that her
bones seemed visible beneath her skin, so weak that even
sitting up in bed had been a challenge.
But now, she was healthier, her face fuller, and her cheeks
rosy with color. It was almost hard to reconcile with her past
image.
“Are you… much better now?”
Elise knew her mother’s illness wasn’t one that healed
easily, so she asked cautiously.
Marissa smiled gently at her daughter’s concern.
“Don’t worry about me, dear. I’m feeling well enough now to
run if I wanted to,” she said, exaggerating slightly.
Sitting across from them, Damian raised an eyebrow, his
expression doubtful.
“Mother, overconfidence in your health isn’t wise.”
“See, your brother here is quite the worrier,” Marissa said,
playfully teasing Damian to Elise.
“I wanted to come meet you at the door myself, but he
wouldn’t let me.”
Damian remained steadfast, unbothered by her gentle
chiding, his expression firm as if unwilling to compromise on
this issue.
“Your illness isn’t fully cured yet. What if you caught a
cold?”
“And that’s why I stayed inside the house, didn’t I?”
“I asked you to wait in your bedroom, specifically.”
“Oh dear, I must have missed that part.”
At her feigned innocence, Damian sighed in halfexasperation, pressing his fingers to his forehead while
Marissa chuckled softly.
Elise watched the playful banter between mother and son,
felt her heart lift as a warm smile spread across her face.
She had never dreamed of meeting a brother she hadn’t
known. Seeing her mother in such good health felt like a
dream come true.
“Elise, surely you understand how I feel, don’t you?” Marissa
asked, smiling at her daughter.
“Damian, Elise is my daughter,” she retorted playfully to her
son’s protective attitude.
And the realization that she could live with them, part of this
family, filled her with a profound happiness.
Elise let out a small laugh, her eyes glistening as a single
tear, filled with joy, slipped down her cheek.

Upon becoming the head of the Schuvan family, Damian
quietly began investigating everything that had happened
to his mother and sister.
One by one, he had summoned the household staff to the
basement for questioning, and the sight of the interrogation
tools alone had been enough to make them spill everything
they knew.
Through these confessions, Damian quickly uncovered the
horrific extent of what Elise and Marissa had endured in the
mansion under Fritz’s rule. While he had suspected some of
it from his prior surveillance of Fritz, the brutal reality was
far worse than he had imagined.
It was only natural, then, that he decided to purge everyone
involved.
With the Duke’s cooperation, the purge was swift and
efficient. Fritz had already been removed, and the staff
members were either dismissed and sent far away or
silenced completely, depending on the severity of their
complicity.
The Duke’s influence had even allowed him to access key
information necessary to dismantle Gerhard’s control over
the family.
Yet, despite this alliance, Damian never let his guard down.
After all, this was Cardale Vassenberg he was dealing with—
a man whose motives could rarely be trusted. It was hard to
believe that Cardale’s assistance was merely an act of
goodwill toward Elise.
When Vanessa Lockseed had mysteriously disappeared just
before her own elimination, Damian had immediately
noticed the oddity of the situation.
Then, upon hearing that a woman named Marissa had
supposedly died a few weeks prior, Damian’s suspicions had
only deepened. The official reports oddly matched his
mother’s descriptions too closely to be mere coincidence.
Damian had attempted to investigate further but found no
clues. It was as if Marissa simply didn’t exist in any records.
‘Someone is intentionally covering this up.’
His suspicions had led him to a particular conclusion.
‘It’s a trap.’
And there was only one person for whom such a trap would
be set.
Damian recalled the rumor of the hunting incident where a
noble lady had reportedly been kidnapped, with the local
guard dispatched to search for her.
‘What if it wasn’t a kidnapping but an escape? And what if
the one escaping was Elise?’
These doubts only grew stronger, and he repeatedly
demanded that the Duke return Elise to him.
Finally, a response had come just as his patience had
reached its breaking point.
“Um… there’s something… I need to tell you both.”
Elise’s timid voice pulled Damian from his thoughts. She sat
with her head lowered, her fingers nervously twisting as she
spoke.
Damian exchanged a brief, knowing glance with his mother.
Marissa gave her daughter’s hand a reassuring squeeze,
smiling softly.
“I’ve heard the news, my dear. You have a little one on the
way.”
Elise’s eyes widened, tears gathering at the corners of her
eyes.
“You… you knew…”
The corners of her eyes shimmered with unshed tears, and
her voice came out choked.
“I’m… I’m so sorry…”
Marissa’s gaze softened as she looked at her daughter, filled
with both love and sympathy.
“You must have endured so much pain. How hard it must
have been for you…”
Elise shook her head quickly, causing her tears to spill over.
“No, I didn’t… it wasn’t that hard…”
“It’s alright to cry, my dear.”
Elise, who had been stumbling over her words in a shaky
attempt to reassure her mother, froze. Marissa wrapped her
arms around her daughter, pulling her close.
“I know, even if no one else does. I know how much you’ve
suffered.”
At those words, Elise broke down, finally allowing herself to
cry. Marissa’s face was streaked with sadness as she gently
patted her daughter’s back.
‘…That bastard.’
Watching them, Damian clenched his fists in anger.
When he had first learned of Elise’s pregnancy alongside the
news of her return, he’d been struck by a wave of fury.
In the Empire’s noble society, an unmarried woman bearing
a child was considered a disgrace. Such a scandal could ruin
any chance of her reintegration into high society.
In typical cases, even couples within marriage alliances
practiced strict family planning.
But she was pregnant, and the Duke had yet to offer even
the formality of a proposal.
To Damian, the Duke was nothing more than a selfish man
who had used Elise as his mistress to satisfy his desires and
discarded her as soon as she became pregnant.
He had held back only because he had needed to get Elise
back safely and because the Duke had helped rescue his
mother and ensured her recovery with the best possible
medical care.
Damian waited, holding his anger in check, until Elise had
finished letting out her emotions.
“My dear,” Marissa said softly, taking Elise’s hands in hers.
This was a critical moment, and Damian felt a slight tension
in the air as he watched.
“You have to be honest with us now.”
She met Elise’s gaze, her expression warm and
encouraging.
“What do you want to do from here on?”
The Duke’s aide had relayed that Elise wished to keep the
child, but neither Marissa nor Damian was naive enough to
trust the Duke’s words blindly.
“I… I want to…” Elise’s eyes darted nervously between
them before Damian spoke.
“We just want to know what you truly want, so we can help
you.”
Marissa tucked a stray strand of hair behind her daughter’s
ear.
“I’m always on your side, no matter what. No matter what
you choose, I’ll always support you.”
Elise hesitated a moment before meeting their eyes with
newfound resolve.
“I… I want to keep the baby. I want to live with the child…”
It wasn’t the answer Damian had hoped for, but he
respected his sister’s decision.
“Then, by late spring, we’ll have a new addition to our
family.”
At Marissa’s gentle words, Elise repeated quietly, almost as
if to herself.
“Family…”
“Yes, our family.”
Damian knelt in front of her, looking directly into her eyes.
“Now, all you need to do is rest here with us and think only
about taking care of yourself and the baby. Alright?”
Finally, a faint light returned to Elise’s expression as she
nodded.
Damian offered her a small smile.

After some more conversation, Damian noticed Elise starting
to nod off, so he rose to leave.
“I have some matters to attend to, so I’ll take my leave.”
“Don’t worry. I’ll stay with her,” Marissa reassured him.
He nodded, knowing that Marissa would be there to comfort
Elise in his absence. They both needed this time to be
together after being kept apart for so long.
Marissa escorted him to the door, and as Elise drifted into
sleep, an odd tension settled between mother and son.
“The air is cold. You should go back inside.”
“This isn’t much,” Marissa replied lightly.
Though they were family, the years apart had made them
somewhat unfamiliar with each other.
Yet they both did their best to act as close as a mother and
son ought to be, for Elise’s sake.
“…She must feel so overwhelmed right now. Scared and
uncertain.”
Marissa’s gaze lingered on her sleeping daughter, and a
quiet sigh escaped her lips. Her voice trembled slightly with
the weight of her concern.
“After all… I doubt she was welcomed there.”
A bitter smile crossed Marissa’s face.
Damian felt a familiar surge of anger rise within him, but he
suppressed it, reminding himself of his duty to reassure his
mother.
“I’ll handle the matter of the child. Tell Elise not to worry
about it.”
“I will,” Marissa nodded, about to go back inside before
pausing.
“Damian.”
“Yes?”
“Thank you… for never forgetting us.”
Her gaze held a tenderness that moved him deeply. Damian
softened his expression, smiling gently.
“Please, go back inside. The hallway air is quite chilly.”
Finally, Marissa nodded and returned to Elise.

After leaving his mother and sister, Damian walked directly
to his study.
Reaching his desk, he placed his hands on either side of a
letter that lay open before him. The earlier warmth in his
expression had vanished, replaced by a cold, hard gaze.
Three days ago, he had received this letter along with the
news of Elise’s return.
The letter detailed the foods that Elise, suffering from
morning sickness, could eat. It also mentioned the scars on
her foot and her likely desire to avoid anything that would
expose them.
As he read the letter for the first time, he hadn’t been able
to understand its purpose.
Why would the Duke, after abandoning Elise and his child,
feel the need to send such a letter?
After considering all possible motives, Damian had come to
one conclusion.
‘The child.’
Perhaps the Duke was keeping Elise and the child as a
backup, in case his future wife failed to produce an heir or
something happened to the child.
It wasn’t common, but neither was it unheard of. Damian
himself was a similar case, an illegitimate child accepted
when no legitimate heir was available.
So he began making plans to ensure that if Elise’s child was
a boy, he would bear the Schuvan name, just in case the
Duke tried to take the child in the future.
It was a precaution, a way to block any attempt by the Duke
to claim his sister’s child.
His grip on the letter tightened.
He had become the Count of Schuvan to reclaim his family
and protect them.
Now that he finally had them, he would not let anything tear
them apart.
‘And I won’t let you have your way.’
His gaze was firm, heavy with resolve and the weight of
responsibility.

“My Lord.”
One of Damian’s men appeared at just the right moment to
report the end of their search.
“We’ve scoured every room in the mansion for several days,
but found nothing unusual.”
Damian frowned. Could it really be hidden in one of the
outlying estates? He shook his head. If it was Gerhard
Schuvan’s doing, he would have kept it somewhere he could
keep a close eye on it, not in some distant estate where it
might slip from his control.
Then it had to be here, in this mansion.
“I will have the men search again, and thoroughly…”
“No need.”
An idea struck Damian. His expression eased as he spoke.
“I think I know where it is.”

There was a time when only a mother and daughter lived in
the Schuvan estate’s annex, with no one else to rely on but
each other. But now the annex held the one person Damian
despised most: a man who had become half-paralyzed after
an accident.
“How dare you set foot here!” 
With a smash, veins throbbing on his forehead, Gerhard
hurled a cup that shattered against the floor.
“I’m here because I have business to attend to.” 
Damian dodged the cup with a slight tilt of his head and
then commanded coolly, “Search the room.”
At his signal, servants swarmed into the room, yanking open
drawers and cabinets, emptying their contents everywhere
until the place was in shambles.
“You vile fools! What do you think you’re doing? Stop this at
once!” 
Gerhard’s face reddened as he screamed, glaring at his son
with murderous intent. Damian, however, didn’t so much as
blink.
“We found it!” 
One of the servants uncovered a hidden vault in the wall.
The vault was heavy enough to need four strong men to
move it.
“There’s a lock on it.”
Damian glanced at Gerhard. Just as he expected, the man
sneered, a twisted grin on his face.
“Fail to unlock it three times, and it’ll seal for good,”
Gerhard laughed in vile satisfaction, confident no one could
break the code.
“I’d rather see everything rot than let a wretch like you lay
hands on any of it.”
Damian chuckled, and Gerhard’s expression tightened.
“What’s so funny?”
“It’s only natural.” Damian replied with an unruffled face.
“After all, you’ve already handed me the title.”
“Ungrateful bastard…” 
Damian’s calm tone drove his father into a frenzy, triggering
an outburst of furious curses and angry roars.
“You wretched bastard! I gave a lowborn mongrel like you
the chance to be heir, and you betray me!”
Damian ignored him entirely and focused on the lock,
uninterested in anything his father might say. He placed his
hand on the vault, thinking for a moment before calmly
turning the dial.
Click.
The lock released on the first try.
Gerhard’s stunned expression contrasted sharply with
Damian’s cold smirk.
‘Despicable man.’
The same man who’d driven his mother’s life to ruin.
Damian had set the vault’s code to Marissa’s birthday.
Inside, alongside gold bars and various documents, lay the
entire fortune of the Schuvan estate. But what caught
Damian’s attention was something else entirely.
“This…”
His hand holding the document trembled, Damian’s gaze
darkened with loathing as he looked at Gerhard.
“That money… is mine! No one can touch it… Urgh!”
In a fury, Damian grabbed his father’s neck with brutal
force, and Gerhard’s eyes bulged in terror.
“Are you even a father? Are you even human?” 
Damian’s grip tightened, his father’s eyes swelling, his body
writhing under his son’s unyielding, icy glare. Just as it
seemed Gerhard might suffocate, Damian released him.
Gerhard gasped desperately for air, his weakened body
struggling for control.
“There’s only one reason I let you live,” Damian murmured,
his face close to Gerhard’s, his voice low and icy.
“To make you suffer something worse than death.”
Gerhard felt a chill slide down his spine, and he froze,
paralyzed by Damian’s terrifying warning.
Damian turned to leave the room.
“Oh, one more thing,” he said, pausing at the door to look
back. “Have you heard the news?”
He smiled faintly.
“Mother has returned to the main estate.”
“Marissa… is here?” 
For a moment, Gerhard’s eyes glinted with something fierce.
“Bring her to me this instant—”
“I don’t think so,” Damian cut him off with a cold smile. 
“Don’t you think it’s only fitting that you endure the same
fate?”
The door slammed shut behind Damian, leaving only the
sound of Gerhard’s frenzied cries echoing through the room.
“Get back here this instant! You wretched bastard! Marissa!
Bring her to me! Marissa! Marissa!”
…
Damian left the annex, clutching a crumpled document in
his hand, his expression unreadable.

Mother and daughter spent a day together that flew by
quickly, and soon night had fallen.
“How about sleeping here tonight?”
“Are you sure?”
“Of course! This is my room, after all. Why not?”
Elise’s face brightened. She hadn’t wanted to leave her
mother’s side. Reading her daughter’s expression, Marissa
laughed.
“Perfect. This bed’s too big for just one person, anyway. Or
better yet, why don’t we spread the bedding out on the floor
like we used to?”
Before Elise could protest, Marissa had already pulled the
blankets off the bed and spread them by the fireplace.
“Mother!”
“Don’t just stand there—help me, dear.”
Elise joined in, and they laid down together in the firelit
room, memories of their small, crowded room in the slums
flooding back. 
‘It feels just like old times…’
“Sweet dreams, Elise.”
“You too, Mother.”
Warm silence settled over the room. The wind shook the
window panes, and the crackling of the fireplace filled the
quiet night.
Elise opened her eyes slightly, glancing at her mother’s
face, feeling her heart settle with peace.
“Can’t sleep?” 
Marissa spoke with her eyes closed, breaking the silence.
“Oh, were you still awake?”
“I could say the same about you.” 
Marissa turned to face her daughter, smiling softly. 
“Perhaps it’s because I’m just so happy to see you again.”
Elise felt Marissa’s gentle touch on her forehead and
couldn’t help but nestle close, murmuring, “I missed you so,
so much, Mother.”
“And I always thought of you—wondering if you were eating
well, if you were sleeping safely, if you were healthy…”
The gentle words nearly brought Elise to tears, and she bit
her lip to hold back the urge to cry.
Thinking of the years her mother had endured while burying
Damian deep in her heart, Elise’s throat tightened. 
‘If even a year without you felt so unbearable, how did you
ever manage it?’
“Mother,” Elise hesitated, finally voicing a question she had
been afraid to ask.
“How… how did you survive all this time?”
Having seen her mother’s funeral, Elise needed to know how
Marissa had recovered her health and how Damian had
come back to her.
“That’s…”
Marissa hesitated, weighing her words before looking Elise
in the eye, a decision made.
“I was confined in the outer estate before the Duke of
Vassenberg rescued me and brought me back here.”
At the mention of that unexpected name, Elise’s eyes
widened.
“Then, at the Duke’s mansion, I received treatment and
recovered. So that I could come back and see you.”
Her silver lashes trembled as the revelation sank in. Elise
struggled to find words, her voice wavering as she finally
managed to ask, “The Duke… saved you? And provided
treatment?”
Marisa nodded. “Yes, his physician came every day to
monitor my recovery.”
A faint breath escaped Elise as she covered her mouth,
grappling with disbelief.
‘He said it was all a lie…’
She remembered the Duke’s cold words, mocking her for
begging, sneering at her hopes. Leaving her heart broken
and aching.
‘He only found it amusing… only wanted to play with me…’
Recalling his cruelty was like reopening a wound that had
never fully healed. She instinctively placed a hand over her
heart, where the pain still throbbed.
‘All this time… he hadn’t abandoned his promise.’
He had kept his word, saving her mother just as she’d
begged.
But why, then, had he spoken to her so harshly? Why had he
said such cruel things, knowing it would break her heart?
Suddenly, she remembered the staged funeral, the way he
had arrived, filled with fury at the gravesite.
‘Because I’d broken our agreement… because I’d run
away…’
He had fulfilled his promise, ensuring she could be reunited
with her mother.
And yet, she had hidden herself away, broken the contract,
and deceived him by fleeing.
‘I…’
At the time, she’d only wanted to protect her child… only
that…
“I’m so glad,” she whispered, blinking back the unspeakable
apologies and looking at her mother with a gentle smile.
“I’m so glad you’re healthy, Mother.”
She had kept her mother safe, the person who meant the
world to her. Her long-held wish had come true.
‘So it’s alright now…’
But even as she tried to reassure herself, her heart
continued to ache. An odd, persistent pain that wouldn’t
fade.

Her chest throbbed with a sharp ache, and tears kept falling.
Her wish had come true. She was so happy, so overjoyed.
She wanted to smile in front of her mother. If she cried, her
mother would surely feel sad.
Elise had shed tears several times today too. To hide her
sobs, she buried her face into her mother’s embrace.
“My daughter.”
Marissa gently stroked her daughter’s back, speaking softly.
“Do you know what hurt me the most?”
Elise pressed her lips tightly together and shook her head.
“It was not being there for you when you were crying alone.
I wanted to cry with you, to hold you, but I couldn’t. That
broke my heart.”
Her tender voice trembled as it carried on.
“How lonely you must have been, how cold and sad… I
could only pray that God would take pity on you and care for
you.”
“Mother…”
Elise lifted her head to look at Marissa. Her mother’s cheeks
were glistening with tears, though Elise didn’t know when
they had started to fall.
“So cry as much as you want. Two, three, even ten times—
it’s all right.”
Marissa smiled faintly and stroked Elise’s cheek.
“This time, I’ll be here with you.”
“Hngh…”
A sob broke free, and in the end, Elise let herself wail
openly.
“I’m sorry, my daughter… for making you cry alone, for not
being able to do anything for you.”
Her mother’s endlessly gentle hand brushing through her
hair made Elise’s sorrow only deepen.
Elise cried like a child, as if she were trying to let go of the
final remnants of pain and sadness stored deep in her heart
through her tears.

Marissa looked down at her sleeping daughter’s face, her
gaze a mixture of pity and guilt.
‘This is no time for this.’
She let out a faint sigh and rose carefully. Taking great care
not to wake Elise, she lifted the blanket at the foot of the
bed.
Even in bed, Elise had fallen asleep with her socks still on.
“They must have been tight and painful… yet she didn’t
complain…”
Marissa gingerly removed the socks, revealing feet wrapped
in thin, soft cloth.
Her hands moved even more carefully as she unwound the
cloth from Elise’s feet.
As the once-pristine white cloth became increasingly stained
with drops of blood, Marissa’s eyes began to tremble.
Finally, when the last layer of cloth was removed, Marissa
froze in shock.
Her entire body stiffened, and her wide eyes shook
uncontrollably, like someone witnessing the most horrifying
sight.
“Mother?”
Damien, arriving with a medical kit at the agreed time, was
startled to see Marissa’s pale face.
“What’s wrong? Did something happen…”
He trailed off as his gaze fell on Elise’s injured feet. His face
twisted in horror.
“What on earth is this…!”
“Damien.”
Marissa stopped her son, who was about to shout in anger.
But the anguish of a mother’s eyes as she looked at her
injured child was even more harrowing.
“Needles… of all things…”
She spoke with a voice heavy with despair.
At first, Damien didn’t understand, his confusion clear. Then,
gradually, his eyes filled with shock.
“Do you mean… these are needle marks?”
Marissa nodded silently. Overwhelmed, Damien took a deep
breath, piecing together who might have inflicted such
cruelty.
“Was it the duke? Did he do this to Elise—this monstrous act
—?”
“No. It was herself.”
“That’s impossible!”
Damien instantly denied it, unable or unwilling to believe.
“Are you saying Elise hurt herself like this with needles?
That can’t be true.”
“A person pushed to the edge sometimes turns the harm
inward. I know this pain too well because I couldn’t bring
myself to aim the blade at anyone else.”
Marissa’s sorrowful smile broke his composure.
“Just as I did.”
The realization hit Damien like a thunderbolt. He stared at
Marissa in shock, unable to speak. Even his anger couldn’t
find release, overwhelmed by the enormity of his mother’s
pain and suffering.
Silently, Marissa took her son’s hand, then let it go as she
opened the medical kit.
Her hands trembled as she applied ointment to Elise’s
wounds. Yet she persisted, finishing by rewrapping the
bandages and gently putting her socks back on.
After organizing the medical kit, Marissa spoke in a steady
voice.
“I told her about the help we received from the Duke of
Vassenberg.”
“To Elise?”
Damien clenched his fists. He hadn’t wanted to reveal this
to Elise. The one who had driven her to this point was none
other than Cardale Vassenberg.
His blood boiled, and every instinct told him to march to the
duke and shoot him.
“…You must have had your reasons.”
But he calmed himself, answering with measured words. He
trusted his mother wouldn’t have done it for the duke’s
sake.
“So Elise’s wounds might heal, even if just a little.”
Marissa looked at her son with tearful eyes.
You understand, don’t you?
Her gaze conveyed the unspoken words to Damien.
You know why your sister endured this, why she held on,
despite ending up like this.
All Elise had left was the family she’d regained through her
sacrifices.
The solace of knowing her sacrifices weren’t in vain, that
they’d borne fruit in the end.
“Shameless as it may be… selling my daughter to save
myself was all this mother could do.”
Tears rolled down Marissa’s face, dripping onto her chin as
she gazed down at her broken daughter.
Unable to bear it any longer, Damien left the room.
His patience had run out. He clenched his jaw and spoke to
a nearby aide.
“Tomorrow, we go to the Duke’s estate.”

Seated in his office, Cardale suddenly came to his senses.
Time had passed, yet the documents before him were
untouched. Ink had dripped from his pen, staining the paper
with dark blotches.
He pressed his temples, leaning back in his chair.
‘This is maddening.’
He couldn’t focus.
It had been this way since he brought Elise back from the
forest.
With his efficiency plummeting, work kept piling up, forcing
him to stay late. It was already well past midnight.
Though the late hour didn’t bother him, the unfamiliar
exhaustion did. Finally, he rose from his chair, deciding to
rest before resuming.
As he left his dimly lit office, his steps faltered in front of a
particular door.
Instead of reaching for the handle, he stood still, staring at
the closed door with a stiff expression.
His steps had unconsciously taken him in front of Elise’s
bedroom.
‘How utterly absent-minded I’ve become.’
A bitter chuckle escaped the man’s lips as he realized his
actions.
Perhaps it was fortunate, he thought, that no one had seen
him. The room’s occupant had already departed, and with
her absence, the guards and maids who once stood vigil
here were also gone.
In the now completely deserted corridor, he stood quietly,
staring at the closed door before finally turning away. The
movement was swift, as though there was no lingering
attachment.
But his mind was far from at ease.
The woman he had been trying so hard not to think about all
day had filled his thoughts once again.
He had received a report that Elise safely arrived at the
Count’s estate. There had been no accidents, no threats.
She had reunited with her family without issue.
That should have been enough.
“…Elise.”
Cardale found his fists clenching unconsciously.
Why couldn’t he stop thinking about her? Why was his chest
so heavy, so suffocating? Why did it ache, a dull, endless
throb?
He had sent her away, knowing there was no other answer.
He had understood with painful clarity that he could not
keep her.
He had watched her body break, her spirit shatter, unable to
endure her suffering any longer. Her pain, her anguish—it
had stabbed into his heart like a sharp blade.
He had feared that an Elise who finally achieved freedom
might leave on a path from which she could never return.
So he had made the choice himself. He had personally
ensured her departure, arranging for her to be safely
escorted to her family.
Now she was safe. She would no longer tremble in fear, no
longer cry in sorrow, no longer ache with longing.
She had her loved ones back, and with them, no reason to
ever leave.
He ought to feel lighter, freer.
But…

Strangely, his heart ached, again and again.
It felt as though a burning lump had lodged deep within his
chest, surging up to his throat before sinking back down, an
endless, tormenting cycle.

The knuckles of his clenched fists turned pale, the skin
stretched taut under the pressure.
Yet, the more force he applied, the deeper the pain gnawed
at him. Like the stark whiteness of his bones pressing
against his flesh.
‘Cardale Vassenberg!’
Suddenly, a sharp voice echoed in his mind—a voice that
belonged to the woman who bore him, but was no mother.
‘You’re just like your father!’  
‘You can’t be satisfied until you’ve broken and destroyed
everything around you. How could anything remain intact
around you?’
Victoria Vassenberg had seen through him clearly. He had
never truly cherished what was in his grasp. He hadn’t
believed in treasuring anything.
‘If it’s mine, why shouldn’t I use it as I please? If it broke, if it
became useless, then replacing it was enough.’
Consumed by the desire to own and dominate, drunk on the
arrogance that paying her price meant he could handle her
as he wished, he had hurt the woman and lost her.
Even then, it might have been his last chance to turn back.
‘You found Elise Schuvan, didn’t you?’
Another voice sneered at him.
‘This time, you got lucky, but how long do you think she can
last at your side?’  
‘She’ll eventually run. Or break, like all the other prey
you’ve caught before.’
The Princess’s curse, predicting his downfall.
The price of ignoring the warnings when he had lost her the
first time.
Foolishly, he hadn’t realized that someone irreplaceable had
entered his world.
And so, the woman who had looked at him with clear eyes,
who had smiled shyly at small kindnesses, who had trusted
and relied on his words… he had broken her.
“Ha…”
His breath grew uneven. The searing heat roiling in his chest
seemed to burn through his insides, making his breathing
irregular.
‘In the end, she ran away from both of us. Not just me, but
you as well.’
He inhaled deeply, his shoulders heaving, but the air that
filled his lungs felt like searing flames rather than relief.
‘Elise.’
The pain consuming his body made him double over. His
flailing hand barely managed to brace against the wall,
keeping him from collapsing.
The icy cold of the wall beneath his palm barely grounded
his fading consciousness.
Instinctively, he sought a way to sever the agony engulfing
his body, the torment ripping through his thoughts and
piercing his heart.
The source of his guilt. The root of it all.
Cardale’s gaze lifted to something above him. Yes, that. The
thing that had deceitfully stolen away what mattered most.
Despite his ragged breaths, he forced himself to move.
The short distance to his bedroom felt impossibly long, yet
he couldn’t stop. He had to destroy it—tear it apart until no
trace remained.
Bang!
The man slammed open his bedroom door as though to
break it. He seized a gun, the same one he had once used
when hunting down the woman who had fled from him.
Staggering out of the room, the dragging muzzle scraped
against the floor, producing a spine-chilling noise. Though
he heard nothing.
At his destination, Cardale’s eyes fixed upward. The middleaged man in the portrait above him looked down at him with
a cold, detached gaze.
“You were wrong.”
His voice, dry and brittle like winter’s barren branches,
echoed through the corridor.
“About everything.”
But the former duke’s painted visage remained silent,
keeping its composed, elegant demeanor. As if unaffected
by anything to do with this.

‘Why don’t you answer? Why don’t you offer an excuse?’
Cardale seethed in quiet rage. Despite his trembling body,
he stood tall, his dark eyes locked on the portrait.
He aimed the loaded gun at his father’s likeness. His finger
moved without hesitation.
Bang!
The loud crack of the shot reverberated. The frame
shattered in the center, the portrait falling to the floor
below.
Crash!
The frame hit the ground with a resounding noise,
splintering into pieces. The once-regal painting of the late
duke lay distorted and ugly within its ruined frame.
The once expressionless face now seemed to sneer at him.
‘Nobody forced you into this trap. Wasn’t this your
own doing?’
“My lord…!”
The sound of the gunshot had summoned his startled staff,
who arrived just in time to witness the shocking sight.
Bang! Bang!
Cardale didn’t move, even as the gun’s muzzle spat fire. Not
until the final bullet had been spent did the barrage cease.

The corridor fell into an oppressive silence. None of those
gathered dared to speak, overwhelmed by the duke’s erratic
behavior.
The portrait, torn, burned, and riddled with holes, was now
unrecognizable.
Cardale stared at the ruined image for a long moment
before letting out a bitter laugh.
“Haha.”
He laughed at himself for blaming a long dead father,
reduced to dust in the earth.
Who else could he blame?
Not his mother, who had wanted to kill him. Not the
princess, who had tried to use him for her own ambitions.
Not Raymond Hartmann, who had coveted the woman he
desired.
It was all his fault. His arrogance had blinded him, and his
foolish choices had led to this.
The weight of his irreparable sins came crashing down on
him like a boomerang.
“Haha… hahahaha!”
His laughter echoed through the hallway.
But no one believed he was laughing out of joy. They
swallowed nervously, tension filling the air as though
anything might happen.
At last, his butler Norman stepped forward.
“…My lord.”
Cardale’s laughter stopped abruptly.
A wave of profound irritation swept over him. He resented
the interruption, the intrusion on his fleeting moment of…
what? Sadness?
His crimson eyes slid toward Norman.
The butler flinched involuntarily under the empty, hollow
gaze of his master.
“Clean it up.”
Cardale’s command was curt as he turned away, the smell
of gunpowder clinging to him.
‘I should wash.’
Staggering, he made his way to his bathroom.
The bathwater, long since cooled, was icy, but he didn’t
care. It felt better this way, quelling the fire raging within
him.
Splashing the freezing water onto his face, he tried to
steady his breath. Droplets fell from his wet hair and face,
disturbing the still surface of the water.
He gazed at his reflection.
His crimson eyes, once admired by a woman who thought
they resembled a sunset, now looked like congealed blood,
dark and lifeless.
His mother had found their color ominous.
“…Duke.”
But Elise had looked at him with those starlit eyes and
blushed with a shy smile.
“They’re not ominous. They’re beautiful, like the
evening sky.”
That voice, that image—it had been so lovely that he had
embraced her again and again.
Yes, she was lovely.
Her gentle gaze, her peach-colored cheeks, her bashful
smile, her soft voice, her delicate and tender nature, even
the tears in her blue eyes.
Everything about her.
…He had loved her.
If he hadn’t denied it, would things have been different? It
was pointless to wonder now.
A droplet, clinging to his chin, fell onto his hand.
Strange.
The water felt warm against his skin.
He realized his eyes burned unbearably a moment later.
His reflection in the water blurred. It wasn’t the falling
droplets distorting his image.
Cardale pressed trembling hands to his face. The heat of his
tears soaked his cold palms.
‘…Elise.’
How foolish and arrogant he had been to think anything
could replace her.
Nothing in the world, no one, could ever take her place.
Cardale realized he hadn’t only broken her.

The following day, an uninvited guest arrived at the
Vassenberg estate.
Despite the lack of an appointment, the master of the house
agreed to meet him.
Led to the study, Damien wasted no time. Upon seeing
Cardale, he grabbed him by the collar with both hands.
“What the hell did you do to Elise?”

The Duke remained unresponsive, his silence only sapping
Damien’s strength. Frustrated, he let go and ground his
teeth.
Instead, Damien pulled out a pouch of gold coins and a
piece of paper, slamming them onto the table.
“I want this disgusting contract completely annulled.”
It was the agreement Gerhard Schuvan had made with the
duke, using Elise as collateral.

Damien knew that their father had effectively sold his
younger sister in exchange for investment funds to expand
the family’s textile business. 
But he hadn’t been aware there was a contact—let alone
the horrific terms it contained. 
It granted Elise no rights and stripped her of even the most
basic dignities. It wouldn’t be an exaggeration to call it a
slave contract.
It wasn’t hard to imagine the treatment Elise had endured
under such an agreement or how the Duke might have
handled her. 
Teeth clenched, Damien barely managed to suppress the
surge of anguish and fury that threatened to overwhelm
him.
“I brought the exact amount Gerhard Schuvan received as
an investment. Verify it.” 
Damien spoke with a forced composure, though his voice
betrayed his anger. He understood the Schuvan family’s
reliance on Cardale Vassenberg’s support to secure their
position, and he couldn’t afford to lose his temper now.
The Duke’s response was calm and detached. 
“Raising such a sum in a short time must not have been
easy.”
“That’s not for you to concern yourself with,” Damien
snapped, the edge in his tone revealing his barely contained
frustration. 
“And take your spies back. Every single one of them.”
Damien had long suspected Cardale had placed informants
within the Schuvan family. It was the only explanation for
the Duke’s intimate knowledge of their affairs.
Though Gerhard Schuvan had been careful enough to keep
certain matters concealed, a substantial amount of
information had undoubtedly leaked to the Duke. Damien
himself had benefited from some of this intelligence and
knew its value firsthand.
“You even deployed soldiers around the estate yesterday. I
don’t know what you’re watching for, but it ends now. Or do
you intend to claim the entire Schuvan family as your own?”
It was a pointed question, laden with suspicion. Was the
Duke’s assistance merely a ploy to devour the Schuvans
whole?
But Cardale’s unflinching, unreadable expression left
Damien uncertain. The Duke didn’t seem annoyed by the
insolence or was feigning his indifference; he merely
regarded Damien in silence.
Then, without a word, Cardale opened a drawer and
retrieved an envelope. It was as if he had prepared for this
moment in advance. 
He handed it to his aide, who promptly delivered it to
Damien.
Damien tore open the envelope and inspected its contents.
His brows furrowed deeply.
Inside was the very contract he had demanded.
Would the Duke comply so easily?
Damien couldn’t help but doubt. He had braced himself for
rejection, even hostility, expecting Cardale Vassenberg to
dismiss his demands outright.
In truth, Damien hadn’t harbored much hope. He had
stormed into the estate unannounced and prepared for the
possibility of being turned away at the gate. 
Yet here was the Duke, not only granting him an audience
but also handing over the contract. 
‘There must be a trap,’ Damien thought. His suspicion grew
as he scrutinized Cardale’s inscrutable demeanor.
“Is this document truly authentic?”
“You’ll know if you compare it with your family’s copy,”
Cardale said evenly.
Damien placed the two contracts side by side and began
comparing them. His eyes darted rapidly over the text.
“…There’s no discrepancy.”
Astonishingly, the documents were identical. There were no
signs of forgery or tampering.
“It’ll need further examination, but…”
Damien reminded himself he was deep in enemy territory. If
the Duke decided to snatch the contract back, there’d be
little he could do to stop it. 
‘I should destroy it immediately.’
Determined, Damien turned toward the fireplace with the
contract in hand.
“Burn it in front of Elise,” Cardale said abruptly.
Damien froze. The quiet command sent a chill down his
spine. As if the Duke had read his thoughts.
Steeling himself, Damien replied sharply, “You want me to
show this monstrous contract to Elise?”
His words carried sharp criticism, but Cardale remained
unperturbed. He spoke slowly, as if weighing each word.
“She needs to see it to believe she’s truly free.”
For a moment, Damien was struck speechless. His widened
eyes betrayed his shock.
It almost sounded as if the Duke cared about Elise. 
But how could that be? This was the man who had treated
her as a disposable mistress.
“Elise knows what’s in the contract. Burn it in her presence,”
Cardale reiterated.
“…I’ll handle it,” Damien replied curtly, masking his unease.
The Duke offered no further objection, likely confident
Damien would comply.
Having secured the contract, Damien turned his attention to
the chest of gold.
“Verify the amount,” he said.
“Take it back,” Cardale replied, dismissively.
“What?”
Damien’s expression twisted in disbelief. 
“Are you mocking me?”
He was ready to lash out, convinced this was another of the
Duke’s manipulations, when Cardale spoke again.
“The contract is already fulfilled. It’s not annulled; it’s
completed.”
“What…?”
“Elise fulfilled her part of the agreement. And as per the
terms, I’ve returned her to the Schuvans. The contract is
done.”
Damien stared at him, stunned.
“As agreed, the fabrics produced by the Schuvan family’s
textile mills will continue to be distributed through
Vassenberg’s trade networks. You needn’t worry about
that,” Cardale added.
Damien was at a loss for words. 
Cardale’s next statement brought him back to the present.
“The spies I placed in your estate have long been recalled,
but the soldiers stationed nearby cannot be removed.”
Damien let out a bitter laugh. “Are you claiming they’re
there to protect someone? Elise, perhaps?”
“I have many enemies,” Cardale said, his voice lowering.
“What do you think they’d do if they learned Elise bore my
child?”

The revelation struck Damien like a thunderbolt. He had
never considered that the Duke’s rivals might target his
sister.
It was a glaring oversight and a dangerous one.
“You asked why I didn’t return Elise sooner,” Cardale
continued, his gaze unwavering. 
“Because it’s unsafe. Neither Gerhard Schuvan nor you can
fully conceal her secret. Nor can you protect her.”
For a moment, Damien had no retort. The Duke’s coldly
accurate assessment left him speechless.
But anger soon surged to the surface, boiling over.
“Knowing all that…”
His clenched fists trembled. The Duke’s apparent concern
for Elise only fueled his rage. 
“You made her bear a child? A child you won’t even take
responsibility for!”
Unable to suppress his emotions, Damien shouted.
The words hung in the air. Damien’s breath hitched as he
realized he had crossed a line.
This was Cardale Vassenberg, a man infamous for his
ruthlessness. The fact he had tolerated Damien’s outburst
this long was remarkable in itself.
Tension gripped Damien as he braced for retaliation. 
Instead, the Duke raised his head calmly. 
His aide appeared momentarily startled but quickly resumed
his stoic demeanor. 
“You lack the strength to fend off assassins. On this matter,
there can be no compromise,” Cardale said, his tone steady.
“Everything necessary will be provided by Vassenberg. I will
take responsibility for the child as well.”

“I will take responsibility for the child.”
Those words carried countless implications. Damien
swallowed hard.
‘Is the Duke really planning to take Elise’s child?’
He finally understood why the Duke neither dissolved the
contract nor reclaimed his investment.  
Because of the child. A child he intended to use for his own
purposes in the future.  
Damien’s blue eyes, so reminiscent of Elise’s, immediately
hardened with suspicion.  
“What exactly do you mean by that, Your Grace?”
Damien didn’t claim to know everything about his newlyreunited sister. Yet one thing he was certain of was that the
baby had become Elise’s sole anchor.  
If the baby were taken from her, the fragile mental strength
she had barely managed to rebuild would crumble entirely.  
‘I can’t let that happen.’
Images of Elise’s gaunt face, frail body, and tear-filled eyes
flashed before Damien’s mind. Determination solidified on
his face as he recalled her pain.  
The Duke, seemingly aware of Damien’s thoughts, spoke
first.  
“I have no intention of taking the child by force.”
“Are you serious?”
Damien’s desperation betrayed his inner turmoil, leaving
him unable to hide his emotions.  
“Will you swear that on the name of Vassenberg?”
Damien recognized the recklessness of his demand, but he
couldn’t let this opportunity slip away. Before the Duke had
any chance to reconsider his words, Damien needed a firm
guarantee.  
Without it, Elise would live her life in constant fear, dreading
the possibility of losing her child.  
“If you want it in writing, so be it.”
The Duke’s aide, as though prepared for this very moment,
laid another document on the desk. Cardale signed it with a
graceful hand and handed it to Damien without hesitation.  
“If there’s anything that needs amending, let me know.”
‘A contract?’  
Damien’s confusion was evident as he scanned the
document. Before long, his eyes widened in disbelief.  
[Clause 1: This contract may be terminated at Elise
Schuvan’s request.]
The very first clause was overwhelmingly favorable to
Elise.  
[Clause 2: Cardale Vassenberg shall ensure the
safety, status, and honor of Elise Schuvan and her
child.]
The contract also granted Elise sole rights to raising the
child.  
But the final clause was the most astonishing of all.  
[Clause 5: Cardale Vassenberg recognizes the child
Elise Schuvan bears as his legitimate heir, regardless
of gender.]
According to this contract, Elise’s child would not only be
acknowledged as the Duke’s legitimate offspring, but would
also inherit the title Duke of Vassenberg.  
‘What is this…?’  
Damien’s fingertips trembled as he clutched the paper. He
couldn’t make sense of the Duke’s intentions.  
Elise’s body bore scars from self-inflicted wounds—a stark
reminder of the pain and despair she had endured.  
“Do I really not have to return to the Duke’s estate? It’s not
just temporary, is it?”
“No. From now on, you’ll stay here with me and Mother.”
Elise had repeatedly sought reassurance, only believing it
after hearing the same answer multiple times.  
Damien didn’t need to ask to know that Elise’s memories of
the Duke’s estate haunted her and that she was terrified of
Cardale Vassenberg.  
He had assumed the Duke had mistreated her—exploited
her as a pawn and discarded her.  
But now, the Duke was offering to make Elise’s child his heir
and even gave Elise and the child the authority to make that
final decision.  
And most shocking of all:  
‘He prepared this document in advance.’
It was as though he had anticipated Damien’s visit—or
perhaps waited for it.  
Furrowing his brow, Damien spoke.  
“Honestly… I don’t understand.”
His blue eyes, filled with questions, met the Duke’s.  
“There’s no need for you to go this far.”
After a brief silence, the Duke murmured.  
“It was her last request.”
“Pardon?”
Ignoring Damien’s question, Cardale shifted the topic.  
“Elise’s belongings are still here. I planned to send them
soon, but since you’re here, you can take them with you.”
Damien remembered the luggage Elise had brought with
her.  
He had intended to buy her all-new belongings for a fresh
start, so he had sent the old items straight to storage
without unpacking them. He hadn’t thought much of them.  
‘There’s no need to bring unnecessary things back.’
Just as Damien opened his mouth to refuse, the Duke
spoke.  
“Take them.”
It was as though he already knew what Damien was going to
say. Before Damien could respond, the Duke added:  
“Surely you’ve noticed. She’s someone who cherishes even
the smallest things.”
Thus, before leaving the Duke’s estate, Damien visited the
room Elise had stayed in.  
Curiosity mixed with a reluctance to see what he expected
would be a depressing space.  
He thought it would resemble the confinement room their
mother had been forced into by Gerhard Schuvan.  
But when he entered, the sight of a cozy bedroom and a
well-furnished nursery struck him like a blow.  
The dresses, gloves, and shawls being folded by maids were
of the highest quality. Even jewelry adorned with exquisite
gemstones was carefully packed away.  
“Isn’t there some kind of mistake?” Damien asked.  
The Duke’s head maid simply replied: “We are following the
master’s orders.”

On the carriage ride back, Damien sat in stunned silence,
clutching the contract.  
“The heir of Vassenberg…”
As he re-read the document and confirmed the Duke’s
signature, a realization dawned upon him.  
‘The Duke didn’t abandon Elise.’  
At the very least, Cardale Vassenberg’s lingering feelings for
Elise were undeniable.  
Yet, Damien couldn’t bring himself to rejoice.  
“Even so, returning her to the Schuvan estate must have
been Elise’s desperate wish.”  
The scars Elise carried had been inflicted during her time
with the Duke.  
Was it truly right to allow a connection between them to
remain?  
Would it truly be the best choice for her?  
“If I reveal the existence of this contract, Elise might accept
the Duke for the sake of her child.”
Elise cherished her unborn child more than anything, she
would set aside her fears and endure for it.  
But Damien didn’t want that.  
He didn’t want her to sacrifice her happiness or live in fear
by the Duke’s side.  
‘Who can guarantee the Duke’s feelings won’t change?’  
Sighing, Damien buried his face in his hands, lost in the
weight of the decision.  
Winter had arrived, but warmth filled the Schuvan estate.  
Waking from a nap, Elise saw her mother by her bedside.  
“Did you sleep well?”  
Her mother’s warm hands never left hers.  
“You must have had a nice dream,” Marisa said with a
gentle smile.  
Elise nodded, her voice tinged with happiness.  
“I saw my baby.”
“In your dream?”  
“Yes.”  
Elise’s cheeks flushed as she described the dream.  
The baby had waddled up to her and taken her hand,
laughing joyfully.  
“I saw my baby’s face.”

The baby was even more adorable than she had imagined.
Elise recalled the vivid crimson eyes, chubby cheeks, rosy
lips, and the intelligent, spirited expression that was so
different from her own.  
Marissa, sharing in her daughter’s joy, smiled warmly and
asked, “Was it a girl?”  
“Hmm…”  
Elise thought for a moment, then shook her head.  
“I’m not sure.”  
The baby in her dream was so young, barely taking its first
steps.  
“But whether it’s a girl or a boy, I’ll love them with all my
heart,” she added, smiling shyly.  
She looked back up at her mother.
“Just like you loved me, Mother.”  
“Oh, my sweet girl.”  
Marissa gently stroked her daughter’s hair, her eyes
reflecting both pride and sorrow.  
“To have a healthy baby, you need to stay healthy too.”  
Eat well, get plenty of rest, think happy thoughts… Marissa’s
warm advice went on and on, and Elise couldn’t stop smiling
as she listened.  
“It’s so comforting having you here, Mother.”  
Her affectionate gaze shifted to her still-flat stomach, and
her hands carefully cradled it with evident excitement.  
Even though there were no visible signs yet, she could
already feel the life growing inside her.  
As Elise imagined the sweet face of her child, a soft smile
naturally graced her lips.  
But then someone else’s face overlapped with the baby’s.  
The person who had hurt her with cruel words, the man
whose cold gaze had made her too afraid to even look at
him…  
The hands caressing her stomach froze. Her silvery lashes
quivered faintly.  
“…I won’t have to see him again, will I?”  
He had always been someone who lived far beyond her
reach. If not for his fleeting desire, someone like her—a
mere illegitimate child of a count—would never have
exchanged a word with him.  
“It’s a relief. Truly…”  
She had been grateful and reassured when she learned she
wouldn’t have to stay near such a terrifying, intimidating
man. She had only recently felt so much joy and happiness,
as if all her wishes had come true.  
So why did her heart feel so empty, as if a part of her had
been hollowed out?  
‘I spent over six months at the Duke’s manor. I must have
just gotten used to it…’
Elise tried to reason with herself.  
‘I have Mother, my brother, and the baby, after all.’
The reality of reuniting with her long-lost family still felt like
a dream, something she hadn’t quite adapted to yet.  
“I’m… happy.”  
That word—happiness—smothered the deeper feelings
buried in her subconscious. Once hidden away completely,
they allowed her to feel truly at ease.  
The faint sting in her heart was easily ignored.  
Smiling warmly, Elise looked at Marissa.  
“I hope the weather warms up soon.”  
Then she shared another of her wishes.  
“I can’t wait to meet the baby.”  
“Well, it’s winter now, dear.”  
This time, the response came from behind her. She turned
to see Damien, having just returned from an outing.  
“You’re so eager to meet the baby my dear sister, your neck
might grow so long from waiting!”  
His teasing tone made Elise cover her mouth as she laughed
softly.  
“Then you’ll have to shorten it for me, won’t you, Brother?”  
“Of course.”  
Damien readily agreed, handing her a small bundle wrapped
in fabric. The soft, plush texture made her eyes widen in
surprise.  
“What’s this?”  
“I picked it up on my way back.”  
As she untied the string, a fluffy white deer plushie
emerged.  
“Apparently young children love hugging stuffed animals as
they sleep.”  
Elise pressed her finger against the deer’s round black nose
and smiled at how cute it was.  
“But why a white deer?”  
Most deer she had seen were light brown with delicate
spotted patterns.  
Picturing a fawn, she tilted her head quizzically. Damien
answered confidently.  
“Well, it’s because the baby will have silver hair. I chose a
white deer to match. The shopkeeper said babies form
stronger attachments to toys that resemble them.”  
“Oh…”  
Elise glanced at her mother nervously, unsure how to
respond. Marissa however, was already stifling her
laughter.  
“What?”  
Noticing the peculiar reaction, Damien looked puzzled.  
“Don’t you like it? Is there something wrong with it?”  
“No, no! That’s not it…”  
Elise quickly shook her head, swallowing hard.  
‘What if he gets upset?’
Caught in her hesitation, Marissa finally stepped in to
explain.  
“I doubt the baby will have silver hair, Damien.”  
“What?”  
His confident demeanor faltered.  
“But… but it was just a dream, so it might not be true!”  
Elise hurriedly chimed in to defend him, but Marissa shook
her head.  
“No, I think it’s more likely the baby will have dark hair.”  
At Marissa’s firm statement, Damien froze for a moment
before muttering, “Damn it, of all things…”  
His grumbling sounded disgruntled, but he swallowed the
rest of his words, leaving Elise unable to catch them.  
Moments later, he shrugged off his disappointment.  
“Still, the baby will love it. After all, it looks just like you.”  
Elise’s eyes grew wide.  
“It looks like me? The deer…?”  
“Exactly. It’s a perfect match.”  
Damien and Marissa both nodded in agreement. Elise stared
at the plush deer in her hands, its adorable features full of
charm.  
‘No matter how I look at it, it doesn’t seem like me…’
Ultimately, she concluded that her mother and brother were
looking at her through rose-tinted glasses.  
Her happy day was coming to an end.  
  
Suddenly, the temperature plummeted.  
The duke’s manor, with all the shutters tightly secured to
keep out drafts, was eerily quiet during the day and even
more so after sunset.  
While the master’s distaste for noise played a part, it wasn’t
the only reason.  
After witnessing their master shatter the portrait of his
father in a fit of rage, the manor’s staff had all begun to
tread on eggshells.  
Even the most seasoned retainers minimized their visits and
communications, retreating to the shadows as much as
possible.  
Although the duke had returned to his usual calm
demeanor, the icy atmosphere within the manor remained
unchanged.  
At dinner time, Norman emerged from the study, pushing an
untouched tray of food with him.  
“Tell the kitchen to prepare tomorrow’s meals more
carefully,” he instructed.  
“Yes, sir.”  
Handing the tray to a maid, Norman turned to find the head
housekeeper, Linda.  
The sight of the butler’s grim expression made her realize
what had happened.  
“He skipped dinner as well, didn’t he?”  
“He said he had no appetite,” Norman replied with a sigh.  
“It’s concerning. He’s barely eating once a day, if that.”  
Since having a small breakfast, the duke had skipped both
lunch and dinner, sustaining himself on only a cup of tea.  
Michael, ever the optimist, tried to reassure Norman that
their master had sometimes skipped meals during wartime
as well, but Norman remained worried.  
“Even when he does eat, it’s as if he doesn’t taste anything.
It’s like watching someone chew mechanically just to stay
alive…”  
The Duke’s meals had become a lifeless routine, devoid of
pleasure.  
Norman knew why. No matter how much he tried to
rationalize it, only one answer came to mind.  
“…How long has it been since Lady Elise left?”  
The butler hesitated before finally mentioning her name. It
was a topic everyone in the manor had been avoiding.  
“About two weeks.”  
“Two weeks…”  
Norman nodded slowly at Linda’s reply.  
“Have you heard any news about her?”  
His question hinted at hope for any sign of Elise’s wellbeing.  
“Well…”  
Linda hesitated before confessing, “I heard from someone
who knows a maid working at the Schuvan estate that she’s
doing well.”  
“That’s… a relief.”  
A heavy silence fell between them. It was difficult to speak
of someone who had left, especially while watching their
master visibly change from their absence.  
“I regret it,” Linda finally admitted, her voice thick with
emotion.  
“What I regret most is giving Lady Elise the Count’s letter.”  
If she had known how much pain it would bring Elise…  
‘Why didn’t I consider other options? Why didn’t I think of a
better way?’
After that night, Elise had changed.  
She would sit in a daze, only to suddenly burst into tears.  
But if the Duke summoned her, she would frantically erase
all signs of her distress and force herself to smile.  
“You remember how she was, don’t you? She was like… a
sad performer. Crying behind the curtain and putting on
makeup to smile when it was time to step into the
spotlight.”  
Tears glimmered in Linda’s eyes.  
“Lady Elise was already dying then. Little by little, hour by
hour, minute by minute…”  
Norman placed a comforting hand on her shoulder and
spoke quietly.  
“There’s no use regretting what can’t be undone. All we can
do now is pray for her happiness.”  
In the heavy stillness that filled the room, the faint crack of
a door being pushed open echoed.  
A shadow passed through the flickering candlelight, tall and
silent.  
  
Without a word, the man walked away and disappeared into
the dim hallway.  

There was no sign of movement, so Linda and Norman were
completely unaware that someone had been standing
outside the door.
“Still, I’m sure Lady Elise will return someday,” Norman said,
his voice brightening slightly with hope.  
“Especially now that she has the baby.”  
They both knew how much Elise cherished the child, how
fiercely she wanted to protect it.  
Even so, Linda nodded in agreement but responded with a
tinge of bitterness.  
“But… I hope it’s not because of the baby that she
returns.”  
“Linda?”  
“I know something others may not,” she said, ignoring
Norman’s mildly surprised reaction.  
“Lady Elise never showed it openly, but no matter how
much someone tried to hide their feelings, they can’t fully
conceal them.”  
Her expression was resolute as she met Norman’s gaze.  
“She lost everything she had kept in her heart before she
left.”  
The budding emotions she had nurtured from a tender
green sprout into a deep tree had withered and fallen,
trampled into the dirt.  
Even the tender, innocent love that had once been so raw
and fresh.  
“She won’t truly be happy if she returns before reclaiming
those feelings. So…”  
“Perhaps the master understands that as well. That’s why
he let her go.” Norman replied, his tone thoughtful.  
Linda’s face grew somber, and after a pause she asked
cautiously, “Do you think… the master will get another
chance someday?”  
“How could I possibly guarantee that? But…”  
Norman turned his gaze to the darkening window, where
another challenging day for their master was slowly coming
to an end.  
“…all we can do is pray that fate allows them to cross paths
again.”  

Cardale walked down the hallway.  
He hadn’t stopped intentionally to eavesdrop. The
conversations of the servants were usually trivial and
irrelevant, something he had no interest in.  
But when Elise’s name reached his ears, he couldn’t help
but pause.  
“Lady Elise was like… a sad performer. Crying behind
the curtain and putting on makeup to smile when it
was time to step into the spotlight.”  
“Lady Elise was already dying back then. Little by
little, hour by hour, minute by minute…”  
Cardale still vividly remembered the sensation of his heart
being pierced with tiny needles as he overheard those
words.  
It had undoubtedly been a warning—a caution against
making a mistake he could never undo. A reminder to
acknowledge the changes in his heart that he had
stubbornly denied.  
But he had ignored it. Dismissed it as impossible. The end
result of his choices was a boundless, irreparable loss.  
  
The man stopped in his tracks, his gaze fixed on the door
ahead.  
It was Elise’s room.  
Time and again, he found himself standing here, as if his
subconscious would drag him back here whenever his
thoughts would drift. This  has happened several times a
day over the past two weeks.  
Yet, not once had he opened the door.  
He couldn’t bring himself to.  
Facing the absence of the woman who had once lived here,
the emptiness he had tried so hard to ignore was too
agonizing.  
Her abandoned space felt like a gaping abyss, threatening
to swallow him whole and pull him into an inescapable
void.  
But as the days passed, the pain grew unbearable. It surged
over him in waves, suffocating him with despair.  
Even in the midst of his work, sudden, unbearable pangs of
pain struck his chest, as if his heart were being wrung dry of
every drop of blood.  
The suffocation that followed left him gasping for air,
clawing at his neck in a futile attempt to breathe.  
The agonizing mix of loss, loneliness, and guilt gnawed at
him relentlessly, consuming him bit by bit.  
And so, he could no longer endure it. Cardale instinctively
understood that this room, as much as it terrified him, was
his only refuge.  
Before he drowned in despair, he needed to find the traces
of her presence—anything to let him breathe, even for a
moment.  
Click.
But his hand froze on the doorknob. He hesitated for a long
time, knowing that once he opened the door, there would be
no turning back.  
After several attempts to steel himself, Cardale finally
pushed the door open.  
A chilling draft greeted him as the door creaked ajar. The
cold air brushing past his face made his skin prickle.  
Standing frozen at the threshold, Cardale surveyed the
room.  
The space that once held her warmth now felt utterly
foreign.  
The custom furniture, the light-colored wallpaper, the
framed artwork on the walls…  
Though everything looked exactly as he remembered, the
room felt bleak and lifeless.  
Perhaps it was because the hearth had gone cold, or
because there wasn’t a single candle lit.  
It almost resembled the room before Elise had moved in.  
“That can’t be right,” Cardale murmured with a bitter
smile.  
This room had been lived in for over six months. No matter
how thoroughly it had been cleaned, traces of her should
have remained.  
Cardale began to search the room slowly and meticulously,
his eyes scanning every detail.  
The decor, the rugs, the bedding, the curtains…  
He opened every drawer, cabinet, and wardrobe, even
checking the nursery, but it was all the same.  
Not a single trace of her remained.  
Of course not.  
Cardale had ordered everything to be packed and sent to
the Schuvan estate.  
“Ha…”  
A self-deprecating laugh escaped his lips as the realization
struck him.  
He had given the command himself, yet had forgotten it
until now. How pathetic.  
Still…  
He should have kept something.  
He recalled her last night, sewing desperately, as though
her stitches could protect her baby’s future.  
Why hadn’t he thought to pocket one of those embroidered
scraps?  
But even that was futile. He could never have taken them,
knowing they were her way of shielding her child’s life.  
Clinging to his regrets, Cardale searched the room once
more, determined to find even the smallest trace of her.  
His wandering gaze landed on the window.  
The window he had replaced for her, to ease her fear of
storms.  
It was the only feature he had altered after her arrival.  
She had loved it.  
He often found her standing by it, gazing out at the garden,
her joy radiating even from her back.  
Whenever he made his presence known, she would turn
around, startled, her eyes wide with surprise before
breaking into a radiant smile…  
Cardale’s body stiffened as the memory hit him.  
His dark red eyes trembled with shock.  
Why…  
…are you crying?  
No, it wasn’t real. He shook his head violently, trying to
banish the image.  
She had smiled often, sometimes shyly, sometimes with a
quiet laugh. This was just a trick of his mind, distorted by
the memory of her final tears.  
But when he opened his eyes again, a new wave of horror
struck him.  
“…It can’t be.”  
He whispered in disbelief.  
Her face was blurry.  
Her eyes, nose, and lips were unrecognizable, as if smeared
together like paints on a palette.  
No matter how many times he blinked, the image didn’t
change.  
Desperation clawed at him as he searched his mind for the
memory of her.  
But it was gone.  
“No…”  
A tidal wave of despair crashed over him.  
Why… 
Why can’t I remember your smile?

His heartbeat faltered with unease.
He needed to remember. He needed to find it. He had to
recall her smiling face.
Cardale’s gaze turned back to the window. The woman who
loved taking walks, who eagerly looked forward to outings…
Without a second thought, he bolted out of the room.
Moments later, through the wide-open gates of the ducal
estate, a large horse galloped, carrying a man who spurred
it onward like a bullet.
“Your Grace!”
Michael shouted in alarm, having spotted him only too late.
By the time his voice rang out, the rider was already far
from the estate.

The square, illuminated brightly by gas lamps, still bustled
with people despite the cold evening air.
Merchants called out with fervent voices, while passersby
clutched their coats and hurried along. Many still managed
to chat and laugh while they purchased goods with their
companions.
  
The man on the horse closed his eyes.
Behind his closed lids, memories of a day in a past season
emerged vividly.
A blazing sun, warm air, lush greenery, and the chirping of
cicadas singing their lives away under the shade of the
trees.
On a midsummer’s day, she had been there.  
Standing beside him.
‘Don’t worry, I’m not angry. Just tell me, why were
you smiling?’
‘B-because I didn’t feel like I’d get lost. You were
holding my hand…’
‘Let’s go see the clock tower first.’  
He remembered clasping her hand tightly, then realizing
what he’d done, was startled by his own unconscious action.
And yet, he hadn’t let go.
Like someone afraid of losing something precious and
fragile.
Yes… he had worried about Elise.
He hadn’t wanted to let go of that small, delicate hand. In
the bustling crowd, he had feared losing her. The softness of
her skin, the warmth in his palm—it was comforting.
So he had held her hand even tighter.
Cardale’s memory drifted past the clock tower to a small
roadside stall.
She had looked around with eyes full of curiosity, her gaze
lingering on the bright red raspberries that were in season.
‘Do you want some?’
‘Um… I don’t know.’
‘You either want it, or you don’t. What’s “I don’t
know” supposed to mean?’
‘I’ve never had one before… I don’t know what they
taste like.’
‘You’re curious, then.’  
She had taken the raspberries he handed her with both
hands, too hesitant to eat them even after boarding the
carriage.
He could still see the way her blue eyes glimmered as she
gazed down at the small fruit.
‘It smells sweet. Do you think it tastes that way too?’
‘It will.’
She had been genuinely delighted. Her cheeks flushed pink,
and her smile was radiant.
That memory was so vivid, yet her face remained a blank
void in his mind.
He could almost taste the sweet juice of the berries on her
lips when he’d kissed her. And yet…
Why couldn’t he see her face?
“My Lord, we’ll need to dismount here. There’s a stable near
the omnibus station where you can leave your horse…”
The voice of a city watchman pulled Cardale out of his
thoughts. He opened his eyes.
  
The vivid scarlet of Cardale’s eyes startled the officer,
causing him to take an involuntary step back. Taking the
opportunity, Cardale turned his horse around.
Leaving the square with its clock tower behind him, the man
headed for another district of the capital. This area bore a
starkly different atmosphere from the lively plaza.
It was where periodic auctions were held. Tonight however,
the auction house was quiet, with only guards stationed at
its front entrance.
He had brought Elise here once.
It had been to purchase jewelry for her to wear. At the time,
he had used the excuse that it was for private
entertainment in his chambers, but now he understood the
truth.
He had wanted to fill her arms with gifts.
Like an animal flaunting his strength and territory to a mate,
he had wanted to show her that he could provide her these
things.
That he could win her over.
But Elise, as it turned out, had been captivated by small,
simple things rather than anything extravagant or
expensive.
Street magic, fleeting blooms that faded as quickly as they
appeared… such trivial wonders.
‘So… the bouquet was from you, Your Grace?’
‘Thank you. I didn’t expect it at all, but it makes me
so happy…’
It had been nothing more than a common bouquet bought
from a street vendor, not even delivered by him personally
but through Michael.
Yet she had been genuinely thrilled, her gratitude and joy
shining through.
He had felt a twisted sense of satisfaction, thinking that his
trap had worked. That she was yielding to him, that she was
becoming malleable to his desires.
The bouquet had, in truth, been an unconscious gesture of
guilt.
‘If you like it, shall I get you more next time?’
Despite her surprise, she had nodded eagerly.
So why hadn’t he bought her flowers again?
A bouquet was such a simple thing to give.
His jaw tensed as he clenched it, suppressing the urge to
strangle himself for his past neglect. Instead, he wandered
the streets aimlessly, retracing the places they had visited
together.
And yet, no matter where he went, he couldn’t piece
together her smiling face.
The vibrant scenes of those days were clear, but her face
remained an indistinct blur.
Time drifted further back, to the early days of summer.
“Your Grace!”  
The opera house manager spotted him and rushed out to
greet him, though his steps faltered briefly when their eyes
met.
Something about the duke’s heavily shadowed face sent a
chill down the man’s spine.
Even so, the manager straightened himself and politely
addressed Cardale, lightly rubbing his goosebump-covered
arms.
“Please, come inside. It’s gotten quite cold these days.
Perhaps you’d like a cup of warm tea…?”
Despite his unease, he maintained his courteous tone. It
was, after all, his duty as the opera house’s manager to
tend to their greatest patron.
Cardale spoke, his voice low.  
“…Is the performance still running?”
“Pardon?”  
The manager blinked in confusion, following Cardale’s gaze
to a poster on the wall, then hastily responded.  
“Ah, yes! It is. Audiences seem to prefer warm venues in the
winter. However, there’s no performance tonight, so…”  
Sensing Cardale’s mood, the manager trailed off, unsure
how the duke might react to his wasted trip.
“I’d like to look around the performance hall.”
“Of course, you’re welcome to but are you sure—?”
“Excuse me.”  
Ignoring him, Cardale walked past the man and entered the
empty performance hall. He headed for the private box he
had purchased in his name, leaving the manager trailing
nervously behind him.
“Your Grace, shall I have tea brought up?”
“I’ll manage on my own. Go about your business.”
The clear dismissal left the manager swallowing hard.
“Of course… If you need anything, please call.”
With that, he hurriedly left, as if fleeing the tension in the
air.
Click.  
The door to the private box closed behind Cardale.
He slowly surveyed the interior.
It felt as if time had stood still, the hall was unchanged since
the last day he had been here with Elise.
She had loved the opera.
Even after seeing the same performance two or three times,
she still marveled as if it were her first.
Of course, Cardale had enjoyed the opera in his own way.
Holding her trembling, pleasure-drunk body in his arms as
she stifled moans with her hands… He had thought it was
mere lust but realized now it had been something more.
It had been fulfillment.
The way she relied on him, surrendered to him—it had been
intoxicatingly sweet.  
‘A poor production.’  
A sneering voice echoed in his mind. His own voice.  
Ah, that night had been the premiere of a new opera.
Elise had been looking forward to it for weeks.
While she had been enraptured by the performance, he had
found it irritating. Annoying and grating in a way he couldn’t
explain.
Seeing her standing opposite Raymond Hartmann had been
the final straw.
Already in a foul mood, the sight had sent him into a blind
rage. His bitterness spilled over, and the blame landed
squarely on her.
He had dragged her out of the opera, not even letting her
finish the show she had so eagerly anticipated.
‘You begged to be taken in when you were desperate.
And now that you’re comfortable, you’re reminiscing
about your ex-fiancé?’
‘That’s not it, I…’
‘If that’s the case, you shouldn’t have sold yourself in
the first place.’
Her tear-filled eyes and trembling lips as she tried to hold
back sobs—it had been a cruel, cutting scene.
‘What are you crying for?’
‘I’m sorry…’
She had hurriedly wiped her tears and apologized, even as
her eyes turned red.  
Her weeping face was so vivid in his memory. He could see
it clearly, whether his eyes were open or shut, as if it had
been burned into his mind.
Cardale clenched his fists as he recalled the scene.
“You… What did you have to apologize for?”
If anyone should have begged for forgiveness, it was him.
He had been the one to trample and wound her so cruelly.
“Don’t cry, Elise.”
But she didn’t seem to hear him.  
Instead, she knelt before him.
And then, dozens of Elises appeared, surrounding him from
all sides.

They were all crying, each in a different place, wearing a
different outfit.
‘Your Grace…’
‘I was wrong. Please forgive me.’
‘I’ll beg like this…’
Tears streamed down their faces, their expressions twisted
in anguish. They prostrated themselves miserably, hands
clasped together in desperate supplication.
The harrowing sight left the man momentarily dazed. When
he came to his senses, he hastily approached one of the
women.
“No, you did nothing wrong. You don’t need to beg like
this…”
He grasped her delicate hand, supporting her as she knelt
on the floor, and pulled her up. Taking out a handkerchief
from his pocket, he gently wiped her tear-streaked face. But
the countless Elises around him were still weeping.
In a frenzy, Cardale moved to the next Elise, and then the
one after that, lifting each from the ground.
Yet as soon as he shifted, the Elise he had just comforted
began to cry again, tears streaming down her face once
more.
‘I’m sorry… someone like me…’
‘I was out of line…’
‘I dared to carry your child.’
‘Please forgive me. Have mercy. Spare my child.’
‘Please believe me. It’s your child, Your Grace…’
The heart-wrenching cries poured over Cardale, searing his
very being. The humiliation and grief his woman must have
felt tore his heart to shreds.
His voice wavered with pain as he muttered,
“Back then, those words…”
He had pretended to doubt the child’s paternity, threatening
her with the horrifying prospect of selling the baby into
slavery.
“…I didn’t mean it.”
His low voice trembled faintly, filled with despair as he
clawed through his guilt.
“I never believed it wasn’t my child. I never truly intended
to harm the baby…”
Overcome with fury, he had hurled thoughtless, cruel words
at her. Shattering the fragile strength she had barely
managed to hold onto.
He loathed himself for the sins he had committed.
Why hadn’t he been overjoyed? Why hadn’t he been
grateful for her fragile, delicate body for carrying his child?
Why hadn’t he listened to her when she, worn down and
vulnerable, had spoken of her fears? Instead, he had let
rage consume him.
Why hadn’t he pitied the frightened woman?
“Please… don’t cry.”
Cardale enveloped the Elise before him in his arms as
though to shield her.
“It was my fault… I was the one who was wrong.”
In an instant, the sobbing ceased.
Simultaneously, the presence in his arms vanished without a
trace. Cardale’s eyes shot open in shock.
“Elise?”
The woman who had been in his embrace was gone. The
empty box seat was steeped in heavy silence.
Standing amidst the ruins of his hallucination, Cardale
stared blankly, trying to comprehend an impossible reality.
“…Elise.”
My sins against you are so vast and profound that even in
waking moments, I see you in my dreams.
A bitter smile tugged at his lips.
It was only a phantom, not truly you.
The one who deserved his genuine apology had already left
his side. All that remained now was the ache of
overwhelming longing.
It was hard to believe it had been only a fortnight since she
left. Each day felt excruciatingly unbearable. When he
allowed himself to imagine how much longer he might have
to endure this, the thought filled him with dread.
Cardale clenched his teeth.
I do not regret it.
How could I dare to speak of regret? That was the only way
to save her.
Elise had found peace with her family. She was said to be
happier than ever. That was what he had been told.
That she had finally regained the laughter she had lost here.
Ah. 
He let out a short sigh. He had momentarily forgotten what
he had been searching for just moments ago.
Elise’s smile.
He couldn’t stop until he had found it, until he had etched it
into his heart and mind.
“There’s still…”
One place he had yet to visit.
Cardale stumbled out of the opera house.
The manager caught sight of him, but the dark expression
on his face silenced any words of greeting.
Climbing into his horse, Cardale seized the reins. His grip
was so tight that his knuckles turned white.
A sharp whinny broke the cold silence.
The horse came to a halt, its breath visible in the chilly night
air.
The lakeside was desolate. Boats that had once floated on
the water through autumn were now securely moored,
waiting for the warm season.
Soldiers, planning to relax with their comrades in the
outpost, spotted the lone figure approaching the lake and
hurried out in alarm.
They were soon dumbstruck with astonishment.
First, because the man was none other than the Duke of
Basenberg, and second, his face bore an expression so
hollow and desolate that he looked utterly broken.
It wouldn’t have been hard to believe he had come to the
lake to end his life.
The blood-red eyes, glinting with a dry madness, swept over
the soldiers, nearly drawing a scream from their throats.
“I’ll take a look around.”
“O-of course, Your Grace.”
None dared refuse. The air around him radiated an ominous
intensity that made the idea of denying him unthinkable.
Besides, they reasoned that the boats were secure, and no
one else was around. What could possibly happen?
“Just… don’t go into the water. It’s colder and deeper than it
looks.”
One of them called after him, more out of duty than any real
concern as Cardale walked away.
He gave no response, heading straight for the lakeshore.
Step by step, the scenery around him began to shift.
The brittle leaves underfoot were replaced with soft clover.
Bare branches transformed, bursting with tender green
leaves. The cold night air warmed to a gentle spring breeze.
And when all around him was suffused with the light and
warmth of spring, Elise appeared.
‘Your Grace.’
She stood aboard a small boat, her blue eyes blinking at him
in the sunlight.
Rippling waves sparkled under the warm rays of the sun.
Cardale remembered her next words before she even spoke.
‘I’ve never done anything like this before. Riding a
boat, or seeing a lake…’

‘Thank you so much.’
Though he knew it was a mere echo of the past, his throat
tightened. If only he could return to that moment, he would
pay any price.
Swallowing his anguish, he managed to steady himself and
responded to the woman waiting for his reply.
“…Yes.”
And then it happened.
Her bright eyes curved with pure joy. Her pale cheeks
flushed a delicate pink.
Elise’s smile.
What he had been searching for, wandering so desperately.
Cardale’s heart swelled to the brim.
Ah, your smile, your laughter—I’ve finally found it…
He etched her face into his heart over and over, determined
never to lose it again. At least for as long as his heart still
beat, he would remember.
In hindsight, it was clear as day.
Even then, even from the beginning…
“Elise.”
Unconsciously, he reached out to her.
There was so much he wanted to say. So much he wanted to
convey.
His hand almost brushed against her when—
“…Your Grace.”
The world flipped.
Elise was now standing at the prow of the boat. Behind her,
a blood-red sunset burned ominously.
The smile that had lit her face moments ago was gone. In its
place was a tear-streaked visage, her expression filled with
anguish as she looked at him.
No.
The shock froze him in place.
‘The baby will go to heaven. I-I’ll make sure of that.’
His breath caught in his throat. It felt as if icy needles were
crawling through his veins, freezing him from the inside out.
‘It won’t have to live miserably… like I did…’
“No!”
A terrified scream ripped from him, his voice raw and
desperate. He knew what was about to happen.
He had to stop her. He had to reach her. But his body
refused to obey, as if rooted to the spot.
“Don’t do this, please.”
But she only looked at him with bitter reproach before
throwing herself into the lake.
“No!”
In that instant, the invisible chains holding him broke. He
leaped from the boat.
Splash!
The icy water engulfed him, its frigid grip slicing through his
skin.
It was a biting cold that could carve away his flesh. But
Cardale felt nothing.
“Elise!”
He reached for her as she sank deeper into the lake.
But she descended faster. Her face, pale as death,
disappeared further into the darkness with every second. He
could feel her life slipping away.
No, no, Elise, please…
You have to see your family. You wanted to meet the baby.
You wanted to live.
Deeper, he dove ever deeper. His legs churned tirelessly,
muscles straining to their limits.
But she only drifted further, swallowed by the shadowy
depths where no light could reach.
“Elise!”
His anguished cry was lost to the water, replaced by a
stream of pale bubbles.
Even as his lungs screamed for air, his eyes remained wide
open. He couldn’t lose her. He couldn’t let her die.
There was still so much he hadn’t done for her. So many
promises left unfulfilled.
He had never brought her the bouquet of roses she loved.
He had never taken her to the opera performance she had
eagerly awaited.
He had promised her outings—promises he had never kept.
“Your Grace!”
“Pull him up, quickly!”
As darkness crept into his vision, threatening to claim him,
Cardale continued to chase after her with every ounce of
strength he had left.
So please, give me just one more chance.
Elise…

The sudden drop in temperature had brought a variety of
warm items to Elise’s room.  
Her bedding was generously stuffed with cotton, a fluffy rug
covered the floor, and heavy curtains were hung to keep the
cold at bay.  
Next to the fireplace, neatly stacked dry firewood formed a
small mountain, ready for use at any moment.  
Wrapped in a soft blanket and cozy wool slippers, Elise woke
from a light nap on the sofa near the fireplace.  
‘It seems I dozed off again.’
She rubbed her eyes lightly with her fingers, brushing off
the remnants of sleep.  
Marissa and Damien had assured her it was normal for
expectant mothers to feel sleepy. But having been
conditioned by Vanessa’s nearly militant discipline not to be
idle, she couldn’t shake a tinge of guilt each time it
happened.  
A soft groan of frustration came from the opposite sofa.  
Her mother, sitting with a furrowed brow, was intently
writing—or rather, drawing—on a piece of paper.  
It was the unmistakable look of someone struggling with a
task. Watching her press her temples with her fingers made
Elise feel a pang of concern.  
“Mother, what are you working on?”
“Oh, you’re awake, my dear.”
Marissa looked up with a sheepish expression.  
“I’ve been learning how to write from Damien, actually.”
“Learning to write?”
Elise’s eyes widened in surprise.  
“Yes, but I keep second-guessing whether I’m writing the
words correctly.”
Elise blinked at her mother.  
Thinking back, she realized she too had been illiterate
before Vanessa had taught her. She could barely manage to
write rudimentary letters she’d picked up through
observation.  
“I’ve gotten so used to knowing how to write that I didn’t
even consider it.”
Her mother was likely no different from her younger self
back then.  
“Um, in that case…”
Elise tried not to stare too blatantly at her mother’s scrawl,
which was more of a sketch than handwriting, as she
spoke.  
“Would it be alright if I helped you a little?”
“You’d help me?”
“If you don’t mind me doing so.”
Elise felt a bit embarrassed as she added,  
“Damien graduated at the top of his Administrative Studies
program at the Imperial Academy. If I were you, I’d want to
learn from him instead of me. That’s only natural…”
Had she just spoken out of turn?  
Her confidence faltered, and she began fidgeting nervously
with her hands.  
“Really?”
Her mother’s delighted voice perked up her ears. Peeking
shyly, she saw Marissa’s face light up with genuine joy.  
“But aren’t you tired and sleepy from carrying the baby…?”
“Not at all!”
Marissa’s brief moment of hesitance made Elise shake her
head furiously, her voice rising in protest.  
“I just woke up from a nap, so I feel perfectly fine! I’m not
tired at all!”
Her daughter’s spirited reaction drew a hearty laugh from
Marissa.  
“It’s only a little help, really.”
Elise, now slightly flustered, covered her mouth as she
joined in with a soft laugh.  
“But don’t overdo it, alright? Let me know if it gets to be too
much.”
“I will.”
As soon as she spoke, Elise rose and moved to sit beside her
mother.  
“What words were you trying to write?”
“Ah, let me see…”
Before long, the two were engrossed in their work. Marissa
frequently expressed her amazement at her daughter’s neat
handwriting.  
“How is it that my daughter even writes so beautifully?”
“It’s really nothing special.”
“It’s far from ordinary.”
Elise waved her hands in embarrassment, brushing off the
praise, but Marissa was having none of it.  
“I may have awful handwriting myself, but I know what’s
good.”
Lowering her voice conspiratorially, she added,  “Between
you and me, this is a secret, but compared to your
handwriting, Damien’s is downright illegible.”
“What?”
Elise’s eyes widened in shock.  
Her intelligent and capable brother, poised to inherit the
family estate, had… bad handwriting?  
“Really?”
“Absolutely. Frankly, half the blame for my messy
handwriting lies with Damien.”
Marissa was just about to shift responsibility for her own
handwriting onto her son when—  
“You wouldn’t be bad-mouthing me now, would you?”

“Why the silence? Elise, would you care to explain?”
Marissa froze, clamming up instantly, while Elise offered an
awkward smile.  
She couldn’t lie to Damien, but neither could she tell the
whole truth.  
“I made time out of my busy schedule to teach with utmost
dedication, and this is what I hear in return?”
“I don’t know what you’re talking about.”
Feigning ignorance, Marissa deftly changed the subject.  
“Speaking of which, look at Elise’s handwriting. Have you
ever seen such elegant script?”
“Let’s take a look.”
Seeing through the blatant attempt to change the topic but
choosing to humor her, Damien leaned in to inspect the
page.  
When it came to his mother and sister, he had an infinite
capacity to indulge them.
“Truly, your handwriting is neat and graceful.”
Damien’s sincere praise left Elise a little flustered but
undeniably pleased.  
She suddenly recalled compliments about her handwriting
from her time at the duke’s estate.  
“Maybe I can even be of help to my brother.”
Damien was incredibly busy.  
Though he always made time to visit her and their mother,
even dined with them when he wasn’t out. Elise knew how
tightly packed his schedule was.  
“And it’s probably even busier because of me.”
The thought stirred a desire to help him.  
“Actually, back at the duke’s estate…”
Elise began recounting tasks she’d handled there, hoping
that at least one might prove useful to Damien.  
But the more she spoke, the darker his expression grew.  
“It sounds like they worked you to the bone.”
The clench in his jaw was audible, and Elise hastily tried to
backtrack.  
“It wasn’t really that bad…”
“Exploiting labor without proper compensation is called
abuse. This is almost report-worthy…”
“I was paid!”
Startled, Elise quickly interrupted.  
“I received fair compensation for my work.”
“Yet I distinctly recall you having no money to your name.
And you’re not the type to waste it frivolously.”
Her brother’s pointed observation gave her pause.  
“That money…”
She remembered using the savings she had painstakingly
gathered to buy a cravat pin for the Duke’s birthday.  
The pin, its color reminiscent of his dusky sunset eyes, had
been a gift she had poured her heart into.  
When he had accepted it graciously and even allowed her to
pin it on his cravat herself—  
“Did you know?”
“Pardon?”
“It’s an old tradition, now obsolete, but once upon a time
only a wife could tie her husband’s cravat.”
…She had been elated, her heart fluttering with joy.  
It had been a moment that felt like a fleeting dream.  
“Elise?”
Damien’s voice brought her back to the present.  
“Oh, I was paid in goods.”
Taking advantage of the convenient excuse that popped into
her head, she added,  
“You both saw the things the duke sent with me, didn’t
you?”
Even Elise had been taken aback when she first saw the
luxurious and expensive items from the duke’s estate.  
She had never considered them hers, assuming they were
merely borrowed.  
But Damien had assured her otherwise, explaining that they
were sent on the duke’s direct orders and belonged to her.  
“As you can see, I received far more than I worked for.”
She unconsciously defended Cardale, unaware of what she
was doing.  
“If you say so.”
Damien sighed lightly and nodded.  
“Is there anything I can do to help?”
“Just live freely and comfortably here. Take up a hobby or
learn something new if you like.”  
“But what I really want to do is help you, brother.”
At her earnest words, Damien couldn’t help but smile in
resignation.  
“My little sister is too kind for her own good.”
He ruffled her hair gently, his affection evident.  
“If you insist, we’ll take things slow. Don’t push yourself.”
Repeating their mother’s advice, he earned a bright smile
and a nod from Elise, who deeply appreciated their care.  
“Oh, that reminds me. There’s some news I need to share
with you both.”
“What is it?”
Elise and Marissa exchanged glances before looking at
Damien.  
“An invitation from the Imperial Palace has arrived.”
He produced a golden envelope from his pocket and set it
before them.  
“The Crown Prince recently announced his engagement, and
a celebratory banquet is to be held soon.”
“A banquet?”
“Yes, and during the event, His Majesty the Emperor will
officially proclaim my succession to the title of Count.”
Elise’s eyes widened before she broke into an excited
exclamation.  
“Oh my goodness, congratulations, brother!”
“That’s wonderful news.”
Marissa beamed with pride.  
For Damien, whose lineage had always been a point of
contention, the Emperor’s official declaration in a public
setting would be a tremendous boon.  
The two women showered him with heartfelt
congratulations, their joy genuine and unrestrained.  
Then Marissa, as though suddenly remembering, asked,  
“Who will be your partner for the banquet?”

A flash of discomfort crossed Damien’s face, but he quickly
composed himself and replied nonchalantly.  
“I’ll decide soon.”  
However, both Marissa and Elise understood the true
meaning behind his words.  
Elise’s expression dimmed slightly.  
‘Does my brother… not have anyone to accompany him as a
partner?’
The rigid and exclusionary nature of the empire’s
aristocracy seemed to have created significant obstacles for
Damien as well, given his background as a child born out of
wedlock.  
Even if no one dares to treat him poorly to his face as a
count, there might still be subtle discrimination at play.
Elise couldn’t forget her first debutante ball.  
It had felt like being thrown into a jungle teeming with
predators, forced to endure while keeping a low profile to
avoid being devoured.  
Suddenly, memories of that time surfaced.  
‘There’s no need to dirty Her Highness’s hands further, is
there?’
‘Does that girl bother you?’
‘His Majesty wouldn’t want his rare evening gala ruined,
would he?’
The person who had saved her when she couldn’t even lift
her head before the noble royals.  
Whether it was just a fleeting whim or a moment of charity,
he would never know how deeply that brief kindness had
taken root in her heart, or how much she cherished the
memory of it.  
Elise pushed aside the bittersweet memory that pricked her
heart and instead thought of Damien.  
‘Back then, the Duke helped me, but my brother has no one
to help him.’
She knew all too well how difficult and exhausting it was to
bear the weight of others’ piercing gazes alone, and it made
her feel even more upset.  
Determined to help him, Elise hesitantly spoke up.  
“What if… I went with you, brother?”  
“You?”  
Damien looked surprised, as did Marissa. Elise glanced
nervously between them before continuing cautiously.  
“If you don’t have a partner chosen yet… would it be a
bother if I went with you?”  
“A bother? Of course not!”  
Damien quickly shook his hands in denial.  
“Having you as my partner would be perfect. I just worry
that attending the ball might be too much for you….”  
Elise glanced down at her stomach and replied. She thought
it felt slightly firmer than before, but visually, there was little
difference from before her pregnancy.  
“It’s not noticeable yet. I wouldn’t tarnish your honor—”  
“That’s not what I meant.”  
Damien interrupted hastily, his tone flustered.  
“I’m only worried it might be a burden on your body. That’s
the only reason I didn’t bring it up.”  
“If that’s the concern, I’ll be fine. I can do it.”  
“But the ball will be held in the evening, and you’d need to
stay alert the whole time….”  
Damien’s gaze was filled with concern, and Marissa, also
tried to dissuade her.  
“Sweetheart, I understand you want to help Damien, but
there’s no need to push yourself to the point of harming
your health.”  
“I won’t overdo it. I can go carefully and come back safely.”  
“Are you sure about this?”  
Elise nodded firmly, her face reflecting her unwavering
determination.  
Seeing that, Damien realized he could no longer stop her.  
He knew his sister was one who rarely voiced her opinions
or desires. This was the first time she had ever expressed
what she wanted so openly.  
“In that case, how about this?”  
Damien proposed a compromise that would respect her wish
to help while ensuring her health and the baby’s safety.  
“We’ll attend together, but if you feel tired or unwell, you’ll
leave early.”  
Elise’s face brightened at his suggestion, as though she
hadn’t expected him to agree.  
“I’ll do that!”  
“But if you feel even the slightest discomfort, you must say
so immediately. And if I think you look fatigued, you’ll come
home without argument.”  
“I promise. I’ll do as you say.”  
Elise sealed her agreement by hooking her pinky finger with
Damien’s, then did the same with Marissa, making the same
earnest promise.  
It was then, as she turned her gaze toward the window by
pure chance.  
“Oh…?”  
A soft gasp escaped her lips.  
Her sparkling blue eyes filled with awe as she froze,
captivated by the scene outside. Damien and Marissa
followed her gaze.  
“Oh my, it’s the first snow!”  
Marissa clapped her hands in delight.  
Outside, pure white snowflakes fell silently, covering the
world in a soft, snowy blanket.  
As if entranced, Elise stood and approached the closed
window. Beyond the clear glass, the landscape was
gradually turning white.  
She reached out to touch the windowpane, and a single
snowflake landed on her fingertip, melting instantly against
the glass.  
“Make a wish, Elise,” Damien said gently, coming up behind
her.  
“A wish…?”  
“They say that wishes made on the first snow always come
true. It may just be a superstition, but it’s still fun to
imagine your dreams coming true, isn’t it?”  
Elise blinked rapidly, then replied, “But all of my wishes
have already come true….”  
Damien smiled warmly and encouraged her again.  
“Even so, take a moment to ask your heart. Maybe there’s a
wish you haven’t realized yet, quietly waiting to be heard.”  
It seemed he wanted her to make a wish. Marissa, too, had
closed her eyes to silently make her own.  
Feeling swept up in the moment, Elise closed her eyes.  
A wish hidden in my heart…  
Slowly, things she hadn’t seen before began to surface—
fragments of memories, faint traces of emotions.  
Before she realized it, Elise found herself pressing her face
against her clasped hands, as if in prayer.  
One lingering regret she hadn’t yet let go of transformed
into a fervent hope and carried itself on a tiny snowflake.  
  
Michael cautiously observed his master’s mood.  
The night the Duke of Vassenberg had been pulled from the
freezing winter lake, the entire estate was thrown into a
state of shock. Yet alongside their horror was relief that their
master had been rescued unharmed.  
Truthfully, had it not been for the exceptional physical
resilience innate to the Vassenberg bloodline, any ordinary
man would have succumbed to hypothermia long before
being saved.  
By dawn the following morning, the Duke had already
awakened.  
He rose from his bed as if nothing had happened, despite
the pleas of the senior steward and his advisors to rest for a
few days.  
After washing himself, he dressed impeccably and headed
straight for his study.  
At least he’d complied with the physician’s orders to take
his prescribed medication for lowering his fever.  
While his physical condition seemed to improve, the deeper
issue remained unresolved.  
He barely ate, slept irregularly, sometimes going days
without rest, and was consumed by an inescapable inner
torment.  
Day by day, the Duke’s complexion worsened. Dark circles
shadowed his eyes, and his face grew pale.  
Though his sharp crimson gaze retained its striking clarity,
making it difficult for outsiders to notice his condition, those
who served him could not miss it.  
As a result, unease and worry began to fester among his
retainers.  
They knew their master was holding on for now, but
eventually he would reach his limit.  
“I don’t know how many times a day I go back and forth on
whether we should contact Lady Elise,” Norman confided in
Linda, unable to hide his frustration after witnessing the
Duke’s decline.  
“But you know the Duke wouldn’t allow it, Butler Norman.”  
“I do. That’s why we’re stuck here, feeling helpless.”  
Their discussions always circled back to the same
conclusion: there was no easy solution.  
A few days later, the first snow of the season fell over the
capital, Inghel.  
“Your Grace, it’s snowing.”  
At Michael’s words, Cardale looked up from the documents
he was reviewing. As usual, Michael instinctively scanned
his master’s face as he added,  
“It seems this will be a long winter.”  
Last autumn, the Duke had initiated an early hunt, thinning
out the population of predators in the surrounding forest. It
was fortunate foresight, albeit unintentional.  
Michael sighed in relief, grateful that they would not need to
rely on Cardale’s participation in any upcoming winter
hunts.  
But then—  
Click.  
“Your Grace?”  
To Michael’s shock, Cardale stood and reached for his
hunting rifle.  
“Prepare for a winter hunt.”  
Michael was stunned.  
Winter hunts typically began around the first snowfall, but
given the Duke’s current state, it had been assumed this
year’s hunt would be postponed, much like the previous
winter hunt during the war.  
“But your body hasn’t fully recovered yet!”  
“I’m fine.”  
Ignoring the protest, Cardale continued issuing detailed
instructions.  
“Select an elite team. We’ll go straight to the central region
where the silver fox dens are.”  
“Your Grace!”  
The plan to venture deep into the most dangerous part of
the forest left Michael in a state of alarm.  
Just then, Norman entered the study, carrying a letter on a
silver tray.  
“Your Grace, an invitation has arrived from the Imperial
Palace.”  
Cardale’s gaze briefly flicked to the gilded envelope before
returning to his rifle, as if the Crown Prince’s engagement
was of no concern to him.  
Norman, however, seemed prepared for this reaction.
Calmly, he added,  
“The letter mentions that Count Damien Schuvan’s official
title confirmation will also be announced at the event.”  
The Duke’s hand froze mid-motion.  

“Count Damien Schuvan would undoubtedly attend the
banquet. And if so…”  
Cardale entertained a possibility—a faint hope.  
Perhaps the woman he wished to see, even in his dreams,
might accompany her brother to the event.  
“They’ve asked for a reply within the week. What shall I tell
them?”  
Cardale inhaled deeply, almost as if rehearsing how to
breathe. His chest rose heavily and then sank slowly.  
After a moment, he spoke to the butler, who likely already
anticipated his answer.  
  
“I wanted to get you a new dress…”  
Damien sounded regretful, but Elise smiled as she shook her
head.  
“There was no helping it, brother. Your thoughtfulness alone
is more than enough. Please don’t feel bad.”  
The unexpected nature of the banquet left them pressed for
time. By then, all renowned boutiques had their custom
dress schedules fully booked.  
Even with all the tailors mobilized, they would barely
manage to complete one or two dresses in such a short
time, so it was understandable.  
“Still, it feels unfair to be the only one in a new outfit,”
Damien muttered, awkwardly scratching the back of his
neck.  
“There’s no need to feel bad. This day is meant to celebrate
you, after all,” Elise replied.  
“Strictly speaking, the event’s focus is His Highness the
Crown Prince,” Damien pointed out.  
“But I… I’d much rather celebrate your succession to the
countship than the Crown Prince’s engagement.”  
Her shy response brought a gentle smile to Damien’s lips.  
“Thank you for saying that.”  
He felt proud of his younger sister for finally starting to
assert herself.  
At first, Elise had struggled to speak her mind, often
hesitating and second-guessing her words.  
But spending most of her days with their mother, learning to
value herself, had changed her.  
Ever since she began assisting with some of the family’s
affairs—tasks Damien had previously managed alone—her
confidence had gradually grown.  
‘She’s been an immense help.’  
With Elise taking over some responsibilities, the suffocating
pace of Damien’s life had eased slightly.  
It allowed him to spend more time with both her and their
mother, a change that ultimately benefited the entire
family.  
“Don’t worry too much, Damien,” Marissa said as she
opened the doors to the dressing room. “Elise already has
several beautiful dresses to choose from.”  
Inside, rows of exquisite muslin gowns fit for any ballroom
lined the racks.  
There were also delicate silk shoes embroidered with
intricate patterns, long white gloves that reached the elbow,
elegant lace shawls, and finely crafted jewelry.  
Most of these lavish items had been sent to Elise by
Cardale.  
“Whatever she chooses, our Elise will be the most beautiful
of all. I guarantee it,” Marissa declared.  
“Oh, that’s not true,” Elise said, her cheeks flushing pink
with embarrassment. She waved her hands in protest, but
Damien joined in, supporting Marissa’s claim.  
“I’m concerned as well. She’ll undoubtedly be the most
striking lady there, and everyone at the banquet will be
dying to speak with her.”  
He even went a step further.  
Embarrassed by their exaggerated praise, Elise’s face
turned bright red, her ears glowing as well.  
“Damien, make sure to keep an eye on her,” Marissa
added.  
“Of course. I’ll ensure no unsavory characters dare approach
her, Mother. You needn’t worry about a thing.”  
Damien’s voice carried a note of wariness, as if anticipating
wolves in sheep’s clothing lurking among the guests.
Marissa nodded in agreement.  
“You two…”  
Elise gave up trying to argue and instead turned her
attention to the dresses lined up before her.  
Though they looked similar, each had unique features—and
the memories they held.  
‘This is what I wore on my first outing with the Duke…’  
The day they went boating, the day she had her clothes
tailored, the day they visited the opera house, and the day
they dined at an upscale restaurant…  
Elise’s steps moved slowly along the rack as her fingers
lightly brushed the delicate fabrics. Her azure eyes
shimmered faintly, reflecting her thoughts.  
Then she suddenly stopped in her tracks.  
‘This dress…’  
A familiar white gown caught her eye—one she could never
forget.  
It was the dress she had worn for her debutante ball.  
The dress that had been ruined when crimson wine was
spilled all over it, was now pristinely white once more.  
‘I thought it had been discarded…’  
Back then, she’d been told the stains had set in too deeply
to salvage it, and would leave noticeable marks.  
When she asked if she could keep the damaged dress,
Vanessa had firmly denied her.  
‘If you become the Duke’s mistress, he’ll adorn you with far
grander garments than this. So stop fussing over a ruined
dress and focus on how to win his favor.’  
At the time, she hadn’t understood why she’d felt such an
inexplicable attachment to that dress.  
“You’re looking at that dress, aren’t you?”  
A voice from behind startled Elise.  
Damien and Marissa stood nearby. Damien spoke gently.  
“I heard it was your debutante dress. Is that right?”  
Elise nodded, though she looked up at him with some
hesitation.  
“But I was told the stains were beyond repair…”  
“They were,” Damien admitted. “But it seemed such a
waste to leave a good dress neglected.”  
“How…?”  
Elise looked back at the dress. It was astonishingly flawless,
as though it had never been marred.  
“I contacted the tailor who originally made it,” Damien
explained, a hint of pride flickering in his expression.  
“I asked if it could be restored while preserving as much of
its original design as possible.”  
Although some parts had required new fabric, other sections
were salvageable. After passing through the hands of a
skilled artisan, the dress was restored to its former glory.  
They could have remade it entirely, but Damien chose the
more intricate route because of the dress’s sentimental
value.  
“This was the dress my sister wore on her first foray into
high society. Of course, it’s my duty to make sure it’s
cherished for years to come.”  
Touched by his thoughtfulness, Elise felt a lump form in her
throat.  
“All that trouble, just because of me…”  
“I only made the request. The real effort came from the
tailor. Don’t worry—I paid handsomely for their work,”
Damien replied lightly, flashing her a grin.  
Beside him, Marissa winked mischievously.  
“The tailor actually came by a few days ago to collect
payment. They said your brother was so insistent on
perfection that they almost gave up halfway!”  
“But they were happy enough to accept a bonus for their
troubles,” Damien added with a shrug before turning back
to Elise.  
“So, have you decided which dress you’ll wear to the
banquet?”  
“Yes,” Elise said without hesitation, her cheeks faintly
flushed as a bright smile lit up her face.  
“There’s one dress I absolutely want to wear. It’s the most
perfect dress in the world.”  
  
Despite Cardale’s decision to attend the banquet,
preparations for the winter hunt proceeded as planned.  
Michael and the other retainers repeatedly pleaded with
their master to reconsider, citing his poor health and the
extreme conditions of the hunt.  
Even the lord’s vassals who had largely kept their distance,
sent letters expressing their concerns.  
But Cardale remained unmoved. The heartfelt letters found
a new purpose as kindling for the study’s fireplace.  
The situation escalated to the point where the elders of
Brillion braved the harsh winter weather to journey to the
capital and confront their lord directly.  
“Your Grace,”  
The eldest of the council, his hair snow-white with age,
wasted no time with pleasantries and went straight to the
point.  
“Embarking on a winter hunt in your current condition is far
too dangerous.”  
Cardale regarded him impassively before replying in a flat
tone.  
“Weren’t you the one who reminded me that regulating the
forest’s predator population is the duty of the Duke of
Vassenberg?”  
“We’re simply asking for a delay. I’ve heard that thanks to
the autumn hunts, the situation isn’t urgent.”  
“Then it seems someone in my household has been
speaking out of turn,” Cardale remarked coldly.  
“Your Grace, please don’t misunderstand our loyalty.”  
The elders, who normally would have withdrawn at this
point, stood their ground.  
Seeing their master in person had only solidified their
resolve. His condition was far worse than they had feared.  
Cardale was the last remaining direct heir of the Vassenberg
lineage—and he was unmarried. Allowing this great
bloodline to end was unthinkable.

“The very purpose of the council’s existence is to ensure the
continuation of the lord’s lineage, is it not?”
With a resolute expression, the head elder reiterated his
plea.
“Safeguarding Your Grace’s health must take precedence.”
“The hunt will proceed as planned. Dismissed.”
“Your Grace!” 
Unable to alter the Duke’s decision, the head elder’s
concern spilled over, his frustration evident in his words. 
“You do not even have an heir yet! How can you stubbornly
cling to such reckless danger?”
“Elder!” 
The other council members urgently tried to restrain him,
and only then did he regain his composure.
“Is it an heir that concerns you?”  
The Duke’s voice, low and cavernous, reverberated
ominously through the room.  
“My apologies, Your Grace. I allowed my emotions to cloud
my judgment and spoke out of turn…”
“Then the issue is resolved.”
“Pardon?”  
Cardale’s words caught the elder off guard. He stared at the
Duke, perplexed. 
“My heir is safe and growing well,” Cardale declared.

The Duke’s revelation struck like a thunderclap. The elders,
stunned as though hit by a hammer, could hardly process
what they had heard.
‘An heir… from our unmarried lord?’
Most of them, long past their middle years, briefly
questioned if they had misheard. However, the expressions
of shock on each other’s faces confirmed that they had not. 
‘Why has this vital information been kept secret?’  
Their astonished gazes converged on Michael, the ever-stoic
steward. Despite their silent accusations, he remained
unfazed. His military bearing unbroken as he stared straight
ahead.
Finally the head elder, recovering his wits, stepped forward
to clarify the situation.
“Then, may we ask where the child is?”
After a pause, Cardale replied, “Still in the womb.”
The elders exchanged rapid glances, the same thought
crossing all their minds.
‘A child yet to be born…’
They remembered their visit the previous summer, when
they had come to the Duke’s estate much as they had
today. Back then, they had brought carefully curated profiles
of noble ladies of marriageable age. 
The effort was spearheaded by the Dowager Duchess of
Vassenberg, who had been incensed by her son’s refusal to
marry and his decision to take a mistress of unknown
origin. 
However, the council left empty-handed after meeting firm
resistance from the Duke, who made it clear he would not
tolerate interference. 
Not only had he dismissed all such proposals, but he had
also thoroughly protected the woman he chose to be by his
side. 
‘And now the Dowager Duchess is reportedly in a
sanatorium.’
None of the elders truly believed her condition was genuine.
They had long understood the perils of overstepping the
boundaries set by their lord.
Even so, their thoughts returned to the woman who had
managed to remain at Cardale’s side despite all obstacles,
earning their grudging admiration.
“Is the lady carrying the child… Lady Schuvan?”
“Yes.”
The Duke’s response was as direct as it was expected. The
elders immediately began recalculating their positions. 
Elize Schuvan, the illegitimate child of the former Count
Gerhard Schuvan, had a status wholly unsuitable for a
duke’s mistress, let alone his wife. 
But circumstances had changed.
Her brother, Damian Schuvan, was now the head of their
noble house, with his position legitimized by the emperor
himself. At the same time, Lady Elize was carrying a child
from the rare and revered Vassenberg bloodline.
‘And the Duke has already referred to the unborn child as
his heir.’
With the situation so clearly defined, further speculation was
pointless.
“When the child is born, they will be officially recognized as
my blood and successor to this house. Ensure that your
preparations reflect this.”
“Understood, Your Grace.”
The retainers and elders knew their task: to pledge
unwavering loyalty to the next head of the house. 
It was, in essence, a formal announcement of succession
that left no room for dispute.  
As the gravity of the situation settled, a strange relief
washed over the elders. Gradually, their expressions
brightened.
‘Upon reflection, this is a matter worthy of celebration.’
Though the sequence of events was unconventional, the
continuation of the noble lineage was cause for rejoicing—
not only for the Vassenberg family but for all its retainers.
“Your Grace, then… When will the wedding take place?”
The head elder, now more at ease, let his curiosity slip into
the open.
“Of course, the season is far from ideal, but before the child
is born, a wedding with Lady Elize would simplify the
procedures for securing the child’s status and succession…”
“Elder.”
The loyal elder, slightly carried away by his enthusiasm,
stopped mid-sentence when Cardale addressed him.
“Lord Walter?”
“My apologies for interrupting, but it is nearly time for Your
Grace’s meal, as reminded by the steward,” Michael
interjected smoothly.
“With such long journeys behind you, the elders are invited
to enjoy the fine accommodations and meals that His Grace
has prepared for you. Please make yourselves comfortable.”
Michael’s polite but firm insistence left the elders no choice
but to retreat. They filed out of the office, ushered along by
Michael’s steady presence.
“Your Grace, about the hunt schedule—!” 
The head elder, suddenly recalling the original purpose of
their visit, tried to call out. But by then, Michael had already
closed the door firmly behind them.
 
With the council removed, silence finally returned to the
study.  
Cardale resumed the work that had been interrupted by
their visit. Only the sound of a quill scratching against paper
broke the stillness.  
Yet even this rhythmic sound faltered, stopping and starting
as the Duke struggled to focus.  
His efficiency, once unmatched, had deteriorated. Tasks that
would have taken hours now stretched into days.  
“…Damn it.”  
Cardale set his quill down abruptly, muttering a curse under
his breath.  
The persistent ache at his temples felt like a warning bell,
and the sensation of sinking into an endless abyss weighed
heavily on him.  
The hunt was a means of escape—a desperate attempt to
find relief.  
While Michael, Norman, and the elders worried over his
physical health, they failed to grasp the deeper agony
gnawing at his mind.  
Cardale was haunted by Elize’s specter multiple times a
day, always in harrowing forms: weeping, falling from a cliff,
piercing herself with needles, or drowning in a lake…  
The torment of being unable to help her, of knowing he had
failed her, consumed him.  
The only thing tethering him to sanity was the conviction
that he must remain strong—for Elize and for the child they
would soon welcome.  
On the day of the first snowfall, standing beneath the falling
flakes, he had felt a brief reprieve from his suffocating
grief.  
Yes, he had planned this for months.  
A hunt when the snow arrived, one that would take him
deep into the heart of the forest.  
Since early autumn, he had worked to reduce the population
of predators in the area to allow the silver foxes to thrive.  
For their soft, white fur—perfect for a light yet warm coat he
had envisioned for her, a shield against the winter chill she
so disliked.  
  
Cardale knew all too well the harm he had inflicted upon
her.  
Yet he had dared to think of making her a coat. How foolish,
how arrogant he had been.  
This hunt, too, was not merely for sport but an attempt to
reconcile with emotions he could not name.  
It was a poor excuse, but he clung to it nonetheless.  
Cardale opened his drawer—again. A habit repeated
countless times daily.  
Inside lay a small box containing carefully preserved
letters.  
‘To His Grace, Duke Cardale Vassenberg.’
His gaze softened as he traced her handwriting on the
envelope.  
Yet he did not open it. He couldn’t—not yet.

Knowing what was written in the letters.
They were filled with apologies, tearful pleas for forgiveness,
and desperate requests for a chance—words written by an
innocent woman who had suffered.
Cardale began to take out the letters from the box, one by
one.
The letters were neatly addressed to him, her handwriting
measured and precise, as though every character was
placed with utmost care. She never allowed even a single
letter to be hastily written.
He hadn’t intended to keep them at first.
Yet, at the time, he found himself unable to burn or discard
them, so he had simply tucked them away in his desk
drawer.
Over time, the collection grew, becoming both his lifeline
and a record of his sins.

Cardale’s fingers grazed over a cream-colored envelope,
one that had remained untouched for some time.
It was the first letter he’d ever received from Elise.
‘I can’t count how many times she must have rewritten
these, as if it were the only thing she could do.’
The memories came flooding back, as vivid as if they
occurred just yesterday.
It had been on the way back to the estate after an outing
with Elise. At the mansion’s entrance, they encountered the
Dowager Duchess, waiting without notice.
She had come to exploit her position as Cardale’s mother.
Pushing her greed, discussing his marriage, bringing up an
heir, and even daring to covet what was his while glaring at
him with hostility.
“A maid’s bastard—imagine the filth she must have
debased herself with.”
Her insults had struck a nerve. How a person without any
rights or qualifications could dare to provoke him so.
For the first time, Cardale had felt such a visceral loathing
for Victoria Vassenberg, a woman for whom he had long
since shed any semblance of affection.
Yet, despite the barrage of contemptuous words, it wasn’t
herself Elise worried about—it was him.
“Why are you looking at me like that?”
“I’m… worried about you.”
She fretted over if he was hurt by insults that hadn’t even
scratched him.
“It just… made my heart ache.”
“Wounds like that don’t heal easily. They leave scars that
last…”
Perhaps it was her trembling figure, like a rain-soaked fawn,
or the sorrowful shimmer in her blue eyes.
For whatever reason, her demeanor unsettled him. Irritation
and agitation welled up inside him.
“Why? Do you feel pity for me?”
“After hearing about my past, did you suddenly muster up
some courage? Do you think you and I are in the same
boat?”
“Or do you believe spending one night with me has made
you something special?”
He had lashed out, deriding her for daring to sympathize
with him, dismissing her care as presumptuous and hollow.
He had scorned the pure-hearted intention behind her timid
efforts to console him, accusing her of trying to justify her
worth.
And yet…
Her warmth when she embraced him, her gentle hand
patting his back, her tender words whispered in comfort—
they had all stirred something within him.
It had been like the soft brush of a feather against his heart.
But he had buried those feelings, masking his vulnerability
and ignoring the unfamiliar emotions that rolled in his chest.
Instead of being grateful for her sincerity, he had trampled
on her fragile courage.

Cardale set the letter down.
One by one, he touched the second, third, and subsequent
letters. Reliving the memories of Elise and his own sins.
Each one was a painful reminder of his cruelty.
He had done this countless times before, yet the deeper he
delved into the past, the more his regret deepened.
At last, he reached the final letter.
[Your Grace, please have mercy on the child.]
From the day she had entered his life to the day she had
left, Elise had endured countless sorrows and hidden her
pain behind tears she shed alone.
She must have never felt even a moment of happiness by
his side.
“Ugh…!”
Again. The searing pain gripped his chest like molten metal
pouring into his heart.
Cardale clutched his chest and doubled over, his body
contorted in agony.
Desperately trying to stay conscious, he pressed his
forehead and cheeks against the cool surface of the desk.
Only after what felt like an eternity did the pain begin to
subside.
“Haa… haah…”
His breathing was ragged, and as he straightened himself,
his face bore the weariness of desolation.
Even though he knew it would be like this, he couldn’t stop
himself from taking out her letters time and time again.
The torment they brought was a small price to pay to feel
her presence, to endure his aching yearning for her.
It was enough to keep him going until he could face another
day.
Gingerly, he gathered the letters and returned them to their
box.
Then, his gaze fell upon a small jewelry case beside it. He
stared at it with a pained expression before reaching out.
The small velvet box, a deep blue, fit snugly in his palm.
It was a gift he had purchased on the way back from
rescuing her mother in the Schuvan estate, thinking of the
woman who would be waiting for him.
“It will take about a week.”
“Th-that long…?”
He remembered her face, how her emotions always
betrayed her thoughts. She had wanted to come with him
but hadn’t said so outright.
If I had taken you with me then, would you be smiling
beside me now?
Cardale closed his eyes and let himself imagine.
Elise, delighted to reunite with her mother. Her radiant smile
as she accepted his gift. A life where she hadn’t left him.
A version of himself who realized his feelings in time—a man
who held his pregnant lover’s hand and whispered his love
to her. A man who confessed his sins and pledged eternal
devotion before a priest.
The vision was intoxicatingly happy. And it was suffocatingly
painful.
Because he knew it was a fantasy he could never have.
He opened his eyes and lifted the lid of the jewelry case.
Inside was a ring. A gem as blue as her eyes sparkled
brilliantly.
Why had it been a ring?
There had been no special meaning. It had simply caught
his eye, and he thought it would suit her.
Though her hands were beautiful as they were, he had
wanted to place something on her bare finger, to leave a
mark of his affection.
If only he had given it to her then, perhaps the weight of his
guilt might have eased—if only slightly.
“What she needs is a kind and gentle man.”
Suddenly, the voice of Reymont Hartmann echoed in his
mind, sharp and derisive.
“Elise could never be happy with someone as selfish
and cold as you.”
Snap. The jewelry case shut with a decisive sound.
Cardale’s tightly shut eyes quivered, as if to hold back a
flood of emotion.

The day of the Crown Prince’s engagement celebration
dawned.
When Elise woke early and looked out the window, her
brows knitted slightly.
“The weather looks gloomy…”
Dark clouds blanketed the sky, promising rain.
“It’ll be fine. And my brother will be with me…”
Damien knew of her fear of rain and thunder. Marisa had
told him in advance, and he had seen her tense up on a
rainy day not long ago.
Knock, knock.
“Elise, may I come in?”
It was Damien. Seeing her standing by the window, he
nodded knowingly.
“I thought you might be worried after seeing the weather.”
“A little rain won’t bother me.”
Her attempt at sounding cheerful made Damien’s gaze
soften with concern.
“Even so, if it rains, it’s better not to go. Or leave the ball
early if it starts during the event.”
“But, Brother—”
She gently tugged at his arm and said, “Mother told me I
can’t avoid it forever. She said I have to face my fears
eventually.”
There was a quiet determination in her voice.
“Rain in winter is usually gentle. As long as there’s no
thunder or lightning, I’ll be okay.”
Damien looked at her, surprised.
Somewhere along the way, his fragile little sister had grown
stronger, her resolve as firm as a bird breaking free from its
shell.
It was time, he realized, to share something he had kept to
himself.
“Elise, there’s something I need to tell you.”
Perhaps, on this day of all days, it was the right moment.
“I went to see the Duke of Vassenberg.”
“The Duke…?”  
Elise’s eyes widened. Damien nodded and began to recount
their conversation.
He told her how Cardale had guaranteed her safety and the
child’s, promised to acknowledge the child as his heir, and
vowed to secure the baby’s rightful place in the Vassenberg
lineage.
“The Duke promised… to make the child his heir? But…”
“We signed a contract.”
Seeing Cardale’s signature in his familiar handwriting,
Elise’s eyes trembled with a storm of emotions.

“The child can decide later whether to inherit the
title of duke. For now, rest your worries about the
baby.”
Elize stared at the contract with trembling eyes, her gaze
lingering for a long time.
‘I don’t know much about contracts or negotiations…’
But she could tell that the contents of this contract were
extraordinary.
All the rights belonged to her, while most of the obligations
and responsibilities fell on him. It was a one-sided
agreement, favoring her completely.
‘Did Damien arrange this?’
He had mentioned visiting the duke in person. Perhaps there
had been a negotiation she wasn’t privy to, a trade or
sacrifice made on her behalf. 
Her father had once traded her for financial investments.
Could Damien have offered up Schuvan family assets or
even mortgaged his future to secure this?
Looking up, Elize cast a worried and uncertain glance at her
brother. Her expression reflected her unease.
“If that’s the case Brother, what did you offer the Duke in
return…?”
But Damien responded with a calm smile and shook his
head.
“The Duke of Vassenberg asked nothing from me in return.”
“What…?”
“He prepared this contract himself and handed it over.”
Elize blinked rapidly, struggling to believe his words.
‘Why would the Duke…?’
She couldn’t understand his reasoning. What could have
driven him to make such a decision?
“And there’s more you should know.”
As she tried to process her thoughts, Damien began to
speak again.
“It’s about the contract between Gerhard Schuvan and the
Duke of Vassenberg.”
Elize froze.
She was well aware of that contract. Cardale had shown it to
her himself, using it to issue a cold, terrifying warning.
Her father had sold her for money, and the contract bound
her to repay that debt by fulfilling her duties as a mistress.
Cardale’s cruel words from that day still echoed in her mind.
“Know your place. Don’t overstep. Your role is to please your
master.”
When Damien pulled out the contract, Elize’s eyes trembled
violently, like leaves in a storm.
‘Brother knows that I was the Duke’s mistress…’
Seeing the document, a wave of shame washed over her.
Even though she had sold herself to save her mother, she
felt small and insignificant compared to Damien, who had
risen from their father’s shadow to become a count. 
“Finding this in Gerhard Schuvan’s safe made me furious,”
Damien said in a measured tone.
“So much so that I wanted to kill them both.”
“B-Brother…”
“That’s why I went to see the Duke—without any plan or
care for the consequences.”
Damien’s lips curled into a bitter smile.
But instead of being turned away at the gates of the Duke’s
estate as he had expected, he was welcomed inside.
“I grabbed him by the collar and shouted in his face, but he
stayed perfectly still.”
“Y-You did that… to the Duke…?”
Elize gasped and clasped her hands over her mouth.
She couldn’t imagine her usually kind and gentle brother
acting so brashly. It was even more shocking that the Duke
had tolerated such disrespect.
“Then he handed me this contract.”
Damien lifted the document. Beneath it lay an identical
copy.
“One was the original from Gerhard Schuvan’s safe, and the
other was given to me by the Duke.”
He showed her both contracts, then rose to his feet. Moving
toward the fireplace, he dropped the papers into the roaring
flames.
The crimson fire devoured the documents in moments,
reducing them to blackened ash.
Watching the last of the papers burn away, Damien turned
back to Elize.
He wore a warm, reassuring smile filled with gentle comfort.
“You’re free now, Elize.”
Her lips parted, and a soft breath escaped her.
‘I’m… free…’
She had wondered about the contract from time to time—
while talking with her mother, assisting her brother, reading,
or embroidering by the fireplace.
She knew the Duke had arranged for her family’s safety and
granted her permission to stay here. But deep down, a
lingering fear had always gnawed at her.
What if he changed his mind? What if he summoned her
back to the estate? What if he took the baby away or
separated her from her family?
As long as the contract existed, she would remain his
possession.
But now…
‘The Duke… truly let me go.’
Tears welled up in her eyes, glistening like transparent
jewels.
‘He kept all his promises.’
He had saved her mother and ensured her recovery. He had
helped Damien become the head of the Schuvan family.
And all the while, he had held her as she broke down,
whispering words of assurance.
‘Nothing will happen to your child. I promise.’
‘I’ll guarantee your child’s status. Don’t worry.’
‘You’re not a slave.’
‘I won’t abandon you. Not you, nor your child.’
‘You need to recover your strength so you can see your
mother.’
Every word he had spoken was true. For the first time, Elize
could fully accept it.
“No one will hurt you anymore, Elize,” Damien said tenderly.
She nodded and smiled, her soft gaze shimmering with
tears that sparkled like precious gems.

The glittering chandeliers of the ballroom cast dazzling
lights across the grand hall.
Marble sculptures and gilded ornaments adorned the space,
while a gentle symphony played in the background, weaving
elegance and grace into the air.
Elize and Damien entered the opulent room together.
“Is that…?”
Nearby whispers reached Elize’s ears, making her tense.
She glanced nervously at Damien, fearing the nobles might
mock him for his illegitimate origins.
But the murmurs were not what she expected.
“They say he graduated at the top of his class from the
Academy’s Department of Administration.”
The speaker’s voice was slightly raised, as though meant to
be overheard.
“Of course, the Schuvan family must have entrusted the
estate to him for good reason.”
“Look at him—his stature, his demeanor… And their textile
business is thriving, isn’t it? He’s leagues ahead of most
young noblemen.”
Around them, heads nodded in agreement. Nearby ladies
fanned themselves discreetly, sneaking glances at Damien’s
striking figure.
‘I’m so relieved.’
Elize felt her heart settle, swelling with pride and joy.
She was proud of her brother, for overcoming prejudice and
standing tall as the rightful head of their family.
‘I want to be like him.’
She wanted to grow wiser, to develop the strength and
judgment needed to make the right choices. She wanted to
become a mother her child could be proud of.
It was why she had been spending more time in the library,
absorbing the knowledge Damien had encouraged her to
explore.
“If you get hungry, just say the word,” Damien whispered.
“I’ve already spotted some excellent finger foods. I’ll sneak
a few over for you.”
“Oh, Brother…” Elize giggled softly, covering her mouth with
her hand.
Just then, the herald’s voice rang out.
“His Grace, Cardale, Duke of Vassenberg, has arrived!”
Elize stiffened instinctively.
‘I knew he might come. It’s fine. Nothing will happen.’
Taking a deep breath, she turned toward the entrance.
Through the grand doors, Cardale entered.
The crowd parted like a wave, creating a clear path for him.
His polished leather boots struck the marble floor in
measured, deliberate steps, the sound echoing through the
now-silent hall.
As he passed, nobles bent their knees or bowed in
deference, but Cardale acknowledged no one, his focus
unbroken as he crossed the room.
“Still as striking as ever,” someone murmured, awestruck.
With his towering height, broad shoulders, and muscular
physique barely concealed by his tailored winter coat,
Cardale exuded an aura of commanding masculinity.
“But isn’t his cravat pin a bit odd?”
“Yes… It doesn’t look like rubies at all…”
Curious glances flitted toward the pin—a small, humble
piece that seemed out of place amidst his grandeur.
Elize stared at him, her eyes trembling.
‘That pin…’
She had given it to him for his birthday. It was a modest gift,
purchased with her hard-earned savings. She had wanted to
celebrate his special day, even though he seemed
indifferent to such occasions.
The pin, of far lesser value than what he was accustomed
to, had felt inadequate even in her own hands.
Yet here he was, wearing it to an imperial ball.
‘Did he truly mean it when he said it was pretty?’
‘Was he sincere back then?’
But then she noticed his face—and her heart dropped.
He looked pale and gaunt, as though ravaged by illness.
‘What happened to him?’
As worry clouded her thoughts, Cardale’s gaze shifted.
Their eyes met.
  
For a fleeting moment, it felt as though time itself had
stopped.  
But instead of shying away, Elise clenched her hands tightly,
grounding herself.  
‘There’s nothing to fear.’  
She reminded herself once again: Cardale was no longer her
master. She was free now, unbound by any leash. From this
moment forward, she would treat him not as a servant or
mistress but as a noble lady interacting with an equal.  
And once the child is born…  
Elise tried to push her thoughts further, but they faltered as
she noticed something in Cardale’s expression—a deep,
unfamiliar pain reflected in his crimson eyes.  
‘Duke…’  
It was an expression she had never seen on his face before.
His intense gaze flickered with a mixture of emotions she
couldn’t decipher, and for some reason, it seemed
overwhelmingly sorrowful.  
‘He looks… hurt. Miserable.’  
Her mind immediately dismissed the notion. She must have
been mistaken, misinterpreting his appearance.  
But she couldn’t ignore the dark shadows under his eyes,
the pallor of his face, and the slight hollowness in his
cheeks. Just observing him made an ache settle in her
chest.  
When that aching sensation crept into her heart, and her
clenched hands trembled ever so slightly, she was jolted
back to the present.  
“Elise.”  
Damien’s gentle voice accompanied a light touch on her
shoulder, pulling her out of her reverie. Turning around, she
met his concerned eyes.  
“Brother…”  
His worry was unmistakable—he had noticed the encounter
with Cardale and feared for her.  
“Are you alright?”  
“Of course. I’m fine,” she reassured him with a soft smile,
linking arms with him as if to prove her words. She
deliberately avoided glancing back in Cardale’s direction.  
‘I must have been imagining things. He’s… Cardale
Vassenberg—strong, unyielding, and impervious to any
weakness.’  
The idea of him being injured, ill, or even remotely regretful
felt absurd.  
Yet, no matter how much she told herself otherwise, a tiny
voice within her whispered that perhaps—just perhaps—he
might have felt even a sliver of the loss she had.  

Shortly after the Crown Prince entered with his fiancée, a
herald’s voice resonated across the grand hall.  
“His Imperial Majesty, the Emperor, enters!”  
The Emperor appeared, draped in a crimson cloak lined with
white ermine. The golden crown on his head sparkled
brilliantly under the chandeliers.  
“I extend my gratitude to all who have gathered here to
celebrate the engagement of my beloved son, Marius,” the
Emperor proclaimed, his deep voice commanding the
room.  
His lengthy congratulatory speech lauded the Crown Prince
and his betrothed, ending with a resounding cheer from the
gathered nobles, who raised their glasses in a toast.  
“And yet,” the Emperor continued, his gaze sweeping
meaningfully across the hall, “there is another who deserves
recognition today.”  
All eyes turned toward the Emperor as his attention landed
on Damien.  
“Count Schuvan,” the Emperor called.  
“Your Majesty,” Damien responded, stepping forward with
measured strides before kneeling on one knee before the
throne.  
The ceremony to formally bestow his title had begun.  
Elise watched the proceedings with pride swelling in her
chest.  
‘Mother would have been so proud to see this moment…’  
Though Elise and Damien carried half-noble blood, their
mother, Marisa, was a commoner. Furthermore, her
marriage to Gerhard Schuvan had never been formally
recognized, which complicated her ability to attend such
events.  
Not wanting to impose on her children’s delicate entry into
imperial society, Marisa had chosen to remain at home.  
‘I’ll make sure to tell her everything when we return.’  
Determined to commit every detail to memory, Elise
watched the ceremony with shining eyes.  
“I, Johann von Oldenhilt, Emperor of the Nordrat Empire,
hereby grant the title of Count Schuvan to Damien
Schuvan,” the Emperor declared, drawing a ceremonial
sword from the chamberlain’s hands.  
“Serve the Empire and the Crown with honor and loyalty.”  
The Emperor touched the blade lightly to Damien’s shoulder
and then to his head.  
“Congratulations, Count Schuvan.”  
Amidst thunderous applause, Damien rose to his feet,
acknowledging the ovation with composed grace.  
Watching her brother stand tall, now officially recognized by
the Emperor himself, Elise couldn’t contain her joy. She
beamed with pride, her heart swelling with a sense of
fulfillment.  
For too long, Damien’s heritage had been a source of
mockery. But now, with the Emperor’s blessing, no one
could dare to ridicule him again.  
“Let the festivities continue!” the Emperor announced. With
that, lively music filled the hall once more.  

As Damien returned to her side, Elise greeted him with
heartfelt congratulations.  
“Brother, I’m so proud of you. Congratulations!”  
“Thank you, Elise,” Damien replied with a warm smile,
visibly moved by her sincerity.  
Though he intended to enjoy the celebration briefly and
leave before the weather worsened, he was soon
surrounded by nobles eager to make his acquaintance.  
“Count Schuvan, I’d like to discuss a potential investment
opportunity. Could you spare a moment?”  
Caught between courtesy and his desire to stay by Elise’s
side, Damien hesitated.  
“Thank you for your offer, Marquis, but—”  
“Brother,” Elise interjected, placing a reassuring hand on his
arm.  
“You should go. Don’t worry about me.”  
“But, Elise—”  
“I’ll be fine. Go ahead.”  
Reluctantly, Damien let himself be persuaded. As he walked
away with the Marquis, Elise steeled herself.  
‘I’ll need to learn how to handle events like these on my
own someday. This is good practice.’  
Before she could settle into her thoughts, a cluster of
noblewomen surrounded her, their fluttering fans and
painted smiles belying their true intentions.  
“Lady Elise,” one of them began, her tone saccharine
sweet.  
“Congratulations,” another chimed in, her eyes glinting with
feigned sincerity.  
Elise responded politely, keeping her composure.  
“Thank you.”  
But as the conversation progressed, the barbs hidden in
their words became more evident.  
“How fortunate your brother is to receive his title. I daresay
you look happier than the Crown Prince’s fiancée tonight.”  
Elise remained silent, refusing to rise to the bait. She had
learned not to give them the satisfaction of a reaction.  
However, the women weren’t done.  
“I couldn’t help but notice the absence of Princess
Theresia,” one mused.  
“Indeed. Perhaps it feels strange without her presence,”
another added.  
Elise froze. Though she had heard of the tragic accident
from Damien, the mere mention of Teresia still sent a chill
down her spine.  
The noblewomen were quick to pounce on her hesitation.  
“Oh dear, Lady Elise, I hope we’re not making you
uncomfortable.”  
“Forgive us—we forgot how close the Princess was to the
Duke of Vassenberg.”  
Their true intentions were now unmistakable.  
‘This was their goal all along.’  
Even as she recognized the trap, it was too late to avoid it.  
Feigning indifference, Elise shook her head.  
“No, it’s fine,” she murmured, though the triumphant glint in
their eyes suggested they had already won.  
“By the way, Lady Elise,” one of them pressed on, “have
you had the chance to speak with the Duke this evening?”  
Their thinly veiled jabs were sharp and deliberate. They
reveled in the idea of Elise as a discarded mistress, no
longer under the Duke’s protection.  
Just as their words began to suffocate her, a deep, resonant
voice interrupted.  
“Elise.”  
The low, commanding tone sent a shiver down her spine.  
Elise froze.  
The voice called her name again, this time closer.  
“Elise.”  
Her heart raced wildly as she slowly turned around, her gaze
locking onto Cardale’s.  
Standing mere steps away, his intense crimson eyes
seemed to pierce through her very soul.  
“I’m late, aren’t I? Did I keep you waiting long?”  
“N-no, not at all…” she stammered, caught off guard by his
casual demeanor.  
Cardale smiled softly before shifting his gaze to the
surrounding nobles.  
His expression darkened instantly, his gaze sharp as a
blade.  
“Do you have business with my lover?” he asked, his tone
laced with quiet menace.

The gathered nobles couldn’t hide their bewilderment.  
‘Why would the Duke of Vassenberg…?’  
As seasoned figures in high society, they had not acted
thoughtlessly.  
Each had used their family’s intelligence networks to gather
information.  
They had recently received news that the woman who
remained by the Duke’s side the last social season, had
finally returned to her family.  
It was a signal that new, easily devourable prey had
appeared.  
Of illegitimate birth—a stain on her bloodline. A past as the
Duke’s mistress. A lack of powerful backing.  
There was none more fitting as a sacrificial lamb to amuse
high society for the time being.  
However, they had overlooked something crucial.  
The information they had obtained was indeed accurate—
but unfortunately, it was not complete.  
They had no idea that several carriages laden with luxurious
baggage had departed from the Duke’s residence to enter
Count Schuvan’s estate.  
Nor did they know that Vassenberg’s vassals were abuzz
with anticipation of welcoming their new lady.  
Had they known the truth, they would never have dared to
do such a thing.  
‘Elise Schuvan was cast out of the Duke’s house, they
said…?’  
As the unexpected situation unfolded, unease slowly crept
into the faces of the nobles.  
No matter how they looked at it, the way the Duke had just
addressed Elise Schuvan did not resemble a man speaking
to a discarded mistress.  
Moreover, he had made his words loud and clear for all to
hear.  
‘My lover.’  
A term reserved only for a betrothed, one promised in
marriage.  
“I asked what business you have here.”  
“T-That is…”  
But by the time they realized their mistake, it was already
too late.  
“If you have no intention of speaking, I suppose I’ll have to
ask the person involved.”  
  
A collective sharp intake of breath echoed among the
gathered nobles.  
The moment Elise Schuvan uttered a single word about the
humiliation she had suffered at their hands, the Duke would
hold them accountable.  
The murderous intent,  glinting in his blood-red eyes,
confirmed this.  
Cold sweat trickled down their backs.  
It was then—  
“Duke.”  
Elise’s delicate and gentle voice called out to the Duke in an
attempt to dissuade him.  
“These ladies and gentlemen were merely here to offer their
congratulations on my brother, Damien’s title succession.”  
As her pale, slender hand cautiously rested on his arm, the
sharp, dangerous air surrounding the Duke softened in an
instant.  
Those who witnessed the shocking transformation could not
hide their astonishment.  
Especially the noblewomen, who had heard various stories
about the Duke, were left gaping in disbelief.  
Looking at them, Elise spoke politely.  
“Thank you for your kind congratulations. Unfortunately,
this isn’t the best time for conversation, but if another
opportunity arises in the future…”  
“O-Of course!”  
One of the more seasoned noblewomen quickly seized the
chance to smooth things over.  
“Our family hosts tea parties in the blooming gardens every
spring, inviting esteemed guests. If it wouldn’t be too much
trouble, would you honor us with your presence?”  
“Gladly, madam.”  
Elise nodded, subtly tugging on Cardale’s arm.  
“I’d like to get some fresh air.”  
Though he knew she was using it as an excuse to end the
situation, he followed her without protest. The nobles, quick
to grasp the situation, promptly stepped aside to clear a
path.  
  
As they stepped outside the banquet hall, the cold winter air
rushed against their bare skin.  
Though wrapped in a shawl, Elise shivered slightly as the
chill seeped through her thin dress.  
“Elise.”  
The sound of her name made her jolt in surprise.  
“I-I’m sorry.”  
Only then did she realize she was still holding onto Cardale’s
arm and hastily withdrew her hand.  
“I touched Your Grace without permission…”  
“It’s fine.”  
Though flustered, she hurriedly apologized, but he shook his
head and responded gently. Then, as if gauging the damp
air, he remarked,  
“It’s quite cold tonight.”  
The next moment, Elise felt a sudden weight drape over her
shoulders. The chill in her body disappeared almost
instantly, replaced by warmth.  
Only then did she realize she was wrapped in his coat.  
“I-I’m fine…”  
“You get cold easily, how could you possibly be fine? What if
you catch a cold?”  
Before she could even react, Cardale had fastened all the
buttons of the coat around her.  
“Besides, it’s my fault.”  
He added, as if making an excuse.  
“I interrupted and ended up bringing you outside the hall.”  
“N-No, that’s not…”  
Feeling the warmth trapped within the coat, Elise hurriedly
shook her head. If anything, had he not intervened, she
would have been in serious trouble.  
“We’ll have to spend some time outside before heading
back in. Can you walk?”  
Cardale gestured toward the hedge maze garden in front of
the banquet hall.  
‘Since I already made the excuse of wanting fresh air, I
should at least take a brief look around the garden…’  
Of course, no one would have blamed her if she had gone
back inside right away, but Elise used that thought as an
excuse to nod.  
Thanks to the lingering warmth of his coat, she barely felt
the cold.  
They walked side by side through the hedge maze.  
Though called a maze, the paths that moved through the
hedges that stood just slightly taller than an average man,
were not difficult to navigate.  
The garden was adorned with sculptures, elegant fountains,
and decorative features, making it one of the most beautiful
walking trails within the royal palace.  
However, Elise hardly took in any of the scenery.  
‘The Duke…’  
The casual conversation they had just exchanged inside the
hall now felt almost unreal.  
She tried not to be conscious of Cardale. But the more she
tried, the more her thoughts drifted toward him.  
And then—  
His voice echoed in her mind.  
‘What business do you have with my lover?’  
Lover…  
She knew better than to place any significance on that
word.  
She was nothing more than a personal maid and mistress.
At best, a mere tool to warm his bed.  
There was no way she could be the Duke’s lover.  
‘So…’  
Elise forced herself to dismiss the thought.  
‘Don’t be mistaken. He’s just keeping his promise.’  
It was just part of their contract. A minimal safeguard for a
potential heir to continue his lineage. Nothing more. She
must not harbor any foolish expectations.  
And yet…  
“Aren’t you cold?”  
Cardale suddenly stopped walking and turned to look at
her.  
His warm, concerned gaze made Elise clutch the front of his
coat tightly.  
Her slender fingers turned pale from the pressure.  
“I’m… not cold.”  
She barely managed to respond, but she could not stop her
voice from trembling.  
“That’s good.”  
He answered with a faint smile. As she watched the gentle
curve of his lips and the warmth in his scarlet eyes, Elise’s
gaze trembled once more.  
‘Why…’  
‘Why does he smile so tenderly? Why does he speak so
gently? Why does he look at me with such warmth?’  
It’s strange.  
The same blood-red eyes that once seemed so merciless
now felt like a comforting fire.  
The lips that had once curled in cold amusement now held a
gentle kindness.  
Even the warmth of his coat wrapped around her felt too
kind…  
It was so surreal, as if she were dreaming.  
It’s strange.  
All of this… it’s too strange.  
For some reason, her eyes stung, and an indescribable
emotion welled up in her throat.  
It felt unfair, sorrowful, suffocating, and even resentful. A
whirlwind of emotions swirled within her, leaving her
confused.  
Caught in the storm of her own feelings, she couldn’t
compose herself in time.  
Through the stillness, a quiet confession reached her ears.  
“I worried about you a lot.”  
Elise’s eyes widened, as if hearing something unbelievable.  
The soft smile had vanished from Cardale’s face, replaced
by a sorrowful expression.  
“I wondered if you were doing well, if you were healthy, if
you were in pain… You were suffering when you left.”  
Her blue eyes trembled helplessly.  
‘Why…’  
Why was he saying this now?  
It almost sounded like—  
Like he regretted it.  
‘No.’  
Elise quickly shook her head, rejecting the thought.  
That couldn’t be. She must be misunderstanding.  
‘There’s no way the Duke would regret anything.’

He was someone who had no need to look back on his
actions.  
He had more than enough. Losing just one person would not
leave him regretful or lacking in any way.  
‘Don’t be mistaken, Elise. Do you really think the Duke
would hold onto someone like you?’  
She deliberately crushed any expectations that tried to rise
within her. Every time she let her guard down, absurd and
foolish thoughts threatened to over take her.
‘But… the Duke just said he was worried about me…’  
‘How foolish. Do you really believe those words?’  
Elise bit down hard on the soft flesh inside her lip.  
‘…No. I don’t believe it.’  
The truth was, she wanted to. She wanted to believe his
concern, his gentle voice, the warmth in his gaze, and the
kindness of his hands as he wrapped her in his coat…  
She wanted to believe it was all sincere.  
‘But I must not.’  
She steeled her wavering heart. A heart that had been
shattered too many times before it now rejected even what
her own senses told her.  
Because she was afraid of getting hurt.  
Because she feared the fragile, mended pieces of her heart
would be torn apart again.  
Elise did not want to suffer anymore. She did not want to cry
alone, nursing her wounds. She wanted to be happy—with
her mother, her brother, and the baby soon to be born.  
So, she chose to ignore the truth that was plain to see. She
covered all her senses with a translucent veil, shielding
herself.  
And she desperately searched for an excuse.  
‘The Duke must be… concerned about the baby.’  
Asking about her health was likely just to ensure she could
bear a healthy child. After all, his future heir could not be
weak.  
Once she found a plausible reason, she felt relieved. Rather
than clinging to a foolish attachment, she told herself she
was maintaining her peace of mind.  
“Your body is—”  
“I-I’m fine…!”  
Before Cardale could finish speaking, Elise blurted out in a
hurry.  
“I’m really doing well.”  
Her voice carried an edge of urgency, as if she were trying
to stop him from saying anything more. She quickly
continued,  
“As you can see, I’m healthy enough to attend the banquet.
I’ve almost fully recovered now.”  
She even forced a smile.  
But her heart was pounding faster and faster with her
nerves.  
‘This is bad. If I stay with the Duke any longer…’  
Her instincts screamed that she needed to escape.  
If she didn’t, he would shatter the fragile walls she had
painstakingly built around herself.  
Then, he would casually shake her heart, tear her apart, and
leave her ruined before walking away again.  
“I-I think I’ve spent enough time outside. I should return to
the banquet—”  
“Elise.”  
The deeper tone in his voice struck her ears, making her
heart plummet.  
As if her unconscious mind had already realized what he
was about to say.  
‘No…’  
Inside the coat that wrapped around her, she clenched the
fabric of her dress tightly with both hands. Her blue eyes
wavered as she looked up at him.  
His crimson gaze, fixed solely on her, carried an urgency
that was hard to believe.  
‘…Please don’t, Your Grace.’  
‘Don’t treat me like someone precious. Don’t look at me
with such longing, with such tenderness.’  
Elise shook her head internally, desperately rejecting the
emotions washing over her.  
“All this time, I… did to you…”  
‘I’m fine. It doesn’t matter. It’s all in the past. I barely even
think about it anymore. So please, don’t say anything.
Please, don’t say anything at all.’
“I did something unforgivable.”  
‘Please, I beg you.’  
But Elise’s words never made it past her lips. No matter how
hard she tried, her throat felt as if it had been stuffed with
cotton, rendering her voice useless.  
“I hurt you. I made you suffer. And all the while… I didn’t
even realize I was destroying myself in the process.”  
Each of Cardale’s words struck her like a blade.  
But to someone unprepared, such a confession was not a
comfort—it was a dull knife, bringing only pain and agony.  
A lump rose in Elise’s throat, her heart pounding painfully in
her chest. Memories she had worked so hard to suppress
resurfaced.  
No.  
She did not want to hurt anymore. She did not want to cry.
She did not want to feel pain or suffering ever again.  
“Elise, I sincerely—”  
“No.”  
The word escaped her lips like a cough, finally breaking
through. And with it, her throat unlocked, allowing her voice
to flow.  
“It’s fine, Your Grace.”  
Her eyes burned, and her throat tightened again, but she
endured it. Instead, she forced her lips into a small smile.
Otherwise, he might see the tears welling beneath her
lashes.  
“There’s no need to apologize… It’s really fine.”  
The moment she finished speaking, Cardale’s eyes twisted
in pain. But Elise did not see it, her vision blurred by unshed
tears.  
“You only did as the contract dictated, Duke.”  
She lowered her gaze to the ground, refusing to look at his
face.  
“And you gave me more than enough in return.”  
“Elise…”  
His voice trembled slightly as he spoke her name, but Elise
did not stop.  
“Thank you for keeping your promise. I heard of the
kindness you’ve shown my brother and read the contract
ensuring my child’s protection. For everything… I’m truly
grateful.”  
She forced herself to lift her head.  
But even then, she deliberately avoided meeting his eyes.  
“I should go now. My brother will be here soon, and if he
doesn’t see me, he’ll be worried.”  
With a polite bow, Elise turned and hurried away.  
She felt the weight of his presence behind her, and
instinctively, her head wanted to turn back.  
But she forced herself to resist.  
‘This was the right thing to do. This is how it should be…’  
Yet, no matter how much she told herself that, her chest
burned with pain. A single tear slid down her pale cheek.  
Elise hastily wiped it away with the back of her hand and
quickened her steps.  
She just wanted to see Damien and go home.  
  
Cardale stood frozen, watching Elise’s retreating figure.  
A raw, unhidden agony was etched onto his face. It was the
expression of someone who had lost something
irreplaceable.  
Just moments ago, it had felt as if he could finally breathe.
But now, his breath was choked once more.  
‘Elise.’  
The moment he saw her again in the banquet hall, he had
been overwhelmed with emotion.  
She was the woman he had longed to see, even in his
dreams. The one he wished for, even if only in nightmares.  
Tonight felt like a dream.  
In her pristine white dress, she looked as if she had stepped
back in time.  
Like the girl he first saw on the night of his victory banquet,
before she had met him… when she was still pure and
radiant.  
Perhaps it was because she had found her family. She
looked brighter now. Happier.  
She had linked arms with her brother, smiling as they
conversed. Occasionally, she would lift a hand to her lips
and chuckle softly.  
And when Damien Schuvan was officially declared as his
father’s successor, she had smiled so beautifully it was
overwhelming.  
Her smile had been more dazzling than the grand chandelier
above.  
Cardale could not look away.  
Because for the first time, he realized—  
She was capable of smiling like that.  
And at the same time, a crushing pain filled his chest.  
That smile… He had never once been able to give it to her.  
It was a smile that could never belong to a man who had
destroyed her.  
As regret rose in him once more, he clenched his jaw.  
He had only wanted to protect her purity, to shield her from
the filth of the past.  
“What business do you have with my lover?”
But his words had been nothing more than the remnants of
his desire.  
A desperate attempt to cling to her, to mend what had
already been shattered.  
And now, he had to face the truth.  
“And you gave me more than enough in return.”  
Compensation.  
That was all he could give her now.  
Raindrops fell.  
Cardale looked up at the dark sky. The air had been damp all
evening.  
It had finally begun to rain.  
No, this was wrong.  
Elise feared the rain. It would terrify her, make her tremble.  
He had to tell her to hurry back inside before the storm
worsened.  
Just as he was about to turn—  
“You lost her in the end, didn’t you?”  
A mocking voice rang out.  
Cardale’s brows furrowed as he turned toward the source of
the voice.  
“I told you, didn’t I?”  
A man with disheveled brown hair and an unkempt beard
smirked, his green eyes gleaming darkly like a serpent’s.  
“Elise was always going to leave you.”  
Raymond bared his teeth in a sneering grin.

It had only been a few months since he had been
dishonorably returned to his estate, accused as the culprit
behind the kidnapping incident during the hunting festival.  
Thanks to the desperate efforts of Marquis Hartmann and
his wife to save their son, he had avoided punishment.
However, given the severity of the incident, he had been
effectively expelled from high society.  
On the surface, it was said that he was in a period of selfreflection, but rumors had already begun circulating that the
successor of the marquisate was going to be replaced.  
And in such a situation, Raymond Hartmann had appeared
at the imperial palace—at none other than the venue where
the crown prince’s engagement celebration was being
held.  
“The security of the imperial palace is a complete mess.”  
Cardale spoke in a dry, emotionless tone.  
“They allow an unwelcome person to roam about so
freely.”  
“Oh dear, it seems Duke Vassenberg is quite disappointed
that I haven’t been thrown out.”  
Raymond sneered mockingly.  
“Unfortunately for you, I happen to have a legitimate
invitation, so calling the guards won’t do you any good.”  
He raised the invitation and lightly shook it beside his face.
The golden envelope bore the imperial seal, gleaming
prominently.  
Cardale smirked.  
“Still relying on your parents’ influence to solve your
problems, and yet you have the audacity to puff yourself up
with pride?”  
A blatant sneer curved the edges of his lips tinged with a
reddish hue.  
“Even a newly-adult heir would be more mature than you.”  
Raymond’s face flushed red with anger at the insult.
However, the most humiliating part was that Cardale wasn’t
wrong.  
In truth, Raymond had never received an invitation. Due to
his past collusion with Princess Theresia to undermine the
crown prince, the emperor had openly distanced himself
from him.  
The invitation he had brought belonged to Marquis and
Marchioness Hartmann.  
Moreover, he was not attending under his own name as
Raymond Hartmann, but as a proxy representing his father,
the marquis.  
Grinding his teeth, Raymond swallowed his fury. Cold
raindrops began to fall onto his shoulders and hair,
gradually increasing in intensity, yet his rising anger made
him oblivious to the chill.  
“You’ll find it troublesome if you treat me this way, Duke.”  
The sound of his teeth grinding together leaked through his
words.  
Cardale narrowed his eyes slightly as he looked at the man
attempting to threaten him.  
In reality, it was Raymond Hartmann who should be
pleading with him if he wished to restore his position in
society and regain a foothold in the central political sphere.  
Only Duke Vassenberg could assist someone who had fallen
out of the emperor’s favor.  
Was this sheer bravery and an inability to cast aside his
pride? Or had he simply resigned himself to desperation?  
Cardale observed his opponent, who glared at him while
huffing angrily.  
Despite going so far as to borrow his father’s invitation to
enter the imperial palace, Raymond Hartmann had not
stepped into the banquet hall.  
Had he been there, he would have undoubtedly been
noticed.  
This meant that he had specifically come to see him.  
There must be a clear purpose behind this visit.  
“As expected, I have a proposal for you.”  
And just as he predicted, Raymond got straight to the
point.  
“A proposal, you say?”  
Cardale lifted one side of his lips in a smirk. He disliked the
choice of words.  
A man with no title, who was barely clinging to his
inheritance, dared to speak of making a deal?  
“A deal can only happen between equals.”  
His voice was a quiet warning.  
“If you don’t realize how absurd you sound, you may want
to reconsider your judgment.”  
“Are you saying I’m unworthy of being your negotiation
partner?”  
But Raymond did not back down in the slightest. Instead, he
openly provoked him.  
“You always seem overly confident, Duke. That arrogance is
what cost you Elise.”  
For a brief moment, Cardale’s eyebrow twitched. Raymond
did not miss that reaction and pressed further, looking even
more triumphant.  
“Excessive confidence always proves to be poisonous.”  
His tone was patronizing, as if offering unsolicited advice.
Then, he stated his demands outright.  
“Ensure that I successfully inherit the marquisate. Just like
you did for Damien Schuvan. If you were able to elevate a
bastard to the position of family head, then surely bringing
a noble of pure lineage back into the central political sphere
should be no trouble for you. Am I wrong?”  
“That’s the most amusing thing I’ve heard recently.”  
Cardale pulled the corners of his lips taut in a smirk. But his
eyes gleamed with a chilling, predatory light.  
“Judging by your confidence, you must have some kind of
leverage. But let’s see if what you’re offering is worth my
time.”  
His eerie voice was laced with a sharp-edged sneer.  
“Stop beating around the bush and show me, little marquis.
Only then can I calculate how much it’s worth.”  
Raymond’s face twisted in anger at the blatant mockery.  
“Let’s see if you can maintain that haughty attitude after
looking at this.”  
He spat out the words as he roughly reached into his coat,
clutching something before pulling it out.  
Cardale’s eyes narrowed slightly at the sight of a piece of
white fabric.  
‘A handkerchief?’  
His face was usually expressionless and impassive, so there
was barely a hint of change. But for a fleeting moment, a
sliver of doubt crossed his mind.  
Even a seven-year-old child wouldn’t offer something so
trivial as leverage in a negotiation with a duke.  
However, the moment Raymond unfolded the handkerchief,
holding it by its two corners.
Cardale’s expression froze like ice.  
Intricate embroidery adorned the four corners of the pristine
fabric.  
“Do you recognize this emblem?”  
Of course, he did.  
What kind of head of a noble house wouldn’t recognize his
own family’s crest?  
The symbol embroidered onto the handkerchief was
unmistakably that of House Vassenberg.  
And at that very moment, Cardale instinctively knew who
had sewn it.  
‘…Elise.’  
Such delicate and painstakingly detailed embroidery—only
she could have made it.  
Cardale immediately recognized the handkerchief. He even
knew when Elise had embroidered it.  
‘The superstition about tying a cloth around the wrist…’  
‘It’s an old tradition, but it seems to be surprisingly
effective.’  
It was a tradition where one would tie a handkerchief around
the wrist of a hunter to pray for their safe return.  
Though he had dismissed it as mere superstition, he had
still told Elise about it. Before heading out for a hunt in the
forest behind the Vassenberg estate, he had even
suggested she practice by tying one to his wrist.  
‘D-During the hunting festival, I’ll do it for you.’  
‘If you need me to, Your Grace…’  
The hunting festival was just three days later.  
Had she really managed to embroider the crest onto the
handkerchief in that short time? It would have been
impossible unless she had worked on it day and night.  
‘Y-Your Grace, may I tie this around your wrist…?’  
‘Later.’  
In the end, Elise had never been able to tie it around his
wrist.  
She had been kidnapped.  
By Raymond Hartmann.  
“Why do you have Elise’s handkerchief?”  
“Well.”  
Raymond shrugged.  
“Seeing her embroidering the crest of Vassenberg even in
the safe and cozy little space I had prepared for her… Well, I
couldn’t help but be infuriated.”  
“So you stole it from her.”  
Cardale’s voice dripped with contempt.  
“And now you offer it as a bargaining chip?”  
“It holds plenty of value, doesn’t it?”  
Raymond tilted his head slightly.  
“If my guess is correct, I’d say you want this handkerchief
very badly.”  
He waved it in the air, taunting him like a matador teasing a
bull. The embroidered crest flickered as the fabric fluttered.  
“I might as well tell you the story of how I found it.”  
He spoke as if he were doing Cardale a great favor.  
Cardale fixed him with an icy stare, his gaze unwavering.  
“I peeked in to see what she was doing alone in her room,
and there she was, secretly embroidering. If you had seen
her expression then, Duke, you might have shed tears.”  
Raymond chuckled.  
“She looked so wistful, so full of longing. It was almost
pitiful.”  
As if he found it all incredibly amusing, he snickered
throughout his words.  
Then, all of a sudden, his laughter stopped.  
His expression turned chillingly dark.  
“She longed for you, even while she was with me.”

The fury of being thoroughly rejected surged behind the
man’s green eyes.  
“Even while wearing the clothes I bought for her, eating the
food I prepared, she thought only of you. Even after being
told that she had been abandoned, she still believed that
the one who betrayed her would come to save her.”  
Cardale’s gaze darkened as he listened to the story of his
woman.  
‘Was that how it was? You were waiting for me?  
‘Did you embroider that handkerchief, hoping I would come
for you?’ 
Perhaps Elise had wanted to prove her innocence.  
She had been told there would be no second chances, that if
she deceived or betrayed him again, she would never be
forgiven. He had carved those words into her, ensuring she
would never forget.  
So, while carrying a child, still reeling from the trauma of
being kidnapped and imprisoned, she must have
suppressed her fear and terror, focusing only on
embroidering.  
So that if they ever met again, she could finally show him
proof that she had not betrayed him.  
‘…Elise.’  
Before she returned to her family, Cardale recalled how she
had sat there all day, tirelessly sewing.  
At last, he understood the desperate, fervent movements of
her hands.  
It had been the only thing keeping her going, her only pillar
of hope in an overwhelming and agonizing reality.  
She had clung to the faint possibility that he would come for
her, prayed for the safety of the child growing inside her,
and waited. Just waited for his anger to subside.  
And yet, it was he who had ultimately shattered her,
breaking her down until she had no choice but to give up
completely.  
“What a ridiculous thing. The reason Elise ended up so
miserable was entirely because of you.”  
While Cardale was lost in the past, Raymond’s anger only
grew stronger.  
“You’re the one who spread the bastard rumors that led to
her engagement being broken. You’re the one who
conspired with Gerhard Schuvan to strip her of even the
barest minimum of dignity.”  
His face, now completely distorted with rage, bore none of
the warmth or kindness it once held so long ago.  
“I couldn’t understand it. I thought about it over and over
again. Why was it you and not me? Why did she choose
you?”  
His expression twisted into something eerie.  
“And while I was searching for an answer, I discovered
something new. She was pregnant.”  
Cardale’s eyebrow twitched.  
Raymond Hartmann knew about Elise’s pregnancy?  
Even though the danger was past, even though he knew
both Elise and the child were safe now, an unsettling sense
of unease and disgust welled up inside him.  
“I should have handled it properly, but unfortunately, Elise
overheard the plan and everything fell apart.”  
“…Handled?”  
Cardale’s voice sank to a chilling depth.  
“You tried to kill the child? By poisoning Elise?”  
“If you were me, would you have left the child alone?”  
Even when faced with a deadly aura, Raymond remained
unfazed. Rather, he seemed to revel in Cardale’s reaction.  
“I went through quite a bit of trouble to find a drug that
would only target the child without harming the mother.”  
Raindrops fell onto his smirking face, cold and relentless.  
“But I never expected her to switch the soup bowls and
make me drink the poison instead before escaping.”  
Casually wiping away the rain with his hand, he continued.  
“Besides, you wouldn’t have wanted a child from a mistress
either, would you? A bastard is nothing but a nuisance. It
would only be an obstacle when you eventually take a
duchess—”  
“Did you say that to Elise?”  
“What?”  
“The words you’re spewing now—did you say them to Elise
as well?”  
Raymond looked puzzled for a moment before grinning as
he caught on to Cardale’s thoughts.  
“Who knows? I did tell her some practical truths.”  
In reality, he had tried to secretly get rid of the child without
even telling Elise, only for her to find out on her own. But he
deliberately spoke ambiguously to lead Cardale to
misunderstanding.  
“I told her what happens to the women of traitorous
families. That becoming a slave might be a fate worse than
death.”  
  
“I also made sure she knew you were the one who executed
those traitors.”  
Cardale’s grip tightened into a fist.  
He could easily imagine how Raymond had shaken Elise
with those words. After all, he himself had used that very
fear to threaten her.  
“Please… I beg you. Let me go.”
“If you let me go just this once… I’ll leave the empire
forever. You’ll never see me again. I swear…” 
“N-no… I don’t want to stay… Please, please, let me go…”
He should have asked.  
The woman who had once desperately wished to carry his
child, who had begged him not to abandon her, who had
promised to prepare a handkerchief even after that cruel
night.
Why had she never come looking for him after escaping
from Raymond?  
Why had she run away so desperately the moment she saw
him?  
Why had she trembled in fear and pleaded to be let go when
he finally caught her?  
What had she been told? What had she gone through?  
He should have asked.  
He should have listened to her.  
If he had just been a little kinder, she would have confessed
everything, even in her fear.  
“I-it’s your child, Duke…!”
“H-how could you say such a thing…?”
He remembered her gentle eyes, how they had twisted with
pain. The tear-streaked face, the sorrowful sobs, the slight,
trembling shoulders.  
The woman who had held onto hope even after hearing
Raymond’s sly threats and manipulation.  
She had finally broken.  
Because he had been the one to shatter that hope.  
Because he had not asked even one question.  
Because he had been too cold, too ruthless.  
Raindrops fell faster now, turning into an unrelenting
downpour.  
Raymond smirked as he continued, “By the way. From what I
heard earlier, Elise seems to think you’re protecting the
child. Quite the convincing lie you—”  
He stopped mid-sentence.  
His face stiffened as he took in Cardale’s expression.  
“Wait… don’t tell me… you’re serious?”  
Cardale said nothing. But his silence was answer enough.  
“You’ve got to be kidding me.”  
Raymond’s eyes widened in shock.  
“You’re not actually thinking of making Elise your duchess,
are you? A woman of such questionable lineage? Your
vassals won’t stand for it.”  
“The kind of man who discards his fiancée using the excuse
of his parents’ disapproval would find it impossible, yes.”  
Cardale’s icy retort made Raymond stare at him in disbelief
before bursting into a bitter laugh.  
“Hah… My god…”  
Looking at the unwavering determination in Cardale’s
expression, pure jealousy flared inside Raymond.  
‘You? You think you deserve her?’
But whether he deserved her or not, it no longer mattered.  
Once Cardale made up his mind, Elise would become his
duchess. He had the power to make it so, no matter what.  
And Raymond remembered the longing in Elise’s eyes when
she had embroidered that crest.  
Feelings like that weren’t easily erased.  
Eventually, she would return to Cardale.  
Not to him, who had been warm and kind.
But to Cardale Vassenberg, who had wealth, power, and
strength.  
Raymond’s green eyes burned with fury. And then that fury
shifted from the powerful to the weak. Because that was the
easier, safer way.  
After all, he didn’t just want to ruin Cardale.  
He wanted to ruin Elise too.  
He wanted her to suffer, to feel the pain of betrayal just as
he had.  
“Isn’t Elise Schwan too much of a whore to be a duchess?”  
Cardale’s face turned ice-cold.  
“Watch your mouth, Raymond Hartmann.”  
A frigid warning. But Raymond only pushed further.  
“You can only say that because you don’t know what nights
Elise and I shared in my estate.”  
A twisted smirk curled his lips.  
“Surely, you don’t actually believe nothing happened
between us, do you? Every night, Elise—kugh!”  
Raymond choked, eyes widening in shock.  
A large hand had seized his throat.  
“I don’t care what lies you tell about me. What pathetic
deals you try to make.”  
“Guh… khhh…!”  
Raymond grasped at Cardale’s arm, trying to pry it off.  
But the grip only tightened. His body lifted off the ground.  
“But you dare speak of Elise?”  
His legs thrashed wildly.  
His feet scraped the damp earth, then were lifted
completely off it.  
“A worthless voice is better off silenced, don’t you think?”  
Raymond couldn’t answer. His crushed windpipe only let out
a wheezing, gurgling sound.  
Cardale yanked the handkerchief from his limp grip.  
“A gift should be returned to its rightful owner.”  
Raymond’s eyes rolled back.  
And then—  
“Duke…?”  
A voice he should not have heard echoed through the rain.

Cardale sharply turned toward the voice.  
There, standing before him, was his woman. Her clear, blue
eyes trembled in shock.  
“Elise.”  
His grip loosened.  
With a wet thud, Raymond collapsed onto the rain-soaked
ground, rolling in the mud.  
“Cough, cough! Hah… huff, cough!”  
He gasped desperately, sucking in air as he coughed up
mucus and spit. The sudden rush of oxygen sent pain
coursing through his lungs, but his dizziness gradually
faded.  
As his senses returned, Raymond lifted his head only to see
Elise Schuvan. Pale as a ghost, and the Duke looking utterly
dismayed.  
In that instant, he instinctively knew: this was his chance to
drive a wedge between them.  
‘I won’t let you have the woman I couldn’t have, Cardale
Vassenberg.’
‘Do you think I’ll stand by and watch you go to another man,
Elise?’  
‘Why should I be the only one to suffer? If I’m unhappy, then
they should be, too. That’s only fair.’ 
The boiling rage stripped away his mask of cowardly desire.
He ran a hand over his dry, rasping throat, lips curling into a
venomous smirk.  
Since his attempt to make the duke doubt her chastity had
failed, he decided to change targets.  
“Elise, do you still trust Duke Vassenberg? Was anything I
said a lie?”  
She flinched and turned to look at him, startled. The sight
filled him with twisted joy.  
‘Yes… I’ll tear them apart completely. So they can never be
together again.’
For that goal, he was willing to throw away all noble dignity,
every shred of pride and morality he had ever built.  
But there was no way Cardale wouldn’t see through his
malice. The Duke’s gaze darkened, reading Raymond’s
cunning scheme with ease.  
“You really don’t learn, do you?”  
He had no intention of letting Raymond say another word to
Elise.  
A silent, murderous force burst forth.  
“Ugh!”  
Raymond’s body crumpled like a man kicked in the gut,
rolling across the ground.  
“Haven’t you already said it yourself?”  
Raymond, now a disheveled mess, lifted his head, clutching
at the mud as he howled.  
“You said you didn’t care about Elise’s feelings!”  
Cardale hesitated.  
Despite all his regrets over what he had done to her, there
were still things that haunted him.  
“You laughed and sneered, saying there was no reason to
care about the feelings of a woman whose body was enough
to enjoy!”  
Cardale’s mind reeled.  
Yes. He had said that before.  
He had been blinded by rage at another man coveting his
woman, and was determined to make Raymond feel nothing
but shame, humiliation, and despair—by any means
necessary.  
But he shouldn’t have.  
At the very least, he should never have used her as a tool in
his vengeance.  
The sins of his past had come back to drag him down into
the abyss.  
His gaze shifted to Elise.  
Her pale face was filled with raw hurt. Her delicate eyes,
brimming with sorrow, wavered painfully.  
Why… why again?  
She had already suffered, already endured so much pain, so
much agony.  
Why was he hurting her all over again?  
Rage boiled up inside him. He wanted to break Raymond’s
neck, to crush his throat and silence him forever.  
“Shut your mouth.”  
Cardale’s black leather boot pressed down hard on
Raymond’s back, pinning him against the ground. The
crushing pressure was a deadly warning.  
“Ghh… do you think… choking me will hide the truth?”  
Raymond’s cracked voice rasped like rusted steel.  
“Elise, you must not trust the Duke!”  
He lifted his head as high as he could, his venomous green
eyes locking onto hers.  
“That man trampled your dignity! He never once treated
you with respect as a lady!”  
Raymond spat blood as he continued.  
“Do you know what he said to me about you? Cough—!”  
Thud!  
His body was thrown back with a brutal kick. Blood dribbled
down his lips from the impact.  
“I told you to shut up.”  
Cardale’s voice dripped with murderous intent as he strode
forward. His shadow loomed over Raymond, threatening to
end him right there.  
But even as death neared, Raymond clenched his teeth and
sneered.  
“Did I say anything false? Didn’t you mock me, saying I’d
never seen her blush with desire, never heard her moan—
Argh!”  
A sickening crack rang out as Cardale’s heel crushed the
back of Raymond’s hand.  
“If death is your desire, I’ll grant your wish.”  
Cardale’s crimson gaze glowed with merciless fury.  
“Stop!”  
The desperate cry cut through the storm like a shock of ice
water.  
His breath hitched.  
His rage-clouded mind snapped back to clarity, and his
heart plummeted.  
Cardale turned his head with a creak.  
The moment he saw Elise’s face, white as a sheet, his heart
crashed into the abyss.  
Damien, holding an umbrella over her and supporting her
trembling frame, shouted furiously at him.  
“What the hell do you think you’re doing?!”  
Cardale found himself at a loss for words.  
Elise was here.  
She had heard everything.  
He had tried to silence Raymond, but in the end…  
He hadn’t stopped anything.  
It was his actions that had hurt her the most.  
He had let her witness such brutality, subjected her to the
very violence he swore never to expose her to again.  
Damien’s face twisted with anger.  
“You’re ruining everything! Do you realize that? You always
destroy everything!”  
The younger man took a breath, his voice lowering with
barely contained fury.  
“My sister was worried you’d get caught in the rain… does
that mean nothing to you?”  
Cardale’s eyes dropped to what Elise was holding.  
His coat. The umbrella.  
Her blue eyes shimmered with unshed tears, her cheeks
damp—whether from rain or sorrow, he could not tell.  
His lips parted soundlessly.  
Elise.  
He reached out.  
A foolish, useless gesture—she was far too distant to
touch.  
“Let’s go home.”  
Damien wrapped an arm around Elise’s shoulders, guiding
her away.  
Her small, fragile frame swayed unsteadily as she walked.  
Cardale could only watch as she moved farther away.  
The rain poured harder.  
“Khh, ha… it’s over.”  
Raymond cackled, blood staining his teeth. His laughter was
half-mad, delirious.  
“You’ll never win her heart now. Congratulations, Duke
Vassenberg.”  
The taunting words sent a violent tremor through Cardale’s
eyes.  
Elise’s heart…  
The one thing he had desperately longed for since realizing
his own feelings.  
He had thought he had lost it forever, had suffered, ached
for it—yet still, he had yearned to reclaim it.  
A lingering image of her flashed in his mind.  
The woman who had once run from him, saying he didn’t
even need to apologize… had returned.  
Just because she didn’t want him to be caught in the rain.  
A crushing realization struck him.  
‘I haven’t lost everything.’ 
She still had a sliver of affection left for him.  
And yet, he had just thrown it away with his own actions.  
No.  
Cardale stumbled forward, gasping.  
Elise was already out of sight.  
But his feet moved faster. A walk became a run.  
“Elise!”  
He spotted her boarding a carriage.  
For a moment, she seemed to look his way—then turned her
head and disappeared inside.  
The door shut. The carriage moved.  
“Elise!”  
Cardale tore through the rain.  
The downpour blurred his vision. His voice was swallowed by
the storm.  
Even knowing she couldn’t hear him, he called her name
again and again.  
“Elise…!”  
His fine, tailored clothes clung to him, soaked and heavy. His
feet sank into the muddy ground, slowing him down.  
The two-wheeled carriage only sped up.  
His legs burned, lungs screamed—then, he tripped.  
“Ugh…!”  
He crashed into the mud.  
But he didn’t care.  
He lifted his head in desperation.
Just in time to see the carriage stop.  
The door opened.  
A small figure, umbrella in hand, stepped out… and turned
to face him.  
Cardale’s eyes widened in disbelief.  
“Elise…”  
She had come back. 
His Elise.

Kneeling with one knee on the ground, Cardale felt the
shadow of an umbrella cast over his head. At the same time,
the relentless beating of the rain against his body came to a
halt.  
His trembling gaze lifted to meet the woman who had come
so close, shielding him from the downpour.  
‘Why are you crying, Elise?’  
‘Why are you crying again?’  
‘Did I hurt you? Did I make you sad, make you suffer? Is that
why you’re crying once more?’  
“The winter rain is falling so heavily…”  
Her voice, choked with emotion, was thick with sorrow.  
“And yet… you’re out here without even an umbrella.”  
A teardrop, pooled in her gentle eyes, slipped past her
lashes and landed on Cardale’s cheek.  
Against his rain-drenched, ice-cold skin, that single drop of
warmth spread.  
“Don’t cry.”  
Cardale instinctively raised his arm to wipe her tears, but
realizing the state he was in, he hesitated and pulled back.  
His entire body was caked in mud from rolling in the dirt. He
couldn’t bring himself to stain his precious woman with his
filth.  
Instead, he murmured with aching regret,  
“Don’t cry, Elise.”  
If only he could, he would hold her in his arms. He would
stroke her hair with a gentle touch, whisper words of
comfort endlessly to her ears.  
“I don’t want to… But then why… Why do you do this?”  
Her delicate voice quivered as she spoke.  
A sigh slipped from Cardale’s lips.  
He had only gotten a little wet. Running after the carriage
had been nothing. Rolling in the dirt? That was truly
insignificant.  
And yet, the fact that she had worried, that she couldn’t
turn away when he called for her. That kindness, that
lingering care, pierced him to his core.  
‘Elise… Even though I never once turned back for you…’  
He faced his sins once more, his body recoiling from the
weight of his guilt.  
Yet at the same time, a selfish, desperate hope rose within
him—one that wished to be forgiven, even if only because of
her kindness.  
Even if it was merely pity, he would take it. Even if it was
just a fleeting emotion, he wouldn’t mind.  
No, he needed it. ‘Desperately.’  
‘You pathetic bastard.’  
He loathed himself for this clinging selfishness.  
Had he forgotten who had ruined her? Did he think she was
finally happy, only to shake her world once again?  
His self-centered greed made him sick.  
And yet…
He couldn’t let go. He couldn’t lose her.  
Even now, he was suffocating, his heart being torn apart…
How could he bear a lifetime without her?  
Cardale looked at Elise with desperate longing.  
To turn things back, or at the very least, to seize even the
smallest chance, he had already sworn to do anything. He
had long since accepted the hatred and condemnation that
would follow.  
Even knowing he could never atone, he could not give up.  
And that was his burden to bear.  
Cardale pressed his other knee to the ground, surrendering
himself to the dirt.  
Even the filth beneath him, even if it were a pit of sewage, it
wouldn’t matter.  
As long as she was standing before him.  
“Elise.”  
Her blue eyes widened in shock.  
“D-uke, what are you—?”  
Her unfinished words trailed off. Her thick silver lashes
quivered, and her eyes wavered as if lost.  
“D-Don’t do this. Please, don’t.”  
Cardale gazed up at her, unmoving.  
How many times had she knelt before him like this?  
How many times had she clung to his legs, begging and
pleading?  
And what had he done?
He had spat cruel words without hesitation. He had torn her
heart apart, trampled her underfoot. He had forced her into
submission, carved humiliation and disgrace into her soul.  
“Please… stand up, Duke. Please…”  
Yet now, ‘she’ was the one fretting, desperately trying to
stop him.  
Something burned hot inside his chest.  
He wanted to grab her shoulders and scream at her.
‘I am not the one you should be worrying about!’ 
‘I am not the one you should be saving!’
He had only knelt—just once.  
And he was a sinner.  
This was the very first time he had ever shown true
remorse.  
Yet even now, this foolishly kind woman was looking at him
with concern.  
She had not turned away. She had come back for him.  
Cardale clenched his fists tightly against the ground. The
veins on his forearms bulged, and his knuckles turned
white.  
‘What right did I ever have to be so cruel to you?’  
‘How shameless, how utterly wretched I must be.’  
If it had been difficult for him, how much harder must it
have been for her?  
And yet he had dragged her down, forcing her to her knees,
watching as she pleaded, without a shred of guilt.  
For the briefest of moments, he felt as though the rain
soaking him was not rain at all.  
But the countless tears Elise had shed.  
And if that were the case, then he welcomed it. 
He would take all of it.  
If it could ease even a fraction of her suffering, if it could
lessen her pain even slightly—  
Cardale closed his eyes for a long moment, then slowly
opened them.  
His gaze was solemn, more humble than ever before.  
“Elise.”  
He knew it was selfish.  
But if he didn’t say it now, he feared he would never have
another chance.  
And so, he clung to the mercy she had shown him.
For the first and perhaps last time, he was ready to confess
his sins.  
Cardale stared at her intently, then parted his lips.  
“I have wronged you more than I can ever atone for.”  
His voice was as heavy as stone.  
“I know it’s far too late. I know how shameless it is for me to
say this now.”  
He spoke each word carefully, deliberately, so the rain
wouldn’t drown out his voice.  
So that she would hear him.  
So that she might, just maybe, spare him even the smallest
kindness.
“I’m sorry.”  
Elise sucked in a sharp breath, covering her mouth with her
hands.  
Her eyes, wide and disoriented, trembled with disbelief.  
Cardale repeated himself, for her sake.  
“I’m sorry, Elise.”  
Hundreds, thousands of times, he could say it over and
over.  
If it meant she would forgive him.  
If it meant he could have even the smallest chance at
making amends.  
“I’m sorry.”  
Elise’s tear-streaked eyes turned even redder. Her trembling
lips parted, a quiet sob slipping through.  
Ah.  
He hadn’t meant to make her cry.  
He never wanted to see her cry again.  
Cardale’s expression twisted with guilt and sorrow.  
“Don’t cry, Elise. I was wrong… I was wrong about
everything.”  
‘Please, don’t cry.’  
But at last, her silent weeping gave way to soft, heartbroken
sobs.  
Her beautiful, sky-blue eyes crumpled, and tears fell freely.  
With a quiet ‘thud’, the umbrella slipped from her grasp and
landed on the ground.  
Elise buried her face in her hands.  
  
Cardale shot to his feet.  
He picked up the umbrella and held it over her head.  
Her small shoulders, damp and trembling like a rain-soaked
fawn, wrecked him. 
With hands washed clean by the rain, he pulled a
handkerchief from his coat.  
It was damp, but at least it wasn’t dirty.  
‘Don’t cry.’  
He didn’t dare touch her, but he gently dabbed the
handkerchief against her cheeks, wiping away her tears.  
He had to.  
If he didn’t, he would break.  
Time passed.  
At last, her sobs quieted.  
Elise slowly lifted her gaze.  
Her eyes, swollen and red, met his.  
“I thought I didn’t need an apology… But maybe I was
wrong.”  
Her small lips trembled.  
“I’ve held this pain inside me for so long…”  
She placed a hand over her heart, then met his gaze again.  
“Thank you for apologizing, Your Grace… I forgive you.”  
‘If I even have the right to.’  
Those final words struck like a dagger.  
And yet… 
Cardale had no choice but to ask.  
“Please… just once.”  
He steadied his breath.  
His desperate, yearning eyes locked onto hers.  
“Will you give me another chance?” 

Her teary, glistening eyes widened in surprise. Then, as if
trying to process the words she had just heard, her
trembling eyelids slowly blinked.  
Cardale forced himself to remain composed, silently
awaiting her response. But inside, he was burning with
impatience. Every second felt like an eternity, stretching
unbearably long.  
In the end, unable to suppress his desperate longing, he
opened his mouth hastily.  
“I’ll do better—”  
“Your Grace.”  
But her soft call stopped him mid-sentence. As if she had
already guessed what he was about to promise.  
“I…”  
Elise gave him a sorrowful smile.  
His heart plummeted at the sight.  
“I liked you, Your Grace.”  
His crimson eyes wavered violently.  
Her confession continued, her voice so faint it was barely
audible.  
“From the very first time we met.”  
‘When you held me in your broad arms, when you touched
me with gentle hands, when you spoke to me with
unexpected kindness…’  
Tears slipped down Elise’s cheeks as she unveiled the
feelings she had long hidden away.  
“I felt nervous… my heart raced.”  
‘You never knew, did you?’  
She tilted her gaze slightly, as if silently asking.  
It was only now that Cardale realized… smiles could be this
sorrowful, that they could ache so unbearably.  
‘Elise.’
‘I knew.’  
Her feelings had been too transparent to miss.  
She never learned how to hide them, always revealing them
openly.  
And yet, he had ignored them. No, worse. He had exploited
them.  
His cruelty disgusted him. The sins he had committed came
back to strangle him like an unrelenting noose.  
It was suffocating.  
“But…”  
Elise lowered her head, avoiding his gaze.  
“I can’t become Your Grace’s mistress again…”  
“No.”  
Cardale interrupted her urgently.  
“A mistress? How could I ever—”  
Guilt constricted his throat. His grip on the umbrella
tightened.  
“That’s not what I meant…”  
He faltered, exhaling deeply.  
What should he say?  
How could he express his feelings without any room for
misunderstanding?  
It felt like he had been handed the most difficult problem in
the world. He ran a rough hand over his face, his frustration
palpable.  
In the silence that followed, as the sound of the rain
softened for just a moment, Elise suddenly lifted her head.  
“…I realized it too late.”  
“No.”  
She whispered a quiet denial, but he pretended not to
hear.  
He had to say this.  
He had to confess.  
If he didn’t now, he might never be allowed to speak his
heart again.  
“Elise, I… I—”  
“No!”  
Her sharp voice cut through the air.  
It wasn’t loud, but it was enough to stop him.  
“No. No, Your Grace.”  
Elise shook her head with all her might, as if trying to rid
herself of a foolish delusion.  
Her movements were so desperate, so forceful, that it
looked painful.  
“You’re just confused right now.”  
She spoke firmly, forcing her voice to be cold. But even
then, she couldn’t suppress the tremble in her breath.  
“It’s because you feel guilty. But after some time passes…
you’ll change your mind.”  
Cardale wanted to argue.  
“I know this must feel sudden, but—”  
“Please…!”  
But Elise’s cry was nearly a scream, and his words died in
his throat.  
“Please… just stop.”  
And when tears burst from her eyes once more, he found
himself completely speechless.  
“Please… I beg you. Let this be the end…”  
Her small, clasped hands trembled violently. As if she were
standing before the most terrifying thing in the world.  
With an agonized expression, she met his gaze.  
“Maybe… maybe Your Grace is right. Maybe… you really do
mean it.”  
He couldn’t bring himself to speak. He could only watch,
powerless, as she poured out her pain.  
“That cravat pin… You’re still wearing it because of that,
aren’t you?”  
“…Yes.”  
His voice was hoarse as he answered.  
“You gave it to me. I promised I’d treasure it.”  
Elise pulled her lips into a sideways smile.  
A forced smile.  
It wasn’t laughter, nor was it quite sadness. But the sorrow
in it was unmistakable.  
She took a deep breath.  
As if she were trying to rid herself of every last trace of
hesitation.  
“But feelings… they can always change, can’t they?”  
  
Cardale desperately reached for her.  
“No, Elise. That’s not—”  
‘You’re wrong. You misunderstand. I swear this feeling won’t
change.’
‘Every single day, I…’
‘I’ve missed you.’
But his desperate plea never reached her.  
Elise’s voice, damp with tears, carried on.  
“I remember Your Grace’s kindness.”  
The warmth of the sun, the comforting heat of the summer
air, the bright green leaves rustling, the cicadas singing
busily…  
The moments he had unknowingly smiled, the warmth in his
hands when he laced his fingers through hers, the quiet
kindness in his indifferent words.  
All of it had been unfamiliar, but still—  
They had been moments that shone.
Tears, like morning dew, clung to her lashes as she
confessed how deeply she had cherished those memories.  
“So I was happy. But… sometimes, I was afraid.”  
Elise pressed a hand to her chest. As if trying to quiet the
erratic pounding of her heart.  
“I was afraid Your Grace would change. That one day, you’d
suddenly turn cold again…”  
‘I…’  
The realization struck Cardale like a bolt of lightning.  
Her fear.  
The lingering insecurity she had never been able to shake.  
He recalled how, even as she wished to stay by his side, she
had always feared being abandoned.  
And in the end, he had been the one to push her away.
He had threatened to sell her off, forced her to submit to his
will.  
Because of his own terrible choices. Because of the
unforgivable sins he had committed.
Cardale shut his eyes tightly. His expression twisted in
pain.  
He wanted to deny it.  
But reality was cruel.  
It hurt. But he had to admit it.  
Elise…
The woman whose heart he had longed for more than
anything.  
She might be able to forgive him.  
But she would never be able to trust him again.  
Even if he selfishly kept her by his side, she would never
believe in his love.  
She would build walls around herself, hiding away so she
could never be hurt again.  
She would never reach for him first.  
‘Elise…’  
‘How foolish I have been.’
‘A lover?’
The very thought of himself calling her that made him feel
sick.  
‘What right do you have? You, of all people?’
In the end, there was only one thing Cardale could say.  
“…I’m sorry.”  
A brief silence settled between them.  
The sound of the rain, growing heavier, pounded against the
shared umbrella.  
“That…”  
Elise’s gaze shifted downward.  
At his hands.  
Or rather—at what he held in them.  
His first instinct was to justify himself.  
“Raymond Hartmann had taken your handkerchief.”  
It had been obvious that he would take it back.  
But in the end, it was hers.  
He had no more right to it than Raymond did.  
Back then, she had embroidered it for him.
But now…  
“I heard… you meant to give it to me at the hunting
festival.”  
Elise nodded. Then, looking up at him, she whispered,  
“…May I tie it for you?”  
For a moment, Cardale thought he had misheard.  
Perhaps he was hallucinating from wishful thinking.  
But then she spoke again.  
“I promised to tie it for you back then.”  
No. This was real.  
“…Yes.”  
His throat tightened as he forced the words out.  
“Please.”  
As he lifted his arm, Elise carefully folded the handkerchief
and tied it around his wrist.  
Each time her delicate fingers brushed his skin, his heart
clenched.  
When she finished, she stepped back.  
A neatly tied ribbon rested on his wrist.  
“…Do you like it?”  
“More than anything.”  
Cardale answered, his voice thick with sincerity.  
“Thank you.”  
Elise gave him a faint smile.  
Like a raindrop, ephemeral and fleeting.  
Then, suddenly…
Her small frame tilted.  
“Elise!”  
Cardale caught her just as she collapsed into his arms.

Her body, once so warm and soft in his memories, now felt
cold.  
Her face, already so pale and delicate, had turned almost
bluish.  
It had only been for a moment, but her fragile body had
been exposed to the cold winter rain.  
‘She was in the rain.’
Elise had been in the rain.  
A delayed realization struck Cardale like a bolt of lightning,
chilling him to the bone.  
She was afraid of the rain.  
Whenever storms raged, whenever thunder and lightning
crackled in the sky, she would hide. Crouch in the narrow
space beneath a desk, trembling in the corners of a room.  
And yet, she had stepped out of the carriage for him.
She had walked through the rain to reach him. She had even
wrapped the handkerchief around his wrist.  
‘How long did I leave you standing there in the downpour?
How long?’
Cardale tightened his grip around Elise’s unconscious body,
shielding her from the rain as he ran.  
As soon as they arrived, the carriage door burst open, and a
frantic Damien shouted,  
“Elise!”  
His younger sister had left standing on her own two feet,
and now she was returning unconscious in the arms of Duke
Vassenberg.  
Damien, who adored his only sister above all else, was
utterly horrified.  
“Duke Vassenberg! What have you done to her?”  
“Move. Now.”  
Cardale’s answer was not an explanation, but an urgent
command.  
Under normal circumstances, Damien would have
reprimanded the man for his audacity.  
But at this moment, his sole focus was on Elise’s distressing
state.  
Without further delay, he knocked on the carriage wall,
signaling for the driver to depart at full speed.  
As the carriage sped forward, Cardale wrapped Elise in a
thick blanket, holding her tightly in his arms to warm her
ice-cold body.  
“What happened to her?” Damien’s voice was sharp with
anger. “She was perfectly fine just moments ago, and now
—!”  
But he abruptly stopped.  
He had noticed something.  
The tips of the duke’s fingers were trembling.  
His gaze traveled upward.  
Cardale, usually composed and expressionless, bore a look
of raw devastation.  
  
  
In the heavy silence, the only sound in the carriage was
Elise’s faint, labored breathing.  
When the carriage finally arrived at the Schuvan estate,
Damien wasted no time.  
“Fetch the doctor immediately!” he ordered, before turning
to take Elise from Cardale’s arms.  
“Hand her to me. She needs to see a physician at once. I will
have the carriage prepared for your return—”  
“Where is her room?”  
But instead of releasing her, Cardale carried her straight
inside.  
Not only did he personally lay her down on the bed, but he
also removed her muddied shoes and took her cold feet in
his hands, warming them carefully.  
Both Damien and the servants who had gathered, including
their mother, Marissa, watched in stunned silence.  
“Your Grace, we will prepare dry clothes for you. You should
change.”  
At Damien’s suggestion, Cardale frowned. He was aware of
his disheveled state, but Elise’s condition took priority.  
“You should change as well, Your Grace,” Marissa gently
interjected. 
“Elise must be dressed in dry clothes before the doctor
arrives.”  
Only then did Cardale reluctantly step into an adjacent
room, quickly drying himself and changing into fresh
garments.  
Before long, the doctor arrived, flustered from being
summoned in haste.  
After a careful examination, he gave his diagnosis.  
“Her body is naturally weak, and her strength has not yet
fully returned. The sudden exposure to the cold must have
shocked her system. She should recover with ample rest in
a warm environment.”  
Damien exhaled in relief.  
But Cardale’s crimson eyes flashed sharply.  
“Then why hasn’t she woken up yet?”  
“W-Well, that’s…” The doctor faltered under the intense
scrutiny.  
Cardale’s presence alone was enough to make the man
stammer.  
The reality was that Cardale was the reason for her collapse,
yet he couldn’t accept the uncertainty in the physician’s
tone.  
“I-It’s not entirely certain, but perhaps—”  
“Count Schuvan.”  
Cardale cut the doctor off and turned to Damien.  
“If you have no objections, I will summon Elise’s former
physician from the ducal estate.”  
Damien scoffed internally at the so-called request.  
From the way the duke spoke, it was clear that even if
Damien refused, the physician would be brought
regardless.  
Still, he was not foolish enough to voice that thought.  
And Elise’s well-being was his priority, so he agreed.  
“…Very well.”  
Shortly after, Cardale’s personal physician arrived, and his
diagnosis was nearly identical.  
“She is merely asleep. I will prepare medicine to aid her
recovery.”  
But then, the doctor added something meaningful.  
“The most important thing is peace of mind. A body cannot
heal if the heart is plagued by fear and anxiety.”  
“…Is there anything else?”  
“No. If all goes well, she should wake by this evening. At the
latest, by tomorrow.”  
Having said his piece, the doctor packed his belongings and
left.  
Cardale remained standing by Elise’s bedside, gazing down
at her pale, unconscious face.  
He listened to her faint breathing, watched the slow rise and
fall of her chest beneath the blankets.  
His darkened eyes grew even heavier.  
“Your Grace, it is late.”  
Damien spoke up.  
“I appreciate your concern and the effort you made to
summon a physician. But from here on, my mother and I will
look after Elise—”  
“Just until she wakes.”  
“…Pardon?”  
Cardale did not even glance away from Elise as he repeated
himself.  
“I will stay until she wakes.”  
Damien turned to his mother in exasperation.  
Marissa, who had been silently observing, simply nodded.  
And so, the three of them remained by Elise’s bedside.  
Damien, unable to suppress his conflicted emotions,
watched as the Duke sat unwavering at his sister’s side.  
“Hah…”  
A sigh slipped out, unspoken thoughts weighing heavily in
his mind.  
He recalled what had happened earlier.  
Through the glass of the carriage window, he had seen it all.
Cardale, desperately chasing after them in the storm.  
  
“Brother Damien, the Duke is—”
“Ignore him.”
“But…”
Despite his efforts to dissuade her, Elise kept glancing
back.  
Then, when the Duke stumbled and collapsed in the mud,
she let out a small gasp.  
“Stop the carriage.”
“Elise.”  
“I can’t just leave him out there in the rain. I’ll just give him
the umbrella and come right back.”  
“But the rain is pouring—!”
“Please, Brother.”
Damien had not been able to refuse her.  
And so, he had given the order to stop the carriage.  
He had not been able to hear their conversation over the
rain.  
But the glass was clear enough to see.  
He had witnessed the Duke kneel before her.  
He had seen his sister tying the handkerchief around his
wrist.  
That same handkerchief was still there now, neatly tied
around Cardale Vassenberg’s wrist.  
The emblem of his house embroidered into the corner.  
And so, Damien realized… Elise had forgiven this cold,
selfish man.  
It was not a pleasant realization.  
She had never spoken of it, but Damien knew the suffering
she had endured.  
The humiliation, the fear, the loneliness.  
This was not something that should have been so easily
forgiven.  
Yet at the same time, he understood Cardale’s actions were
anything but ordinary.  
What kind of nobleman, high and mighty, kneels before a
woman he once discarded?  
If he truly wanted her, he could have taken her by force.  
No one would have condemned him for it.  
He had that power.  
And yet, he hadn’t.  
And Elise had forgiven him.  
There was only one possible conclusion.  
‘Cardale Vassenberg… and Elise…’  
With that thought, Damien’s emotions grew even more
tangled.  
“Forgive my intrusion.”  
At that moment, Cardale stood from his seat.  
Damien instinctively followed, only to freeze.  
Elise’s eyelashes trembled.  
“Elise, can you hear me?”  
As Damien rushed to her side, Cardale quietly stepped out
of the room. 

Elise had awakened, and that was enough. Staying by her
side would be of no help, so stepping away was the right
thing to do. Seeing him would only hinder her recovery.  
Cardale had noticed it… the slight tremor in Elise’s hands as
she tied a handkerchief around his wrist, the way her body
flinched every time their skin touched.  
It meant that her fear of him had not yet faded.  
Hadn’t the doctor who had been tending to Elise also said
that she needed stability?  
Rather than providing relief, he only brought her fear. It
would be better for him to remain out of sight.  
That was why he rose to his feet the moment Elise tried to
regain her senses.  
But just because he understood it rationally, didn’t mean he
could truly accept it with ease.  
In truth, Cardale was forcibly suppressing his anguish and
humiliation.  
“Your Grace, Duke Vassenberg.”  
He reacted instinctively to the call—it was a voice that
resembled hers.  
Turning around, he saw Marissa standing there.  
“May I request a moment of your time?” 

Cardale returned to the ducal estate just before midnight.  
His arrival was later than expected, but no one in the
mansion found it unusual. Their master often left at dawn
and returned in the dead of night.  
When he had been living with Elise Schuvan, such
occurrences had significantly decreased, but now she was
gone. There was nothing strange about his old habits
returning.  
“Master, what in the world…?”  
Linda and Norman hurried to the front entrance upon
hearing of his return and were startled. Not because of the
hour, but because of his disheveled state.  
His normally impeccable attire had been replaced with
something else. Compared to his usual neat appearance, he
was a mess.  
“Don’t fuss, Norman. The bath?”  
“I-It has been prepared in the bathroom.”  
“Then that’s all that matters. Rest now.”  
“Master, are you injured…?”  
“Not at all.”  
Norman tried to follow him, but Cardale raised his hand to
stop him.  
As he crossed the entrance hall, his gaze landed on the wall
lights, and suddenly, he stopped in his tracks.  
It was as if he had just realized something.  
His eyes slowly swept over the interior. A quiet sigh escaped
his slightly parted lips.  
“Here…”  
He had thought it was all gone.  
All the little things she had used had been sent away, and
he had believed that no trace of her remained in this
mansion.  
But Elise’s presence was still here.  
Cardale took in the curtains hanging over each window, the
light-colored wallpaper, the lamps, and the decorations, as if
he were caressing them with his gaze.  
He had entrusted Elise with redecorating the mansion.  
In hindsight, it had been a rather unconventional decision. A
mistress was rarely given such responsibilities. Even if the
household lacked a proper lady of the house.  
Yet he had entrusted the lady’s role… to Elise.  
“What do you think…?”
“It’s fine.”
“Really?”
“Yes. It’s better than I expected. I didn’t think you’d do this
well.”
  
He recalled her face, anxious as she awaited his reaction,
brightening the moment he approved. Like a flower bud
blooming, lovely and radiant.  
And he remembered himself, unable to look away from that
face. Though he hadn’t shown it, he had been pleased.  
It had been sweet and gratifying. So much so that he had
asked her if she had a wish. He had promised to help her
find her mother.  
Even though he hadn’t needed to.  
The tasks Elise had done for the mansion had already been
rewarded generously.  
All he had to do was continue compensating her as he
always had.  
But he had asked her to name a wish anyway. And he had
already known what she would say.  
  
In the reflection of the golden helmet ornament, he saw his
own face—and beneath it, the crimson cravat pin.  
He had changed out of his dirty shirt, but the pin remained
in place. As if it were only natural.  
“It’s an outdated tradition now, but in the past, only a wife
could tie her husband’s cravat.” 
“I-I didn’t mean it like that…”
“I know. No one even remembers that custom anymore, not
even the royals.”
…Had that been it?  
A wry smile slipped out at the realization. A hollow laugh
mixed into it.  
Had he wished for her to be his wife?  
But like a fool, he had failed to recognize his true feelings.
He had sensed them, faintly, yet he had denied and ignored
them.  
‘But feelings can always change.’
A clear rejection.  
Compared to the cruel words he had spoken to her, it had
been a remarkably gentle and kind response.  
Yet just recalling it made his heart ache. The irrevocable
past was unbearably bitter.  
“Master, is something wrong?”  
Norman’s concerned voice pulled him from his thoughts.  
Cardale had been staring blankly at the mansion and
murmuring self-derisively, so he gave a brief response.  
“It’s nothing.”

The man dismissed all his attendants and stepped into the
bathroom alone.  
Hot water cascaded down his firm body, washing away the
remnants of rain and dirt without a trace.  
If only he could cleanse his wounded, stained heart just as
easily.  
He watched the murky water swirl away, and for a fleeting
moment, a futile thought surfaced before dissolving into the
thick steam.  
After roughly drying himself and slipping on a robe,
Cardale’s eyes narrowed slightly.  
Michael was waiting for him.  
“Did you not hear that you were to rest?”  
“I did, Your Grace. However, there is something I must
report to you.”  
If it was important enough to require a report at this hour, it
had to be of significant concern. Cardale recalled a few
pending matters as he moved toward his desk.  
“Speak.”  
As soon as he gave the command, Michael placed a small
pouch on the desk.  
“The portrait for the pendant has been completed.”  
  
Cardale silently looked down at the desk before untying the
knot and retrieving the pendant.  
With a soft click, the lid opened, revealing the portrait
inside.  
“Does it require any further modifications?”  
The original painting had undergone several revisions,
delaying its completion.  
He had meant to give it to Elise before she left.  
“This will do.”  
Confirming that it had been restored almost identically to
the original, he nodded.  
“Make sure the painter is properly compensated.”  
“As you wish.”  
Michael bowed with disciplined precision before leaving the
room.  
Cardale gazed at the portrait; a young girl and her mother,
smiling tenderly.  
A voice surfaced in his mind.  
“I am the worst mother in the world.”
The eyes that had confessed those words were the same
color as those of his woman.  
“I couldn’t feed her enough, couldn’t buy her what she
wanted, couldn’t let her sleep comfortably in a warm place.”
“Even when she was beaten unjustly… I couldn’t protect
her.”
What she had recounted was Elise’s childhood.  
The countless abuses she had endured as a small and
helpless girl. The pain and suffering she had borne with her
frail body.  
He had already suspected it. The signs of abuse had been
all too evident.  
She feared rain, flinched at pain, and was easily brought to
tears.  
But having a vague suspicion was one thing. Listening to the
harrowing details was another.  
For someone as gentle as her, those memories must have
left deep, lasting scars of fear and trauma.  
Cardale simmered with quiet rage.  
He wanted to drag Fritz Schuvan back from the grave just to
make him suffer the same agony.  
He resolved to bring Gerhard Schuvan, now half-paralyzed
and barely clinging to life, to justice.  
“And so, I am always sorry to Elise. No matter what she
chose, it was always because of her unworthy mother…”
Marissa’s face, lined with traces of time, bore round tears at
the corners of her eyes.  
Her love for her daughter was etched into every trembling
word.  
“Your Grace, you may find it hard to believe, but in truth,
Elise…”  
Cardale stared at the young girl in the portrait and softly
murmured her name.  
Low and tender, filled with warmth and affection.  
Elise.  
‘I wish I could call you like this once more.’
His fingers gently traced the smooth surface of the pendant,
as if caressing the most precious thing in the world.  
‘I wish I could hold you like this.’
‘I long for the mornings I would wake to your sleeping face.
For shared meals, for leisurely walks with our fingers
intertwined, for the taste of your lips among the blooming
flowers…’
‘I dream and yearn endlessly.’
‘If only I dared.’

That was why, in truth, the person Cardale most desperately
wanted to strangle to death was none other than himself.  
Because he had broken the woman who had endured
countless abuses. Because Vanessa Roxid, Fritz Schwann,
and Gerhard Schwann’s evil deeds were, in the end, lesser
sins compared to his own.  
“I liked you, Your Grace.”  
“From the very first time we met.”  
“I felt nervous… my heart raced.”  
She had been exhausted by her harsh life, wandering
aimlessly, yearning for just a sliver of warmth.  
So much so that she had surrendered both body and soul to
the kindness thrown at her like a mere act of charity.  
And that was why she had crumbled. She had let go of
everything, given up completely. Because he had trampled
on the only light she had, the hope she had clung to, the
dreams, expectations, and desires she had nurtured so
dearly.  
If she had known nothing, perhaps she could have endured.
But having once felt warmth, only to have it snatched away
in an instant, left her utterly broken.  
Cardale gazed at the young girl in the portrait for a long
time, contemplating and weighing his thoughts.  
Searching for a way to earn the trust of a woman who could
no longer believe in him. Determined that no matter how
cunning or deceitful the method, he would not hesitate.  
If he could regain her trust, if he could win back her heart,
was there anything he wouldn’t do?  
“Ugh…!”  
Suddenly, nausea surged within him, forcing Cardale to
double over in urgency.  
His stomach twisted violently. Bile rose to his throat, but all
that came out were dry, heaving retches. The sensation was
sickeningly similar to severe morning sickness.  
As if trying to purge himself of his layered sins, he retched
over and over, then covered his face with his hand.  
Disgusting.  
Knowing the sins he had committed, yet using repentance
and regret as an excuse to seek her forgiveness, his own
hypocrisy made him sick.  
Even the stench of rotting meat or the foulness of spoiled
fish could not compare to this revulsion.  
And yet, even if he had to live his entire life shackled by
self-loathing and guilt. Cardale wished to remain by Elise’s
side, suffering for it.  
So that even by chance, her gaze might linger on him, her
faint sighs might brush past him, her scent might drift
toward him, her fingertips might graze him.  
Fortunately, Elise cherished the child she carried. She
already loved the life that had yet to be born. To her, it was
a weakness. To him, it was his only opportunity.  
Yes. He needed undeniable proof, something she would
have no choice but to accept. He had to present her with an
offer so compelling that she could not refuse.  
For a woman who was certain that love was fickle and
fleeting, a mere emotion that could change at any time, he
would make an unbreakable deal.  
A contract that would never waver.  
Cardale pulled out a fine sheet of paper from his desk
drawer. Ink seeped into the nib of his quill as he lowered his
gaze, his hand moving with precise intent.  
One by one, elegant letters formed across the blank page.  
The awareness that he was exploiting her tender heart,
prying into her vulnerabilities, filled him with bitter selfloathing. But not once did his handwriting waver.  
His desperate desire to stay by Elise’s side, even if through
such means, was enough to smother his guilt.  
And so, the words written at the top of the page read:  
[Marriage Contract]

The next day, Cardale led a select group of elite soldiers into
the hunting grounds of the forest.  
His subordinates’ sincere, final attempts to dissuade him
were in vain. Even when Michael suggested an alternative
approach, Cardale remained firm in his decision to head
straight into the heart of the woods.  
Fortunately, luck was on their side.  
Flocks of birds flapped their wings in alarm, small wild
animals scurried away in fright, but no ferocious beasts
appeared to block their path.  
Thanks to this, they reached the forest’s core without losing
a single soldier.  
It was then that Cardale suddenly reined in his horse.  
“Fall back.”  
“Your Grace, what is it?”  
“Retreat and take defensive positions. They will come in
packs.”  
His gaze fixed ahead as he raised his rifle.  
Sensing his heightened awareness, the subordinates tensed
and readied their weapons.  
Bang!  
Cardale fired. A short death cry echoed as a massive beast
collapsed. At the same moment, growls erupted from all
around them.  
Bang! Bang! Bang!
Gunfire ripped through the air. Each shot landed flawlessly,
cutting down the savage beasts one after another.  
Cardale spurred his horse forward.  
“Your Grace!”  
“Clear the bodies and follow me.”  
Leaving his bewildered subordinates behind, he charged
deeper into the forest, slicing through any wild beasts that
leapt at him with practiced ease.  
Once he broke through the initial wave, reaching his
destination was swift.  
At last, he arrived at the forest’s center.  
And there it was, the target he had sought.  
A beast with a coat of glistening, pure white fur.  
Cardale quickly estimated their numbers. It was sufficient.
Eliminating the natural predators beforehand had been a
wise move.  
These were for his woman.  
A gift for her.  
To keep his Elise warm, since she was especially sensitive to
the cold.  
Around him, the silver foxes bared their long, deadly fangs.
Each as large as a grown man’s hand.  
They sensed the danger emanating from the intruder, the
overwhelming pressure he exuded. And yet, they did not
flee, for they had mates and offspring hidden within their
den to protect.  
But in the end, they would fail. Their pelts alone would be
enough to serve his purpose.  
Cardale’s focus sharpened to an almost frightening degree.  
Though his body teetered on the brink of exhaustion,
deprived of proper meals and rest, his determination was
unwavering.  
He gripped his sword tightly, its blade catching the frigid
winter sunlight.  
“Come.”  
“Graaaah!”  
Three silver foxes lunged at once, their skulls instantly
pierced through. His sword struck only vital points, clean,
precise, lethal.  
Within moments, the entire pack was annihilated.  
It was over.  
Dismounting, Cardale surveyed the fallen bodies, estimating
the quality of their pelts.  
He sent up a signal flare.  
Just as he was about to mount his horse—  
Crunch!
A sickening sound of bone shattering tore through the air as
searing pain exploded in his left shoulder.  
Instinctively, he twisted his body and swung his sword.  
A fox tumbled to the ground, its convulsing body pooling
blood into the snow.  
“…Damn it.”  
Cardale cursed, clutching his shoulder.  
The fangs of a silver fox carried deadly venom. Already, the
poison was coursing through his veins. His limbs grew icecold, as though submerged in freezing water. His vision
blurred.  
He clenched his teeth, struggling to remain conscious.  
But his exhausted body, held together by sheer will, finally
collapsed like a tree.  
A sharp ringing filled his ears.  
And then, darkness swallowed him whole.  

“…Duke.”  
A gentle voice brushed against his ears.  
Even through his hazy mind, Cardale thought it was a
beautiful voice. Warm, soft, soothing.  
…And familiar.  
“Duke Vassenberg.”  
Who would call him that?  
Even in the cradle of his mother’s arms, he had never heard
such kindness in a voice.  
His brow furrowed slightly as he searched his memory. Then,
as if he were being pulled from the depths of water, his
consciousness jolted awake.  
Elise!  
His eyes snapped open.  
Long, silvery hair cascaded down, clear blue eyes like a
tranquil lake. A pale, delicate face, softly flushed cheeks,
lips tinted the hue of ripe fruit.  
“You’re awake.”  
Like a miracle, Elise was sitting beside his bed.  
How…?  
Cardale tried to sit up.  
“You mustn’t move yet.”  
Elise quickly reached out to stop him.  
“The physician said you need a few more days of rest.”  
With no choice but to lie back, he glanced around.  
His bedroom.  
The thin sheet draped over him was proof enough.  
“You were poisoned by a beast while hunting,” she
murmured.  
And just like that, it all came rushing back.  
The fox’s fangs. The venom. His body failing him.  
“I’m so relieved… You don’t know how worried I was.”  
Cardale’s eyes widened slightly.  
Elise… was worried?  
Unaware of his stunned reaction, she wrung out a damp
cloth and gently wiped the sweat from his forehead and
temples.  
His throat, dry and rough as if filled with sand, let out a
hoarse whisper.  
“Have you… been here this whole time…?”  
Their eyes met.  
Elise hesitated for a moment before slowly nodding.  
She had nursed him back to health.  
For a moment, he was speechless.  
Was this a dream? A hallucination?  
“Why…?”  
‘Why would you, of all people?’
“Just…”  
Elise’s lips parted slightly. 

“I wanted to stay by your side.”  
As her earnest gaze met his, Cardale recalled a memory
from his arrogant past.  
The time he had harshly scolded her for worrying about him,
telling her to know her place. The day he had dismissed her
simple desire to comfort him as ridiculous.  
It had been nothing more than misplaced anger. Unable to
admit the turmoil in his heart, the way his emotions
wavered, he had lashed out at her instead.  
She must still remember it. The pain must still linger,
unwashed and unresolved. Yet, her kind nature had not
changed in the slightest.  
“…You should be taking care of yourself, not worrying about
me.”  
“I’m fine. I’ve recovered completely. And the baby is
growing well, too. And…”  
Elise hesitated, unable to continue. A faint flush spread
across her pale face, creeping up to the tips of her ears.  
It had been so long since he had seen her like this that
Cardale found himself staring at her as if entranced. He
knew that face well—it was the expression she made when
she was about to say something embarrassing or shy.  
“I missed you.”  
  
Her voice trembled as she carefully let out the words.  
“I was afraid I might never see you again. So… So I came
looking for you.”  
It was devastatingly sweet. More tempting than the song of
a siren luring sailors to their deaths.  
Unable to hold back any longer, Cardale sat up. This time,
Elise did not stop him.  
He reached out and cupped her flushed cheek, feeling the
soft warmth against his skin.  
The sensation he had longed for so desperately sent a
shiver through him.  
“Elise.”  
His rough voice was thick with indescribable longing. As if
she understood, her blue eyes fluttered shut.  
Impulse seized him, his body moving before his mind could
catch up.  
Warm, delicate breaths brushed against his lips before he
finally pressed them against hers.  
A light touch at first, like tapping on a door. He pulled away
briefly, only to return again, repeating the motion until her
soft lips parted slightly. The moment they did, he deepened
the kiss, letting their lips meld together.  
A rush of ecstasy and overwhelming emotion flooded
through him.  
It was dizzying, intoxicating.  
Enveloped in an uncontrollable tide of sensation, he traced
her tender lips with his tongue, slowly and carefully, as
though they were something infinitely precious.  
It was a deep, fervent kiss. More than any moment before,
he poured all of his love into it.  
He could feel Elise’s breath grow uneven. Reluctantly
suppressing his greed, he slowly pulled away. Her lips, now
slightly swollen, glistened faintly with moisture.  
“Duke…”  
As he brushed his thumb across her flushed cheek, she
gazed at him with sparkling eyes, filled with anticipation and
excitement.  
It felt as though he was looking at her on a summer’s day—
the way she had once been, untouched by his cruelty.  
The warmth in his heart swelled until it nearly overflowed.  
And then, he heard something that made him doubt his own
ears.  
“I love you.”  
Cardale’s eyes flew open.  
Elise was smiling at him, a radiant, joyful smile.  
Her crescent-shaped eyes held nothing but happiness, no
pain, no resentment, no lingering wounds.  
“Why do you look so surprised?”  
She reached out and tucked a stray lock of his hair behind
his ear, the motion smooth and natural, as if she had done it
a thousand times before.  
“I thought you would confess first… I feel a little
disappointed.”  
She even pouted slightly, as if sulking.  
It was completely unlike the Elise he knew.  
The crimson of his irises, just moments ago clouded with
happiness, now trembled violently, like waves struck by a
storm.  
It was only now, drunk on joy, that he began to notice the
subtle, unsettling wrongness.  
The way she smiled, as if all past wounds had been erased.
The way she spoke and touched him without hesitation. The
way she confessed her love so openly.  
“Elise.”  
He whispered her name, his voice strained.  
Everything was wrong.  
Starting with the fact that Elise had come to him in the first
place.  
The knowledge of his injuries was a tightly guarded secret.
There was no way such a matter could have leaked from
Vassenberg.  
Even if, by some impossible chance, news had reached the
Schuvan estate, Damien Schuvan would have ensured it
was kept from his sister.  
Which meant…  
A sharp ringing filled his ears.  
His vision wavered.  
Elise’s figure wavered like a mirage, her form beginning to
melt and dissolve.  
The piercing sound struck again, shattering the beautiful
dream he had unknowingly conjured.  
“Your Grace! Are you alright?”  
As his unsteady body swayed, he clenched his hands, trying
to ground himself. Beneath his palms, he felt the rough
texture of a tree trunk. The damp, earthy scent of dense
vegetation filled his nose.  
‘A forest.’
The cold air seeped into his lungs, sharpening his muddled
consciousness. Slowly, Cardale straightened his posture.  
“Your wound is deep. We must return and have it treated
immediately.”  
Michaell was binding the bite wound on his shoulder with
cloth, his expression grave.  
Then, he pulled out a small vial from his coat.  
“Here, take the antidote—”  
“I don’t need it.”  
Cardale’s voice was firm.  
“The poison has already been neutralized.”  
His body had developed a resistance to most toxins. The
venom of a silver fox was potent, but his weakened state
had merely left him susceptible to a brief hallucination.  
“Clean up the area. We’re returning.”  
“Understood, Your Grace.”  
With watchful precision, the silver fox pelts were carefully
loaded onto a cart. Cardale climbed onto his waiting horse.  
Though his outward composure remained unshaken, he was
struggling to suppress the crushing emptiness inside him.  
The dream had been cruelly vivid.  
A world where his most desperate wishes had come true, a
world so beautiful that just having her by his side had made
his heart tremble with happiness.  
And now, all that remained was devastating hollowness.  
His throat tightened.  
His vision blurred with unshed tears as a storm of
indescribable emotion churned within his chest. The pain
was unbearable.  
‘Elise.’
‘Was this how you felt when your happiness was shattered?’
Head bowed, Cardale covered his face with his hand.  
  
Elise’s bedroom was the warmest room in the entire
Schuvan estate.  
Despite the winter chill, the air inside was always
comfortably warm.  
Surrounding the circular sofa near the fireplace were various
baby items. Elise sat beside her mother, concentrating on
the needle in her hands.  
“First, thread the needle, then loop the thread around
once… Am I doing it right?”  
“You’re doing well.”  
Marissa smiled as she answered.  
Still, Elise remained tense, focusing intently. Learning to knit
was no easy task, and her hands kept slipping.  
“Ah…!”  
She let out a small yelp as she made another mistake.  
“It’s alright, dear. You just dropped a stitch.”  
Marissa took the needle from her, fixing the mistake before
handing it back. Elise sighed in relief.  
“At this rate, I don’t know when I’ll finish making clothes for
the baby. I’m losing confidence.”  
“Don’t worry. The due date is in late spring, you have plenty
of time.”  
Marissa winked playfully.  
“By then, you’ll be much better at it.”  
“Do you really think so?”  
“Of course.”  
Elise finally smiled in reassurance.  
Spending time with her mother and brother brought her
immense joy.  
She was living the peaceful, happy life she had once only
dreamed of.  
But then… 
‘…Huh?’ 
A strange chill crept into her chest.  
As though winter’s icy breath had seeped into her heart.  
Her hand unconsciously moved to her chest.  
‘Again…?’
Even after reuniting with her family, there were moments
when she felt an inexplicable emptiness.  
But never before had it felt this cold, this ominous.  
Like the feeling of impending misfortune.  
“Elise, what’s wrong?”  
“I-It’s nothing.”  
She quickly shook her head, not wanting to worry her
mother.  
But already, a figure had surfaced in her mind.  
A man, battered and rain-soaked, desperately running
toward her.  
“Elise, I… I—”
“No!”
His face, twisted in pain at her rejection.  
‘Was I too harsh?’
‘Had I been too cruel?’
‘Had I cut him off too coldly?’
She hadn’t been at peace since that day.  
A knock at the door interrupted her thoughts.  
“Elise, you have a visitor.”  
Her eyes widened in shock.  
“It’s been a while, Elise.”  
Cardale greeted her with a faint smile.

‘The Duke really came to find me.’
Even as she looked at him standing before her, Elise found it
hard to believe.  
What was even more difficult to understand was the gentle
warmth in his eyes.  
At the center of his neatly tied cravat was the red pin she
had once given him.  
‘I thought he would be angry with me… At the very least, I
expected him to be disappointed.’  
The image of him kneeling in the rain, completely drenched,
begging for forgiveness was still fresh in her mind.  
A proud man, who stood as high as the sun itself, had
bowed his head before a mere woman who had once been a
mere servant of the night.  
And yet, she had rejected his sincerity. She had refused to
grant him even a single chance. She had been unable to
hide the deep-rooted distrust in her heart, exposing it
without hesitation.  
She had known that she would hurt him—his pride, his
heart, or perhaps something even deeper.  
‘So… I truly thought I would never see him again.’  
At the very least, she had thought she would never see such
gentle eyes again. Never again hear that soft, warm voice
that carried a quiet depth.  
Yet the turmoil in her stomach, the unease that had been
swirling within her, suddenly vanished as if it had never
been there.  
Strangely, she felt a sense of relief.  
The man quietly approached and bent down, picking up the
unfinished knitting piece she had unknowingly dropped.
Gently, he placed it back onto her lap.  
“…Ah.”  
Elise’s lips parted slightly. She hadn’t even realized she had
let it slip from her hands.  
“You were knitting baby clothes, I see.”  
“I-It was just practice.”  
Embarrassed by the uneven stitches and messy loops, she
hurriedly covered it with her sleeve.  
“But… what brings you here?”  
“I was worried about your well-being.”  
“You… You were?”  
The question slipped out before she could stop herself.  
Elise gasped, clamping her mouth shut.  
‘Oh no. He’ll find out.’  
He would realize that she had been worrying about him all
this time. That she had never admitted it to her mother or
Damien.  
Flustered, she stammered, grasping for an excuse.  
“I-I mean, what I was trying to say is—”  
“I’m relieved to see you looking well.”  
His voice was filled with warmth.  
“I was afraid you might have fallen ill after being caught in
the rain for so long.”  
Elise flinched and looked at him again. Their gazes met and
tangled in midair.  
But got soaked even more than I did.  
The words hovered in her mind, but she couldn’t bring
herself to say them aloud. Instead, her lips parted and
closed repeatedly. 
Then, in a quiet voice, he asked,  
“Can we speak alone for a moment?”  
“No.”  
Before she could answer, Damien’s firm voice cut through
the air.  
“Elise needs stability now more than ever. If your
conversation is so innocent, there should be no reason to
hide it.”  
Damien’s expression hardened, making it clear that he did
not trust the Duke in the slightest.  
But Cardale did not so much as flinch. He simply looked at
Elise, as if he would only accept her decision.  
“…It’s okay, Brother.”  
“Elise…!”  
“It’s just a conversation. If it makes you feel better, I’ll leave
the door slightly open.”  
She smiled reassuringly at her brother before turning to her
mother.  
“Don’t worry, Mother.”  
Marissa, who had been watching her daughter closely,
slowly rose from her seat.  
“Come, Damien. Let’s step outside.”  
“But—”  
“You were the one who brought the Duke here, were you
not?”  
Damien hesitated but, unable to refute his mother’s
reasoning, reluctantly followed her out of the room.  
Elise watched them leave, then lowered her gaze to her lap,
where her hands rested.  
Her fingers trembled.  
It was a habit she had developed ever since that day—the
day she had been hunted like prey, held at gunpoint, and
ultimately dragged away like an animal.  
She always tried to suppress it, but whenever she was alone
with him, her body reacted on its own.  
Determined not to let it show, Elise curled her fingers tightly
into her palms and spoke.  
“You must be uncomfortable… Please, take a seat.”  
“May I?”  
“Of course.”  
She nodded.  
She forced herself to push down the faint fear lingering in
the back of her mind, the worry that he might suddenly
change, that he might revert to the man who once coerced
her to get what he wanted.  
As if he understood, Cardale slowly lowered himself.  
He knelt on one knee before her, leveling their heights.  
Surprised, Elise hurriedly tried to stop him.  
“Ah, I meant for you to sit on the sofa… I didn’t mean for
you to—”  
“I know.”  
Cardale shook his head.  
“I just wanted to be closer to you. To talk with you like
this.”  
His voice softened.  
“And there’s something I want to return to you.”  
He reached into his coat and pulled out a small pouch,
offering it to her.  
Elise hesitated, puzzled, but accepted it and opened the
pouch.  
Her eyes widened.  
Had she seen it correctly? Was she imagining things?  
Her silvery lashes trembled as she blinked repeatedly,
checking and rechecking.  
‘But I… I threw this into the fire…’  
No matter how many times she looked, it remained
unchanged.  
Not a single scorch mark. Not a single dent.  
With a soft clink, a pendant slipped from the pouch into her
palm.  
“How did you…?”  
Her voice trembled as she lifted her gaze to his.  
Instead of answering, Cardale simply smiled.  
“Open it.”  
Elise hesitated before cautiously flipping open the locket’s
lid.  
‘…!’  
Her blue eyes shook violently as they filled with tears.  
It was the same.  
Her mother in her youth. Herself as a child. Just as she
remembered.  
The last thing she had stared at endlessly before throwing it
into the fire, convinced she would never see it again.  
“I wanted to give it to you sooner. But restoring it took
longer than expected.”  
She had thought it was lost forever.  
She had survived, met her family again but she had never
imagined she would regain something she had personally
cast into the flames.  
“I only realized it when I found this in the ashes of the
fireplace.”  
His voice carried the weight of a confession.  
“I finally understood what you must have felt when you ran
away. The resolve it took to escape into the forest. The pain,
the despair, the unbearable suffering.”  
A long pause.  
“The weight of my sins…” His voice was barely above a
whisper. “How unforgivable they were.”  
A single tear slipped from Elise’s eye, falling onto her lap.  
Even now, the pain and despair of that moment were
wounds she carried. The guilt of once considering
abandoning her child had never fully faded.  
She had merely buried it, unable to erase it.  
Because remembering it hurt too much.  
“I’m sorry, Elise.”  
Tears continued to fall, despite her desperate attempt to
hold them back.  
She tried to bite her lip, to stop the sobs from escaping.  
“Don’t hold it in.”  
His voice was gentle.  
“No… cry as much as you need.”  
Elise froze.  
She had never expected to hear those words.  
He had always told her not to cry.  
Her tear-filled eyes met his.  
“Scream at me. Blame me. Ask me how I could have done
something so unforgivable. Hate me.”  
His face twisted in pain.  
“If it eases your heart, even a little… then I will be glad.”  
Elise’s lips trembled.  
And then—  
“You… You really are a terrible man.”  
Her tears finally burst forth.  
“You were cruel, heartless, and cold and…”  
“I’m sorry.”  
She sobbed as she pounded her fists weakly against his
chest.  
“Why… Why did you do it?”  
His arms wrapped around her trembling frame.  
“I’m sorry.”  
Again and again, his voice whispered apologies into her
ear.  
And as those words seeped into her heart—she could feel
the sincerity in them. 

When was the last time she had let her emotions burst forth
so violently?  
Elise had always been accustomed to enduring. No matter
how unjust, painful, or distressing a situation was, she had
learned to suppress her feelings. To bear it—until eventually,
it passed.  
Sometimes old scars resurfaced unexpectedly, but she
would push them down again to hide them away.  
And somehow, the days continued, one after another.  
But now, as though a dam had reached its breaking point,
everything spilled out of her all at once.  
Her wounds, raw and exposed, festered without a chance to
heal.  
“Y-You will pay for everything. Every cruel thing you did to
me, every harsh word, you’ll feel it all just as I did… I’ll
make sure you can’t sleep from regret, that you’ll be
consumed with sorrow and pain!”  
“You can.”  
“I won’t forgive you. I’ll make you regret it every day. I won’t
grant you a single thing you wish for. No matter what you
ask, I’ll ignore you and treat you horribly…”  
Elise continued pouring out her grievances, some of which
barely made sense—petty threats, unreasonable demands.  
She knew they were irrational, but she couldn’t stop.  
She was waiting. Waiting for the man in front of her to reach
his limit, to finally turn his back on her.  
To prove to herself that she should have never expected
anything at all.  
“I hate you. I hate you so much, and I resent you.”  
Yet, she couldn’t bring herself to look at his face, knowing
her words must have wounded him.  
Instead, she buried her face deeper into his chest.  
As if he understood her every unspoken thought, he gently
ran his hand down her back.  
“It’s alright, Elise. It’s alright.”  
“…Hic.”  
His strong arms tightened around her, as if to say he would
endure all her hatred and resentment, just so she could
finally let it all out.  
And so, the tears she had kept locked away for so long
finally began to subside.  
She hiccupped and wiped at her eyes with the back of her
hand.  
“I-I’m serious… I wasn’t just saying things.”  
At that, a warm, large hand covered hers and gently
lowered it.  
‘Oh… My hands must be wet. I’ll get his hand dirty…’  
That thought barely had time to form before she felt it.  
A soft, warm palm cupping her cheek.  
Fingers brushing over her tear-streaked face, wiping away
the dampness from her eyes, her cheeks, her jaw.  
Everywhere his hand touched, her cold skin grew warmer.
And with it something inside her ached, but it was a
comforting ache. A warmth that wrapped around her heart.  
The very warmth she had yearned for, one so tender and
sweet it left her breathless.  
“Any punishment is fine.”  
She looked into his deep, red eyes, darker than usual.  
The way he gazed at her made it feel like she was the only
thing in the world.  
“Yell at me, cry, hit me. You can make me suffer a
thousandfold for what I’ve done to you. Whatever you want,
I’ll do it.”  
His voice held nothing but sincerity. Elise clenched her
trembling hands together.  
“But what if… what if I can’t forget what happened? What if
I still resent you? Even after all this time?”  
“Then don’t forgive me.”  
He answered softly as he tucked a stray strand of her hair
behind her ear.  
“I’ll keep trying, until you can.”  
“But… what if I never do?”  
“Then it will be my fault for failing to earn your heart.”  
Could she believe him? Could she trust this promise?  
Elise studied the man who had accepted all of her
resentment without hesitation.  
Had he truly changed?  
Would he stay by her side, no matter what happened?  
Would she always have this warmth?  
Her eyes wavered, uncertain, still trapped by fear.  
And then…  
“I swear it.”  
He looked into her eyes, solemn and unwavering.  
“By my name, my house, my body, and soul, everything I
am.”  
“Duke…”  
“Until my very last breath, I will seek your forgiveness.”  
Her throat tightened.  
Her chest felt heavy, and tears welled in her eyes again.  
‘I never truly meant it.’
Saying she would make him suffer, that she would never
forgive him, that she would hurt him in return…  
‘I was just throwing a tantrum.’
“I’m sorry, Elise.”  
He rested his forehead against hers, their breaths
mingling.  
His voice was a hushed whisper between them.  
“I’m sorry.”  
Elise closed her eyes.  
Her heart pounded as if it already knew what was coming.  
And then, their lips met in a quiet, tender kiss.  

In the Count of Schwann’s estate, inside the office.
A strange tension filled the air between two men.  
“I will speak with Elise myself. I believe it would be better
that way.”  
“Thank you.”  
Cardale’s calm response made Damien frown slightly.  
This was, undoubtedly, the best course of action.  
Respecting Elise’s choice was the right thing to do.  
But still… it didn’t sit well with him.  
Cardale should have suffered more.  
He should have begged until his voice gave out, groveled in
the dirt until the rain washed away all his pride.  
At least, that’s what Damien believed.  
“To be frank, I’m not doing this for your sake, Duke. I’m
doing it for Elise. You have a habit of being easily
misunderstood, after all.”  
“I know.”  
Cardale’s response was short, as if Damien’s clear
displeasure didn’t faze him at all.  
“She’ll find it easier to accept if she hears it from you.”  
“I never said I’d persuade her. I only agreed to explain the
benefits of the contract.”  
“Is that not the same thing?”  
Damien let out a dry chuckle.  
He wasn’t as furious as he once was, but he still wanted to
make Cardale suffer—just a little.  
“I plan to inform Elise, in detail, exactly how she can use
this contract to exploit you.”  
“That would be most welcome.”  
To Damien’s irritation, Cardale remained unfazed.  
In fact, he looked satisfied.  
“She’s too kind. Even if she knows how, she might hesitate
to act. So, I trust you’ll help her?”  
“…Are you serious?”  
“If I weren’t?”  
Damien was at a loss.  
“Do you not realize what I’m implying? That Elise could take
advantage of your power, your wealth, drain you for all
you’re worth?”  
“If that’s what she wants, then it doesn’t matter.”  
It was Damien who lost the battle of wills first.  
He exhaled sharply, shaking his head.  
“You should have done this from the start.”  
Unlike before, Cardale didn’t immediately respond.  
Not noticing, Damien continued.  
“She’s always been lonely. Even the smallest kindness
would have made her happy. She cherishes the child
growing inside her…”  
He trailed off.  
Because when he glanced at Cardale, he saw it.  
A tormented expression, as if the man before him had been
sentenced to hell.  
For once, Damien stopped himself.  
“…It doesn’t matter now. The past is the past.”  
Cardale’s voice was quiet when he finally spoke.  
“I am grateful.”  
“What?”  
“If not for you and your mother… Elise would still be trapped
in the nightmare that was me.”  
Damien sighed.  
“Don’t hurt her again.”  
His eyes, the same color as Elise’s, held unwavering
resolve.  
“If you ever make her cry again, Duke… I won’t stand for
it.”  
The two men locked eyes.  
“I hope you don’t.”  
Cardale’s voice was low.  
“If I ever make her cry again… may I be the one to drive a
blade through my own heart.”  
Damien’s eyes widened slightly.  
And as Cardale turned to leave, Damien called out.  
“Visit often.”  
Cardale halted.  
“Give her good memories. The more happiness she has, the
fainter the pain will become.”  
  
“Don’t leave her alone again.”  
For a moment, silence hung between them.  
Then, Cardale answered.  
“…Gladly.”

Cardale visited Count Schuvan’s residence the next day, the
day after that, and again the day after.
And he spent time with Elise.
They didn’t do anything particularly special. There was
hardly any conversation between them.
They simply sat across from each other, quietly drinking tea
or reading. Or he would watch her be absorbed in her
knitting.
Yet, in those passing moments, Cardale gradually learned
things about Elise that he hadn’t known before.
That she preferred floral tea over expensive imported black
tea.
That, though she often grew discouraged, claiming knitting
was difficult, she was actually remarkably skilled with her
hands.
That her lips would part slightly when she was focused or
deep in thought.
As Elise read in her rocking chair, the midday winter sunlight
streaming in, she slowly began to doze off. Her fingers
loosened around the book she was holding.
Thud.
Cardale caught the book just before it hit the floor.
The thick rug beneath would have softened the impact, but
Elise was the kind of person who woke easily at the slightest
sound or movement.
Her mother, Marisa, once guessed that it was a lingering
habit from her childhood. Always needing to hide or flee,
never able to rest at ease. But Cardale knew the truth.
It was all because of him.
Even after long, exhausting nights together that left her
utterly spent, she could never easily fall asleep without his
permission. Yet there had been a time when she had slept
soundly in his arms.
A time when she relied on him completely, trusting him.
When she had waited for him, firmly believing in his promise
to save her mother.
When she had been deeply grateful for even the smallest
gestures of kindness, preparing gifts in return.
So the fact that Elise still couldn’t sleep peacefully near him
now meant that, deep down, she was still unable to cast
aside her anxieties and fears.
That she still couldn’t trust him.

Cardale set the book on the nightstand and picked up a
thick woolen blanket. It was large and plush enough to cover
her small frame entirely.
“…Mmm.”
“It’s okay. You can sleep.”
He whispered softly when he saw her fluttering lashes. As if
his words were a signal, Elise drifted back into slumber.
With meticulous care, he wrapped the blanket snugly
around her shoulders and drew the curtains to dim the light.
Then he simply stood there, gazing at her sleeping face.
He would always arrive in the morning, spend the day with
her, and leave when she fell asleep or when the shadows
grew long on the floor.
It had never been explicitly agreed upon, but as the pattern
repeated, it became an unspoken rule.
Yet, just like yesterday, and the day before, Cardale found
himself unable to leave.
He knew he couldn’t stay forever. He knew Elise needed
time with her family.
But still, he lingered in the quiet room, listening to her slow,
even breaths. It wasn’t until he noticed his shadow cast over
her sleeping figure that he finally came back to his senses.
‘Sorry.’
‘I shouldn’t be disturbing your rest, but here I am, indulging
my own selfishness again.’
Cardale slowly lowered his lips to her forehead. It was the
lightest of touches, barely felt.
And in a near-inaudible whisper, he murmured,
“I’ll be back, Elise.”
A quiet promise for tomorrow.

The capital’s winter wasn’t always harsh.
Even if a blizzard raged under a gray sky one day, the next
could bring clear blue skies and surprisingly warm sunlight.
It was on such a day that Cardale gifted Elise a coat made
from silver fox fur.
When she opened the box, her round eyes widened in
surprise.
“Not long ago, it seems there was a fierce battle among the
beasts of the forest over territory.”
The man had already prepared the perfect excuse.
“The soldiers who were out scouting came across the
remains of the fallen animals and retrieved them.”
“Then this coat…”
“The area was originally a silver fox den. More than half of
the dead animals were foxes.”
Elise was someone who sympathized with even the smallest
creatures.
The truth—that he had deliberately culled the silver fox’s
natural predators in autumn to increase their numbers, only
to hunt them for their pelts—was a secret he would take to
his grave.
As expected, she wasn’t marveling at the expensive coat
but rather lamenting the fate of the poor foxes.
“To think they fought to the death…”
“Even animals aren’t so different from humans. When they
have something to protect, they become desperate. Enough
to stake their lives on it.”
But Cardale didn’t want her to dwell on sadness; he wanted
her to be happy with his gift. So, waiting for the right
moment, he added,
“But their sacrifice wasn’t in vain. We found a surviving
silver fox colony nearby.”
“…So they managed to protect their home.”
The man who had spun a seamless lie nodded in
agreement.
In a way, it wasn’t entirely false—the foxes he had hunted
had, in some sense, helped ensure the safety of the
remaining ones.
“Would you like to try it on?”
He had gone to great lengths to have it made. Since she
spent most of her time indoors, rarely venturing out even
within the estate, he had hoped that with this she might be
willing to step outside.
“It’s very warm.”
Yet, despite his efforts, Elise merely ran her fingers lightly
over the silvery fur before offering him a faint smile.
“It’s not that cold today… I’ll wear it another time.”
Then, she carefully closed the box again, tying the ribbon
back into its original neat shape with practiced hands.
“I appreciate the thoughtful gift, Your Grace.”
She even clasped her hands together politely and bowed. It
was a formal, reserved reaction—not at all like someone
receiving a gift from a lover.
“Um… Actually, there’s something I wanted to ask of you…”
Cardale, who had been inwardly disappointed that his
carefully prepared gift remained untouched, perked up at
her hesitant words.
“Go ahead. Tell me anything.”
Elise looked unsure, hesitating before speaking in a slightly
troubled voice.
“I feel bad always receiving gifts from you… You don’t have
to give me anything anymore.”
The soft smile that had been on Cardale’s lips subtly
stiffened.

It wasn’t that he wanted to reproach her. Nor was he upset
or resentful.
But whenever Elise said things like this, it felt as though she
saw luxurious, expensive things as something that didn’t
belong to her. And that troubled him.
A heavy sense of guilt settled over him. A remnant of the
past—when he had shattered her self-worth, treating her as
nothing more than a mere handmaiden.
Now, the fact that she hesitated to accept even what was
rightfully hers, only made her seem all the more pitiful to
him.
Yet, he carefully concealed his emotions.
If she realized how he felt, it might only hurt her more.
So, softening his expression, Cardale spoke gently.
“I was thoughtless. If I made you feel burdened, I apologize.
I’m sorry.”
“I-I wasn’t asking for an apology.”
Elise quickly shook her head.
“I just… I don’t have anything to give you in return. And
you’ve already given me so much…”
Cardale watched as she dropped her gaze, fidgeting with
her fingers, a habit that showed when she was nervous.
“That’s not true.”
He covered her small hands with his own, enveloping them
in warmth.
“Just letting me stay by your side… That alone is more than
any gift I could ever give.”
“Your Grace…”
“I told you, didn’t I? That I’d spend my life atoning. I give
you things only because I want to, out of my own
selfishness. So don’t feel that way.”
Because, with these hollow offerings, I’m desperately trying
to win even a piece of your heart.
“You don’t have to use it. You can leave it untouched, give it
away, or even throw it out. It doesn’t matter. Just let me do
this for you.”
“How… how could you say that…?”  
“You don’t need to feel sorry. That’s my role to play.”  
Elise’s eyelashes trembled before fluttering up and down.  
Watching the delicate movement, like the soft beat of a
butterfly’s wings, Cardale thought to himself.  
No matter how beautiful silver fox fur was, it could never
compare to the fine lashes that adorned her eyes, the neat
arch of her brows, or the long strands of hair cascading over
her shoulders.  
“I’ll wait for the day you wear the coat.”  
With a gentle smile, he lifted a few strands of her silvery
hair, pressing a kiss against them.  
“The wait alone is enough for me.”  

“The Duke of Vasenberg gifted you this coat?”  
“It… it really is too much, isn’t it…?”  
Damien glanced at his restless younger sister before shifting
his gaze to the coat.  
Silver fox fur, with its shimmering sheen and unparalleled
softness, was highly sought after, not just for its beauty but
for its warmth.  
However, since silver foxes were wild predators that moved
in dangerous packs, hunting them was no easy feat.
Moreover, they were difficult to trade.  
This made their pelts extremely expensive and nearly
impossible to obtain. Even securing a single scarf was like
reaching for the stars.  
“…Did he hunt them himself?”  
At Damien’s absentminded remark, Elise shook her head
fiercely.  
“N-no! He told me that wasn’t the case!”  
Damien listened as Elise hurriedly recounted Cardale’s
explanation.  
But something about her story felt… off. The details didn’t
quite align.  
Frowning slightly, he pieced it together, then let out a short,
knowing sigh.  
‘Ah… He’s really going all in, isn’t he?’

It didn’t take much thought to see through the ploy.  
If wild beasts had truly torn each other apart in a savage
fight to the death, how could the fur remain so pristine,
unscathed, and perfectly selected?  
A skilled hunter must have taken them down cleanly, aiming
straight for their vital spots.  
The Duke’s machinations were plain as day.  
Should he just expose everything?  
But Damien was a rational, pragmatic man. If Elise learned
the truth, he could already foresee the outcome, she would
never wear that coat.  
And truthfully, there was nothing quite as warm and
lightweight as silver fox fur.  
Letting a perfectly good gift go to waste would be a shame.
So, for the sake of his sister, Damien decided to feign
ignorance.  
“I was actually thinking that you needed a winter coat. So
this works out well.”  
“…Brother?”  
Yes, this was purely for the sake of his sister and his unborn
niece or nephew’s well-being and comfort. It had nothing to
do with aiding the Duke in his cause.  
“The physician said just the other day that staying indoors
all the time isn’t good for the baby. Your morning sickness
has subsided, and you’re in a stable phase now. A little fresh
air and some short walks would be good for you.”  
“But…”  
“In truth, I feel guilty for not having a winter coat tailored for
you in advance. I should have been more prepared as your
brother.”  
“No! It’s not like that at all!”  
Elise immediately took the bait, panicked at his selfreproach.  
“You’ve been busy, I know that. And even so, you’ve always
looked after me. Please don’t blame yourself, Brother.”  
“I appreciate you thinking that way.”  
Damien gave a soft smile.  
“Well then, why don’t you try it on? We should check the fit
in case it needs to be adjusted.”  
“…Huh?”  
“Oh, and I should show it to Mother too. Wait here a
moment, I’ll go fetch her.”  
Before Elise could even process what was happening,
Damien had already returned with Marissa.  
Her mother’s opinion wasn’t much different from her
brother’s.  
“The Duke chose this gift thinking of you and the baby. If
you don’t wear it, he’d only be disappointed.”  
Hearing that it was also meant for the baby, Elise finally let
go of her hesitation.  
Once she fastened the coat’s buttons all the way up,
Marissa gasped in delight.  
“Oh my, it fits you perfectly!”  
“No need for alterations, you can wear it as is.”  
Damien nodded approvingly.  
And so, the next day, Cardale was met with the sight he had
longed for.  

His steps came to an abrupt halt.  
Under the glistening morning sunlight, Elise stood there.  
Her silvery hair was elegantly pinned up, her face lightly
adorned with makeup, and she shone with the radiance of a
goddess.  
Yet, despite knowing that he had just announced his
presence and been granted entry, she had turned her head
slightly to the side, avoiding his gaze.  
Cardale approached carefully, ensuring his movements
wouldn’t startle her.  
“Elise.”  
At the sound of his voice, she hesitantly turned toward him,
only to immediately lower her head again.  
Her ears had turned noticeably red.  
“…What’s wrong? Did something happen?”  
“N-no… nothing happened.”  
“Then?”  
“…It just feels a little awkward…”  
Cardale let his gaze fall to the coat that now wrapped snugly
around her small frame.  
The lower half flared slightly like a skirt, giving enough room
to accommodate her growing belly in the coming months.  
It suited her. Even more than he had imagined. No, far more
than he had imagined.  
“…You look beautiful.”  
Elise’s eyes widened in surprise.  
She blinked rapidly, as if processing something, then
responded as if having just realized something.  
“My brother and mother said the same. They told me it was
a truly precious gift. Thank you. I’ll wear it well.”  
…Oh.  
Cardale barely held back a sigh, feeling as if he’d been
struck in the back of the head.  
Judging by her reaction, she had completely misunderstood
the subject of his compliment.  
Granted, the coat was a carefully chosen, top-quality piece.
But even so, it was nothing compared to the person wearing
it.  
No gemstone, no priceless heirloom could ever match her.  
‘Elise, in my world, only you are truly precious and
beautiful.’
With that thought, Cardale gently wrapped a scarf around
her slender, pale neck and murmured,  
“I meant you are beautiful.”  
At once, Elise’s face flushed crimson.  
“I, um…”  
She fumbled for words, clearly flustered beyond belief. As if
she had never expected to hear something like that in her
wildest dreams.  
He had thought he’d been expressive enough, but perhaps
he had still been lacking.  
Cardale made a note to reflect on that. If Elise hadn’t
realized how he felt, then the fault lay entirely with him.  
Still, the way she turned red, from her cheeks to her ears
and even down to her neck, was utterly endearing.  
“…You are truly beautiful, Elise.”  
He sealed the moment with one more heartfelt declaration.  
And so, when Damien arrived moments later and found Elise
red as a ripe tomato, he panicked and rushed to call for the
physician.  
It became a story that would be brought up often in the
years to come.  

“Take care and enjoy your outing, Elise.”  
“Yes, Mother.”  
Marissa gently rubbed Elise’s gloved hands as she smiled
warmly.  
But while the mother and daughter shared a lighthearted
moment, an entirely different tension lingered between
Damien and Cardale in the background.  
A tension only the two of them seemed aware of.  
“Duke Vassenberg,” Damien spoke smoothly, his tone polite
yet edged with unmistakable weight. “I trust you will
exercise the utmost caution this time.” 
“For example?”  
“You know exactly what I mean, Your Grace.”  
“If I did, I wouldn’t be asking. Why don’t you enlighten me,
dear Count?”  
Frustrated, Damien thumped his fist lightly against his
chest.  
“I’m saying—stop forcing your feelings onto Elise.”  
“Forcing?” Cardale tilted his head slightly. “Are you sure
that’s not just your own misconception?”  
“Are you denying it?”  
Damien nearly raised his voice, but he quickly glanced at his
mother and sister before continuing.  
“I’ve seen it many times. You constantly whisper sweet
words to Elise, telling her she’s beautiful, praising her every
day to win her favor. And then there are the endless gifts.
Aren’t you essentially pressuring a gentle, naive girl into
accepting your feelings?”  
Cardale simply shrugged, unimpressed.  
“I fail to see the problem.”  
“You’re deliberately pushing your emotions onto her!”  
Cardale remained unruffled.  
“Her embroidery and etiquette are flawless. She’s steadily
improving at knitting and piano, and she never puts down a
book, which makes her a fast learner. She’s more than
capable of managing a household. I simply praised her for
her merits. Is that so wrong?”  
“That’s not—!”  
“Even her handwriting is better than yours. Am I wrong?”  
Damien fell silent, his lips pressed tightly together.  
Cardale smirked at the lack of response.  
“And as for the gifts, what do you expect me to do? Lie?
Pretend I don’t find her beautiful? Should I hold back my
affection and act as if I feel nothing?”  
“That’s not what I meant!” Damien clenched his fists.  
“I understand that you’re doing everything you can to win
Elise over. But even a small lie, a seemingly harmless
deception, can make sincerity meaningless. A white lie may
seem insignificant, but it can still lead to betrayal.”  
As he spoke, he flicked his gaze toward the coat Elise was
wearing.  
Cardale’s expression turned cold in an instant.  
“Did you tell her?”  
Damien stiffened.  
The air between them shifted sharply, growing heavy with
an unspoken threat.  
A chill ran down Damien’s spine, a primal instinct warning
him that he was facing something overwhelming, something
dangerous.  
All traces of amusement had vanished from Cardale’s face,
leaving behind only an eerily blank expression.  
“Damien Schuvan,” Cardale’s voice was low and measured.
“I asked you a question. Did you tell her?”  
Cardale may have changed because of Elise. He may have
discovered emotions he hadn’t understood before. He may
have come to treasure her above all else.  
But that mercy extended only to her.  
To anyone else, including her family, he remained as
ruthless and unforgiving as ever.  
If something or someone threatened Elise’s well-being, or
his place beside her, he would show no hesitation.  
“Elise… doesn’t know.”  
As soon as Damien uttered the words, the suffocating
tension around him eased, allowing him to take in a shaky
breath.  
“Make sure it stays that way, Count Schuvan,” Cardale
warned, his tone eerily smooth.  
Just as the weight of the warning settled between them, a
voice called out from the distance.  
“Are you two talking about something serious?”  
Elise stood a short distance away, her hands cupped around
her mouth to project her voice. She smiled, tilting her head
in curiosity.  
“It’s nothing,” Cardale responded immediately.  
His demeanor shifted in an instant, his expression softening,
his posture relaxing as he turned away from Damien and
made his way toward Elise with effortless ease.  
“If we linger too long, we’ll be late,” she said as he
approached.  
“Sorry. We got caught up in conversation.” Cardale reached
out, resting a hand lightly on her shoulder as he guided her
toward the carriage.  
Watching them, Damien let out a slow, frustrated breath.  
He could only hope that his sweet, kindhearted sister would
never come to realize just how dangerous the man beside
her truly was. 

Elise’s heart pounded with excitement as she gazed at the
opera house.  
Warm yellow lights brighten the winter night, the faint
sound of elegant string instruments play from inside, and
the joyful faces of people dressed to the nines. All of it
seemed simply wonderful to her.  
She had no idea she was drawing the admiration, surprise,
and curious gazes of everyone around her.  
Cardale tilted his head slightly and whispered in her ear.  
“If you feel unwell or if anything is bothering you, don’t
hesitate to tell me.”  
“I will.”  
Elise nodded immediately. It was something he had
emphasized multiple times since he first suggested going to
the opera together.  
Just as they were about to ascend the stairs, Elise felt
something soft weave through her fingers. Startled, she
looked up.  
Cardale had naturally intertwined his fingers with hers,
clasping their hands together as he gazed at her.  
“There are many steps. I thought it might be difficult for you
to walk.”  
Was it just her imagination, or did that sound like an
excuse? Elise blinked slowly.  
“…Would you prefer to link arms instead?”  
It wasn’t as if he wished for that, but his tone suggested he
was willing if she desired it.  
“I…”  
Elise hesitated, then awkwardly pressed his hand with her
fingers and said softly,  
“It’s fine.”  
Cardale’s sharp eyes softened. His normally cold and
impassive face melted into a warm smile for a brief
moment.  
His crimson eyes, often likened to thick blood and feared by
many, now flickered like a fire in the heart of winter. Warm
and inviting.  
They were the very eyes Elise once thought were as
breathtaking as a blazing sunset.  
“Then let’s take our time going up.”  
“Yes.”  
Hand in hand, they ascended the stairs together.  
As a result, the nobles who had been stealing glances since
their arrival were now openly gawking in disbelief. Some
were so shocked they had to cover their mouths to stifle
their gasps.  
To be precise, Elise was entirely oblivious, while Cardale
noticed but didn’t care.  
Rather, he took the opportunity to display even more
tenderness toward his woman.  
After tonight, the baseless rumors surrounding Elise would
vanish completely.  
And in a few days, a new story would spread,   
That Duke Vassenberg had submitted a marriage proposal
to the Count of Schuvan, and that Damien Schuvan, recently
granted the title of Count by the Emperor himself, had given
his blessing for his sister’s courtship.  
That was why Cardale had gifted Elise a silver fox fur coat,
something even royalty rarely wore, before their outing
together.  
He wanted to subtly yet undeniably inform high society that
she was no mere mistress. That his future duchess would
bear no stain of disgrace, no humiliation, no pain.  
When winter passed and late spring arrived, the child she
carried would be publicly recognized as his heir.  
But Elise knew nothing of Cardale’s plan.  
For now, she simply cherished what was given to her,
content with the moment. Perhaps she had drawn a line for
herself, believing that wanting anything more would be
greedy.  
After all, she had always lived within the boundaries set by
others.  
“The interior has been remodeled.”  
“…Pardon?”  
“I just wanted to let you know so you wouldn’t be
surprised.”  
Just then, an usher opened the door to their private box and
bowed.  
Despite his warning, Elise’s eyes widened in astonishment.  
The inside had been transformed into a warm and elegant
space, thick beige curtains, ivory wallpaper with vine
patterns, delicately embroidered sofas…  
But it wasn’t just the changes to the space that shocked
her.  
‘It looks exactly like my bedroom.’  
It was as if the area around her fireplace had been lifted and
placed here.  
The plush cushions, the small side table with a lamp, the rug
on the floor, even the basket of knitting yarn, everything
was similar.  
“…Your Grace.”  
“I thought you’d be more comfortable watching in a familiar
setting.”  
Cardale responded as if it were nothing, gently tugging her
hand. Without realizing it, she was already seated on the
sofa. The surface was particularly soft, she glanced down
and saw silver fox fur draped over it.  
This is too much.
The extravagant gifts, the private space, this overwhelming
hospitality…  
It felt excessive, beyond her means.  
Suddenly, Elise felt uneasy.  
She recalled a day at the auction house when she had been
showered with lavish presents, only to feel an overwhelming
fear afterward.  
She had cried in silence, terrified that Cardale’s affections
would change, that he would turn cold and abandon her one
day.  
And in the end, that fear had become reality.  
“…Thank you.”  
Elise pressed her trembling fingers together to conceal her
anxiety.  
“But… you don’t have to go this far.”  
You’ll change again, won’t you?  
One day, you’ll act like a completely different person,
pushing me away as if I were nothing.  
So please… stop making me hope. Stop making me want
more.  
Just as Cardale had things he had yet to confess, Elise also
had things she couldn’t say to him.  
She no longer resented him. She didn’t harbor hatred
anymore. Those emotions had long since washed away with
her tears.  
She had forgiven him. And deep down, she still carried
feelings she couldn’t express.  
Even though they saw each other every day, there were
moments when she missed him.  
She enjoyed their time together. She was happy just being
near him. She was grateful. She was content.  
But…
Elise was always anticipating the end.  
She constantly reminded herself of the cold reality, that this
sweet dream would eventually fade.  
She disciplined herself, ensuring she never became blinded
by happiness or made foolish decisions.  
She couldn’t cling to him when the time came. She couldn’t
become pathetic. She couldn’t let her mistakes hinder her
child’s future.  
And so, just like yesterday and the day before, Elise steeled
herself again today.  
“Just watching the opera with you is more than enough….”  
Her voice trailed off, a sign of the lingering attachment she
herself wasn’t aware of.  
As she unconsciously tightened her grip, a warm hand
covered hers.  
“I’m doing this because I want to.”  
His touch was as warm as always. When she looked up, she
saw his gentle smile.  
“You already agreed to let me do things my way,
remember?”  
“…But, ”  
Even as she weakly protested, Elise knew she wouldn’t be
able to refuse him this time either.  
“I changed it because I wanted to watch the opera with you.
So don’t feel burdened. Not even a little.”  
Instead of saying that wasn’t the reason for her unease,
Elise simply smiled faintly and nodded.  
Because the moment she voiced her fear, she felt it would
become real and consume her.  
Because a small, desperate part of her wanted to hold onto
this fragile happiness for just a little longer.  

The curtains on either side of the stage parted, marking the
start of the opera.  
It was the first act.  
Elise watched the blissful lovers on stage, trying to suppress
the unease rising in her chest.  
‘Something’s wrong.’  
From the moment he suggested rewatching this
performance until the moment she entered the theater, she
had felt excitement.  
But now, all she felt was an inexplicable anxiety.  
‘Why…?’  
She soon found out.  
A happy couple.  
A misunderstanding.  
A man consumed by fury.  
A cruel and one-sided punishment.  
Elise’s heart dropped.  
‘No…’  
Fragments of the opera’s plot, long buried in her
subconscious, resurfaced with vivid clarity.  
The man, believing he had been betrayed, turned
merciless.  
He shattered the woman’s heart with words so cruel they
were unthinkable for someone who once loved her.  
Tears welled in Elise’s eyes.  
‘Don’t do it. Please, don’t…’  
She clutched her chest, struggling to breathe.  
“Elise?”  
Noticing her distress immediately, Cardale urgently turned
to her.  
“What’s wrong? What, ”  
“I… I can’t… I can’t watch… Please, I, hic….”  
Cardale snapped his head toward the stage.  
The heroine was climbing onto the bridge, sobbing. Below
her, the river.  
Damn it!  
Without hesitation, Cardale swept Elise into his arms and
stormed out of the private box.

Just then, as he was about to leave after inspecting the
seating area, the theater manager happened to run into
them.
“Your Grace, the Duke?”
“Is there a place where she can rest?”
The manager quickly focused his eyes, assessing the
situation in an instant, and swiftly responded.
“There is a private room reserved for esteemed guests.
Please allow me to guide you.”
As they reached the door in the hallway upstairs, the
manager suddenly hesitated and asked, as if realizing
something belatedly.
“Your Grace, shall I summon a physician as well?”
Cardale glanced down at his woman, just in case. Her pale
face tensed for a brief moment before she gave a small
shake of her head, just as he expected.
“There’s no need.”
He firmly refused.
He couldn’t allow just any doctor to examine Elise. If they
weren’t careful, her pregnancy could be revealed.
It was something he intended to announce eventually, but
the timing of such news had to be handled with utmost
caution.
Cardale laid Elise down on the long, spacious sofa. While he
tossed some dry logs into the fireplace, the manager and
another staff member entered, pushing a tray inside.
The tray contained refreshments, hot water, a basin, and
clean clothes neatly arranged.
“Please rest as long as you need. If you require anything, do
not hesitate to call for us.”
After bowing discreetly, they quickly exited, closing the door
behind them.
Cardale meticulously checked to ensure that no cold drafts
were seeping through the cracks of the windows before
drawing the curtains tightly shut.
As he poured tea from the pot, a gentle floral fragrance
filled the air.
“A warm cup of tea should help you feel better. Once you’ve
rested, we’ll head back to the count’s estate–”
“Ugh…”

A soft but pained groan suddenly escaped from beside him,
making his hand slip from the teapot’s handle in shock.
The ceramic clattered against the tray with a sharp sound,
but he didn’t notice it.
All of his senses were focused on Elise, who was curling into
herself, her hands clutching her stomach as cold sweat
beaded on her forehead.
“Elise!”
Cardale lunged toward her as if he had been spring-loaded.
“Are you in pain? Are you unwell?”
His fingertips turned cold at the sight of her, he had never
seen her like this before.
He had brought her to the opera house on purpose.
The venue was relatively warm, and he had wanted to show
her the performance she had missed last spring.
But the play had only served to reopen her wounds. Instead
of a pleasant evening, it had cruelly scraped at her barely
healed scars.
And yet, he had watched the very same performance with
her before.
Back then, he had scoffed at the foolishness of the man
who, having fallen into a trap, lost his lover and regretted it
too late.
He had been so complacent, so ignorant, he had only
confirmed that the opera had a happy ending and thought
that would be enough.
“Haa, I… I’m fine.”
As he stood there, overwhelmed by a storm of shock, fear,
and helplessness, Elise gasped out a response.
“My stomach just… tightened a little.”
Cardale’s expression turned grim in an instant.
“That sounds serious.”
“The physician told me that stress can cause this
sometimes. He also said it would pass if I just rest.”
Elise, who was now breathing much more evenly, gave him
a reassuring smile and gently grasped his wrist.
“…Are you really all right?”
“Of course.”
Cardale stared at her intently as she smiled. Then, he
carefully placed his hand over her stomach that barely
showed any signs of a bump, and used a handkerchief to
gently wipe the cold sweat from her forehead.
“Can you sit up?”
He helped her into a sitting position before handing her the
cup of tea he had poured earlier.
The steaming liquid had now cooled to a comfortably
drinkable temperature.
“It’s warm.”
Elise cupped the teacup in both hands.
“You should drink some too, Duke.”
“I already did.”
“Huh?”
But I didn’t see you… she mumbled under her breath.
Despite being so innocent, she had a sharp eye for details
when it came to unnecessary matters.
Cardale casually poured another cup of tea and downed it in
one gulp.
“I drank it. Just now.”
Clink.
He set the empty cup back on the tray before shrugging off
his coat. Then, he unfastened the cufflinks of his shirt and
rolled up his sleeves to his elbows, revealing his toned
forearms.
After draping two dry towels over his arm, he poured warm
water into the basin and turned to look at Elise.
She blinked in confusion at his unusual behavior, her eyes
widening.
Cardale gave a small, knowing smirk as he placed the basin
before her.
“Duke…?”
“I noticed earlier that your feet were swollen.”
And without giving her a chance to react, he removed her
shoes.
“Ah…!”
“As I thought.”
Cardale clicked his tongue. Her feet and calves were
noticeably swollen.
Though she had worn soft leather shoes, they were
insufficient to support her body, which had weakened due to
pregnancy. Poor circulation made even short walks difficult.
“It’s… it’s dirty. Please don’t…!”
As he gently massaged her tense, swollen feet, Elise let out
a horrified protest. But Cardale remained utterly unfazed.
“Not at all.”
Her small feet weren’t dirty in the slightest. They were
nothing but delicate and beautiful.
The only thing keeping him from immediately removing her
stockings as well was the fear that she might panic and flee
like a startled deer.
“If you collapse from exhaustion, what will you do? You need
to be more careful.”
He intentionally glanced toward her stomach as he spoke,
using the baby as an excuse to ensure she accepted his
care.
His tactic worked perfectly.
Blushing to the tips of her ears, Elise sat quietly, allowing
him to do as he pleased.
Seizing the moment, he slipped off her stockings.
“W-Wait… Your Grace!”
“The temperature is just right now.”
Without giving her a chance to resist, he gently placed both
of her feet into the warm water.
She had no time to escape, not that she would have
succeeded even if she tried.
His hands pressed lightly on the tops of her feet, firm and
unyielding, as if he had no intention of letting go.
“How does the water feel? Not too hot?”
“The temperature is fine, but…”
Elise fidgeted anxiously, clearly flustered.
“You shouldn’t be doing this.”
“What shouldn’t I be doing?”
“It’s… It’s not right for someone of your status to serve
others… This is the work of servants…”
Realizing too late that she had essentially compared him to
a servant, Elise squeezed her eyes shut in horror.
“I-I’m sorry. I did it again…”
“No.”
Cardale immediately reassured her.
She was gradually regaining her self-esteem, but she was
still far too insecure and unstable.
“I didn’t explain properly, Elise.”
Her silver lashes fluttered as she cautiously opened her
eyes. Her blue irises wavered with uncertainty.
Cardale carefully constructed his expression in his mind.
The warmest gaze he could muster, the softest smile, the
most tender voice.
Then, he brought it all to life, offering it to the only woman
he cherished in this world.
“Right now, I am not here as a duke.”
A natural curve formed on his lips.
“I am here as your lover.”
He hadn’t even needed to rehearse the phrase.
Just as if he had been waiting for the perfect moment to say
it, his sincerity poured out effortlessly as a smile spread
across his face.
“That’s why I can do these things. But only for you.”
Elise’s eyes grew wide, as if she couldn’t believe what she
was hearing.
Cardale lowered his head.
He gently massaged her feet, easing the tension from her
muscles before carefully drying them with a towel.
After slipping her stockings and shoes back on, he adjusted
the hem of her dress and finally looked up.
Her cheeks were now tinged with a lovely blush.
“I served you without permission, so I have been most
insolent.”
“T-That’s not true.”
“Then you may punish me.”
She shook her head again in flustered embarrassment.
“In that case, we’ll forget both my rudeness and your slip of
the tongue. Fairly.”
After hesitating briefly, she finally nodded.
Cardale watched her quietly for a moment before shifting to
one knee.
“I had planned to formally ask after the opera ended.”
But timing never seemed to work in my favor when it came
to you.
From his pocket, he retrieved a small box.
Inside was a ring, its gemstone glimmering in the same
deep blue as her eyes.
“Elise.”
As he slipped the ring onto her finger, he asked, his
expression solemn and filled with longing, 
“Will you be my lover?”

The summer lake-like eyes trembled violently.  
They seemed to plead, Please don’t do this to me, but
Cardale did not waver. He couldn’t back down. Above all, he
needed to be careful, but he couldn’t afford to miss the
timing.  
Even now, the child inside Elise’s womb was growing little
by little.  
“Give me the chance to be your fiancé.”  
Let’s start over from the beginning. I’ll do better this time.
I’ll make you happy. There will be no more nights spent
crying alone, no more sorrow so deep you clutch your chest
in agony. I promise.  
A relationship that had started with the wrong first step.  
After losing Elise, he had revisited the past countless times,
tracing back every misstep. He had imagined over and over
again, through relentless regret…  
If only I could go back.  
He remembered their first meeting vividly.  
She had been dressed in rags, disheveled, yet she had
drawn his gaze. The same deer-like, innocent eyes and
gentle voice as now.  
He should never have used her. He should never have
tossed her a pouch of money and abandoned her. He should
never have sent her back to that hell.  
If only he could turn back time.  
He would have sent a marriage proposal to the Count
Schuvan’s household. He would have prevented the abuse
she suffered. He would have kept Gerhard Schuvan blind to
her whereabouts and allowed her to meet with her mother
freely. He would have helped her brother, Damien Schuvan,
inherit the title.  
Then by now, Elise would have been the happiest bride in
the world…  
“Duke.”  
A small voice called him back from his thoughts.  
Elise’s eyes curved downward, forming a sorrowful smile.  
“You’re doing this… because of the baby, aren’t you…?”  
At that moment, Cardale’s heart plummeted to the ground
with a deafening crash.  
The worst-case scenario he had desperately tried to avoid
had finally spilled from Elise’s lips.  
In truth, he had already sent a marriage proposal and
contract to Damien Schuvan some time ago, and he had
been working behind the scenes to make the wedding
happen.  
Yet he hadn’t told Elise until today. He had even asked her
to be his lover first, rather than his wife, for one reason.  
Because he didn’t want her to believe that their marriage
was solely for the sake of the child.  
For the woman who still couldn’t trust him, he had
structured it like a contract to reassure her. But even then,
he wanted her to understand that, underneath it all, his
feelings were real.  
He had wanted to share all the simple joys that lovers do
before he proposed to her with his whole heart– 
To ask her, Please be my wife.  
To vow, I swear I will be a good husband.  
To promise, I will be a father our child can be proud of.  
He had planned to propose in the grandest, most romantic
way possible, the kind of proposal every woman dreams of.  
But perhaps, even that had been nothing more than selfish
desire.  
“I… read about it in a book recently.”  
Elise looked down at the ring on her finger with a
bittersweet expression.  
“It said that a child born before marriage is considered
illegitimate by principle… And even if they are officially
recognized, they may still be disqualified from inheriting a
title in the future.”  
“Elise.”  
“Thank you.”  
She lifted her gaze and smiled at him.  
“I’m truly happy that you are thinking about our baby’s wellbeing.”  
Cardale was momentarily speechless.  
It pained him, as if a dagger had been thrust into his chest,
to realize once again that Elise had never expected anything
from him.  
And yet, at last, he accepted it.  
There was no other way. He had to let go of the selfish greed
he had clung to so desperately.  
The past could never be reversed. A shattered vase could be
pieced back together, but it would never be as it was
before. Their relationship was the same.  
Releasing even the remnants of his arrogance, Cardale
smiled wistfully and took Elise’s hand in his.  
“Of course. The baby is ours.”  
At the word ours, her eyes widened, and joy slowly spread
across her face.  
It was something he had told her several times during their
time together, yet she still rejoiced every time she heard it.  
“I’ve sent a marriage proposal to the Count Schuvan’s
estate.”  
“A marriage proposal…?”  
Her round eyes grew even larger.  
“W-When?”  
“A few days ago.”  
It had been far more than a few days, but Cardale tactfully
omitted the truth, for both his own and Damien’s sake.  
“But my brother never mentioned anything to me…”  
“The Count must have thought you needed time.”  
Damien Schuvan would explain the details. It had already
been arranged beforehand.  
“It’s a good thing I carried this with me.”  
“Huh?”  
Instead of answering, he retrieved a neatly folded
handkerchief from his coat. It was the one Elise had gifted
him, embroidered with the emblem of Vassenberg on all four
corners.  
As he unfolded it, a magnificent diamond ring was revealed.
The expertly cut gem gleamed with a pure, dazzling light.  
Cardale slipped the ring onto the ring finger of her left hand,
the corners of his lips curving ever so slightly.  
“It fits perfectly.”  
“Your Grace, this is…”  
Elise, taken aback by the ring’s undeniable grandeur, looked
up at him.  
“This is the ring passed down to the Duchesses of
Vassenberg.”  
  
“It is the symbol of the Duchess of Vassenberg.”  
Elise covered her mouth with both hands. Her fingertips
trembled, and then, as if she had suddenly come to her
senses, she tried to remove the ring.  
“Don’t.”  
Cardale quickly grasped her hands, stopping her.  
“I-I can’t accept this.”  
“Why not?”  
“It’s too much for me…”  
“It’s not too much. Have you forgotten that I proposed to
you?”  
“B-But that was because of the baby–”  
“It wasn’t because of the baby.”  
Cardale met her gaze. Her wide eyes, unable to look away,
trembled slightly.  
His voice carried a solemn weight, each word sinking deep
into her heart.  
“I want to be your husband.”  
Elise froze.  
“I want to stay by your side for the rest of my life. Until this
life ends, and even beyond it, I want to be with you. I
humbly ask you to grant me that eternal blessing.”  
A mere human pledging eternity before another human.  
Tears welled up in her blue eyes. Cardale whispered, almost
begging,  
“Please… choose me, Elise.”  
She nodded.  
Tears spilled down her cheeks as he captured her lips in a
desperate, longing kiss.  
It was a bittersweet, heart-wrenching kiss.  

As they stepped out of the room, Cardale asked,  
“Shall I carry you?”  
“N-No, I can walk.”  
Elise blushed, hastily waving her hands. Her lower lip was
slightly swollen.  
Seeing the soft sheen of moisture on her lips, Cardale
unconsciously licked his own. Elise flinched.  
Sensing her reaction, he smoothly changed the subject.  
“But if you feel tired on the way, just let me know. There’s
no one around to see–”  
Before he could finish, the doors connecting to the secondfloor balcony opened, and people began spilling out.  
“The first act must have ended.”  
Elise whispered into his ear before glancing down toward
the lobby.  
The audience members were buzzing with excitement, their
faces flushed with satisfaction from the performance and
anticipation for what was to come.  
Just then, she overheard a conversation.  
“But the young lady is still alive, right?”  
“Of course! I’ve seen this play more than ten times, and I
assure you, it ends with ‘And they lived happily ever
after.’”  
“Oh, thank goodness. I was so nervous the whole time.”  
Elise watched them quietly.  
She had seen up to the first act before, perhaps she could
stay and watch the second?  
“Duke…?”  
She gently tugged on Cardale’s sleeve.  
“Could we watch the rest of the opera?”  
“Are you sure?”  
“The second act is completely different in tone.”  
After confirming with a nearby staff member, Cardale turned
to her with a smile.  
“Let’s go back in.”  
“Yes.”  
Hand in hand, Elise and Cardale made their way to their
private box.  
Neither of them had heard the last part of the
conversation.  
“But did the young lady forgive the knight so easily? He
made her suffer so much she nearly drowned herself.”  
“Oh, of course not.”  
The woman who had seen the play before snapped her
fingers and grinned.  
“That man… grovels like a dog.”

Cardale had already ensured that there was nothing in the
second act that could hurt Elise. That was why he was at
ease.  
However, there was one crucial detail he had overlooked.  
The reason this opera was overwhelmingly popular among
noblewomen was because…  
Smack!  
…the retribution was very satisfying.  
The knight, who had only just found his lost love, had his
head snapped to the side by a fierce slap.  
The young lady, who had abandoned her past and was now
living alone in a countryside village, glared at him as she
sang in a sharp, rapid recitative.  
“Get out of my sight this instant, you wretched man. If you
have even a sliver of a conscience left, remove that
detestable face from my presence!”  
There was no tearful reunion.  
For the man who had heartlessly abandoned his lover after
falling for an obvious trap, there was only cold rejection and
merciless reproach.  
‘Oh my…’  
Elise nearly leaped from her seat in shock when the knight
was slapped.  
The kind, gentle young lady had changed. It seemed as
though she had completely erased all love and affection for
the knight from her heart.  
‘How deep must her wounds have been… Has she truly
stopped loving him?’  
But earlier, the noblewomen had spoken about how the two
would have a happy ending.  
‘That must mean that somewhere in her heart, she still
loves the knight.’  
Elise slowly became immersed in the performance.  
Onstage, the knight knelt down and sang his aria, pleading
desperately.  
“I was a fool. I have spent my days consumed by endless
agony and remorse. When the devil who cast me into
despair laughed at my misery, when the flames of hell
threatened to devour my soul, the only thing that kept me
alive was the hope of seeing you again. Please, grant me a
chance. I beg you, grant me a chance.”  
But the young lady turned away coldly, leaving the knight
kneeling before the tightly shut door.  
And yet, he did not give up.  
The next day, and the day after that, and the day after that,
every single day, he returned to see her.  
From early morning, he swept her yard clean, repaired the
broken fence and walls, and stacked enough firewood to last
an entire year.  
Every time, the young lady would chase him away, cursing
him as a shameless, selfish man.  
“Oh, how peculiar. A noble lord, lowering himself to do such
menial labor. A man whose only concern has ever been his
family’s honor and his own advancement. Surely, you
haven’t already forgotten, have you?”  
The very words he had once spoken to her were now thrown
back at him as he stood, drenched in the rain, swallowed by
regret.  
Yet still, he refused to give up.  
He built a flowerbed by the fence and planted blooms. He
fetched water from the well in her stead. He even bought
necessary goods from the market himself.  
The young lady was utterly exasperated.  
She threatened him, saying that if he came back even one
more time, she wouldn’t stand for it. She swung a long
wooden poker at him. Once, she even dumped a whole pile
of laundry over his head.  
But despite her cold treatment, she never actually reported
him to the guards.  
Watching this unfold, Elise thought to herself,  
‘She doesn’t actually hate him. She hasn’t truly failed to
forgive him. She’s just…’  
…afraid that if she accepts him again, he might change
once more in the future.  
But that wouldn’t happen.  
They were the protagonists of this tale. They were destined
for everlasting happiness.  
Perhaps because she already knew they would have a
happy ending, an odd feeling started to rise in Elise’s
heart.  
Each time the young lady lashed out at the knight with
sharp words, Elise felt strangely satisfied, as if an itch she
couldn’t quite reach was finally being scratched.  
It was the first time she had ever felt such vicarious
pleasure, and she was caught off guard by it.  
“You wretched man! I hope you trip and smash your nose
into the ground!”  
Giggles and chuckles spread through the audience as the
two bickered onstage.  
“Pfft…!”  
Elise let out a small laugh before hastily covering her
mouth.  
And then, a thought crossed her mind.  
‘Come to think of it, the knight and the Duke… are a little,
just a little bit similar…’  
Would Cardale find this opera offensive?  
Elise discreetly stole a glance at the man sitting beside
her.  
However, his handsome face remained as composed as
ever.  
Then, as if sensing her gaze, he turned to look at her.  
‘…!’  
She hurriedly averted her eyes, but he was quicker. His
once-indifferent expression softened instantly.  
He asked, “What is it?”  
“N-Nothing.”  
Elise quickly shook her head.  
Cardale chuckled and rose to his feet.  
“I’ll be right back.”  
“Where are you going?”  
“I won’t be long. Just a few minutes.”  
He pressed a kiss to her forehead before stepping out of
their private box.  
Elise blinked, confused, before turning her attention back to
the opera.  
Before she knew it, the corners of her lips had curved up
again.  
The young lady was exceptionally skilled at verbally
destroying people. The knight, who was supposed to be a
war hero, was no match for her.  
“Elise.”  
She flinched.  
Cardale had returned without her noticing.  
“Duke?”  
He placed something in her hands, an elegant lace-trimmed
fan.  
“I thought you weren’t able to laugh freely because of me.”  
Elise suddenly realized that her expressions had already
been completely exposed, and she blushed furiously.  
“It’s all right, Elise. In fact, I want you to express yourself as
much as you like.”  
Cardale sat beside her again, speaking to her gently.  
“But if it still feels unfamiliar or uncomfortable, I’d like to
help you find a way to express yourself more naturally.”  
His warm fingers brushed against her forehead, then her
ear, before resting on her cheek.  
Elise closed her eyes for a moment, savoring the
tenderness, before cautiously asking,  
“Duke… Are you all right?”  
Cardale cast a glance at the stage.  
The young lady was still mercilessly dismantling the knight
with her sharp words, while the knight hung his head in selfreproach.  
Their back-and-forth duet echoed through the opera house.  
“The girl who once loved you drowned in that freezing river.
I am someone else now. I do not love you.”  
“Then I will strive to make you love me again. I will start
over, just as we did when we first met. I will slowly win back
your heart and paint our future anew.”  
“You insufferable man!”  
Cardale turned back to Elise, meeting her gaze.  
“Of course, I’m fine.”  
“…Really?”  
She asked, a hint of disbelief in her tone.  
He nodded.  
“You see, I’m an atheist.”  
“…And?”  
That wasn’t surprising. If anything, it would have been more
shocking to hear that he did believe in a god.  
“But for the first time in my life, I offered a prayer of
gratitude.”  
“…What?”  
Did he just say…?  
Elise’s eyes widened in shock.  
“How could I not?”  
Cardale slowly rose from his seat, then lowered himself onto
one knee before her.  
His crimson eyes gleamed with warmth as they reflected the
woman he cherished.  
“I wasn’t buried under a pile of laundry, beaten with a
poker, thrown out, insulted, or slapped.”  
His gaze was filled with nothing but affection for her.  
Even without words, his emotions were clear.  
Gently holding Elise’s hands, both adorned with the rings he
had placed on them, he murmured,  
“My lady is incomparably merciful, for she granted a foolish
man like me forgiveness and a chance without demanding
any price.”  
My lady. My lady.  
Elise’s face flushed red.  
She felt as though, in his world, she had become the most
precious young lady in existence, and he, her devoted
knight.  
“Your Grace…”  
“But there’s just one thing.”  
Cardale briefly paused before pressing a hand to his chest.  
Elise looked at him in confusion.  
“You still haven’t granted me your name. That is my only
sorrow.”  
“…My name?”  
He called me Elise all the time, didn’t he?  
She tilted her head in bewilderment.  
Cardale clicked his tongue lightly and offered her a subtle
hint.  
“Not just calling your name, but a mutual exchange.”  
“…An exchange?”  
Elise blinked.  
She had no idea how desperately he was watching her,
waiting.  
Then, realization dawned upon her, and her eyes widened.  
Cardale seized the moment and confessed,  
“The only person who can call my name… is you, Elise.”

The Duke’s name…  
Only then did the reality sink in. The situation, which had
never truly felt like her own, the life she had unconsciously
observed from a step back, it all suddenly felt real.  
Her trembling gaze dropped to the ring on her finger.  
A ring passed down through generations of duchesses,
symbolizing the lady of Vassenberg.  
…Cardale.  
She didn’t even dare to say it out loud. She only whispered
it in her heart, and yet, even that was enough to make her
heart race wildly.  
At that moment, Elise knew.  
I can’t.  
The instant his name passed her lips, the last lock she had
desperately kept in place would shatter completely.  
On stage, the young lady was testing the knight who had
sworn his true love for her.  
“If you truly love me, shouldn’t you first bring me expensive
and rare gifts?”  
“It’s not just about material things. Your heart is important
too. Pick the flower blooming atop that cliff. Let me see your
courage and strength.”  
“Oh! It’s raining now. How about rolling around in the mud in
that splendid uniform of yours? I want to feel your
devotion.”  
The knight silently endured every trial, while the young
lady, despite her harshness, gradually lost the venom in her
words.  
I…  
Elise turned to look at Cardale again. The man who was
watching her with earnest, expectant eyes, waiting only for
her answer.  
She could never be like the young lady in the play.  
She was neither strong-willed nor resolute.  
The thought of wielding power over the Duke the way the
young lady did over her knight was unimaginable. It was
beyond her ability.  
She couldn’t play hard to get or feign indifference as
Damien had once suggested.  
Because she had already given him everything.  
Like water flowing naturally downhill, no matter how hard
she tried, she couldn’t stop her heart from moving toward
him. It had become inevitable, a force of nature.  
And yet, she had built a single, fragile wall.  
A thin, transparent glass wall–so weak that it felt like it could
shatter at any moment.  
Desperately, Elise clung to that wall. It was her last defense,
the only thing protecting her heart.  
So that, if one day he changed, she could wipe her tears
away and bid him a dignified farewell.  
I’m sorry.  
Some feelings could only be preserved if they were locked
away. Convincing herself of that, Elise carefully folded away
the words she truly wanted to say and buried them deep
inside her heart.  
“…Next time.”  
She whispered so softly that her own voice barely reached
her ears, keeping her head bowed so she wouldn’t have to
see the disappointment on his face.  
“Elise.”  
He would ask why. And then he would gently, tenderly
persuade her, telling her that it was all right. That as his
wife and his only lover, she had every right to.  
And if he did that, she would be unable to resist.  
Because she didn’t dislike it. Because, in truth, she longed
for it.  
Because he had spoken aloud the very thing she had
secretly wished for, and all it would take was a single nod
for it to come true, without guilt, without responsibility.  
But if she allowed it, then the fragile glass wall she had so
carefully maintained would crumble to nothing.  
His name was the last remaining barrier between them.  
“Master.”  
That was what she had called him in the past.  
When she had first been sold, when she had made mistakes,
when she had overstepped her place, when he had taken
her harshly in bed, when she had run away and been
captured again.  
That word, the one that had been seared into her soul and
body, had long since disappeared from her lips.  
Before she knew it, they had become a husband and wife
who called each other by name, as if they had been bound
by love from the very beginning.  
Don’t be mistaken. Never desire more than what has been
given to you.  
Her fingernails dug into her palm.  
“Call your lover’s name. Your husband’s name, Elise.”  
His voice was thick with longing, and she almost answered
without thinking.  
She barely managed to suppress the impulse, biting the
inside of her lip to contain the storm of emotions within
her.  
“My lady is incomparably merciful, for she granted a foolish
man like me forgiveness and a chance without demanding
any price.”  
A convenient excuse suddenly came to mind.  
Was it fortunate or unfortunate?  
“P-Punishment…”  
Her heart ached slightly, as if her own nails had pressed into
it.  
“The Duke said… you never received any punishment.”  
Elise stammered.  
She wasn’t as merciful as he thought. She still harbored
some resentment.  
So she wouldn’t grant his wish, not yet.  
Maybe one day, when her heart had completely healed…
but not now.  
The man who had been listening quietly nodded, then gave
a soft smile.  
“…I see.”  
He neither objected nor pleaded.  
His calm acceptance made her heart tighten painfully.  
“I’ll wait as long as it takes. Until you’re ready.”  
He lifted her hand gently and pressed a kiss to her
knuckles.  
How shameless.  
She was the one who had rejected him. She was the one
who had hurt him with her words.  
And yet, she was the one feeling heartache.  
…But still, still, I’m relieved.  
Elise consoled herself as she desperately clung to the fragile
wall in her heart.  
Because she had kept her resolve. Because she had
managed to protect herself for just a little longer.  

Punishment, huh…  
Cardale recalled the way her eyes had trembled when she
spoke those words.  
She had been worried.  
Worried that she might have hurt him.  
The idea that she could say something so absurd while
wearing such an expression, did she really think he would
believe her?  
And yet, he had accepted it without protest, because she
had looked so desperate.  
Like the time she had begged him to protect their child,
pleading with eyes full of fear.  
Like a hunted deer, just before the arrow struck.  
He didn’t want to see that expression again.  
She was far too transparent. It hadn’t been difficult to
understand why she had said those words, what emotions
had driven her.  
Of all things…  
Tsk. Cardale clicked his tongue softly.  
So the last thread of safety she clung to was a simple title.  
She was a creature born for fear, a timid little prey who
instinctively feared the predator.  
So he had shown her. No traps, no weapons.  
He had approached her with patience, stripping away her
fears layer by layer, proving that he would not harm her.  
He had come so close. Only a single step remained.  
A quiet sigh escaped him, carrying the weight of his
frustration.  
That was when he sensed the presence of another.  
Cardale turned his gaze slightly toward the clock.  
The appointed time had already passed while he had been
lost in thought.  
Late again.  
How ridiculous, this foolish power struggle that not even the
Emperor engaged in.  
But it would all end today.  
A cold smile tugged at the corner of his lips.  
“You contacted me so suddenly. What’s the matter?”  
Crown Prince Marius strode in with deliberate steps, taking a
seat across from him.  
“I’m busy, so I’d prefer if we got straight to the point, Duke
Vassenberg.”  
Cardale retrieved a document from his coat and handed it
over.  
The ancient covenant between the Vassenberg family and
the imperial house.  
The prince’s gray eyes darkened in confusion as he read it.  
“I simply need Your Highness to sign here, officially
dissolving the ancient covenant.”  
For a moment, Marius thought he had misheard.  
The oath, sworn once per generation, bound Vassenberg to
serve the imperial family when called upon.  
And it had yet to be invoked.  
“Why in the world would I sign this? The next Duke of
Vassenberg hasn’t even been born ye–”  
“That is of no concern to Your Highness.”  
Cardale’s voice was as composed as ever.  
“It would be in your best interest to sign. That way, you can
keep your throne safe for a long time.”  
“…Are you threatening me, Duke?”  
The Crown Prince slammed his fist against the table.  
The guards near the entrance tensed, the atmosphere
instantly turning hostile.  
But Cardale didn’t even blink.  
“Quite the opposite, actually.”  
Then, in a low voice, he added with a hint of amusement.  
“After all, Her Highness Princess Theresia is still alive.”  
Marius’s face went pale.

Cardale waited in silence for a reaction. He was not the one
in a hurry.  
“Everyone, leave the room.”  
The Crown Prince’s tension was evident as he ordered the
soldiers.  
“And make sure no one approaches this area.”  
One of the Imperial Guards hesitated before protesting.  
“But, Your Highness, ”  
“Vassenberg wouldn’t dare lay a finger on me!”  
Marius, now visibly agitated, snapped at the soldier and all
but shoved them out of the room. Gone was the carefully
maintained image of a relaxed and magnanimous prince.  
His mind was in complete turmoil.  
‘Could Theresia really be alive? No… Maybe the Duke is
bluffing.’
He swallowed dryly, regaining his composure before he
finally spoke.  
“How could the princess have survived after falling from the
ship?”  
But there was something Marius had overlooked,   
In his moment of shaken rationality, he had already walked
straight into Cardale’s trap.  
“How did Your Highness know that the princess fell from the
ship?”  
  
Marius flinched in shock before hurriedly attempting to
explain himself.  
“I, I only assumed! She went missing in the open sea after
all.”  
“I understand.”  
Cardale’s lips curved into a smirk.  
“Surely, His Highness wouldn’t have ordered someone to
push his own sister off the deck amidst the chaos?”  
Marius went rigid, missing the perfect moment to refute the
accusation.  
“You made two mistakes.”  
Cardale calmly pointed them out, one by one.  
“First, you separated the princess from her closest allies.”  
Marius had sought to cut off Theresia’s connections, but in
doing so, he had only given her knight, Dietrich Klein, the
time to grasp the situation and call for help.  
“Second, you sent me there as the princess’s escort and
witness to the accident.”  
On the surface, it had seemed to be the Emperor’s decision,
but it had been laughably easy to trace Marius’s influence
behind it.  
“As you well know, Vassenberg is bound by the covenant,
we cannot harm Oldenhilt. If a member of the imperial
family was in danger, how could I possibly turn a blind
eye?”  
“So you did save Theresia?!”  
Marius exploded with rage, but Cardale merely responded
with a slow, knowing smile.  
That smile alone answered everything.  
To one, it confirmed that he had indeed attempted to have
his sister killed.  
To the other, it confirmed that the princess was alive and
well.  
“You… you deceived me?!”  
Marius shot to his feet, slamming both hands on the table in
fury.  
Cardale leaned back against his chair, tilting his head
slightly.  
And then, with a chilling air, he spoke his warning.  
“You were the first to deceive me.”  
“I never–”  
“Have you forgotten the hunting festival?”  
Marius froze for a moment, then flushed with
embarrassment and shouted,  
“That was just an accident!”  
“An accident, was it?”  
Cardale’s voice dropped into a dark, lethal tone, suffocating
the room with pressure. The Crown Prince’s throat
tightened.  
“I asked for only one thing in exchange for my support for
your claim to the throne.”  
Elise’s safety.  
There had been too many beasts coveting his delicate,
beautiful doe. Too many jackals ready to sink their teeth into
her fragile neck. So he had asked only for her protection.  
“And yet, what happened? Because of your incompetence,
my fiancée, who now carries the heir to Vassenberg, was
abducted. I was the one who had to find her myself.”  
No one would have dared to speak to the Imperial Crown
Prince in such a way. But Marius was too paralyzed with fear
to object.  
The oppressive weight pressing down on him made it hard
to even breathe.  
And now, Cardale was standing.  
The Duke loomed over him, his presence towering and
suffocating.  
Marius’s relatively smaller frame trembled.  
“Do you understand now why I haven’t exposed your crimes
by bringing the princess back to the empire?”  
Cardale placed a firm hand on Marius’s shoulder and pushed
him back into his seat.  
“Sign it.”  
If you want to maintain even the illusion of sitting on the
throne in the future.  
The Crown Prince looked at the document before him.  
The blank space for his signature seemed to loom
impossibly large.  
“If… if I sign this…”  
“Then the princess will never return to the empire.”  
Marius squeezed his eyes shut, then opened them again.
Finally, with the look of a man resigned to his fate, he
reached for the quill.  

By now, Marius was likely grinding his teeth in frustration.  
He had no choice but to use up his generation’s turn in the
covenant.  
So now, he would spend the next decade or more plotting
ways to exact revenge for this humiliation.  
“Foolish.”  
Oldenhilt had relied on Vassenberg for too long.  
They liked to think they were the ones using Vassenberg,
but in reality, they had become parasites.  
They had grown so comfortable in their luxury that they had
abandoned their own traditions, one by one.  
Among those traditions was the ancient law that only a child
born to an empress could inherit the throne.  
That was why the empire had such a strong disdain for
illegitimate heirs.  
It was also why Emperor Johann had gone to such great
lengths to fabricate the legitimacy of Marius’s mother.  
But the key question remained,   
Why was that law established in the first place?  
Because of the covenant between Oldenhilt and
Vassenberg.  
The covenant, passed down through ancient magic and
bound to bloodlines, required the chosen heir to be the
result of an acknowledged union between the two families.  
Any violation of that rule would lead to the complete
dissolution of the covenant.  
Vassenberg’s power and abilities were inherited by only one
direct heir at a time, and their lineage was notoriously
scarce.  
Thus, the covenant had always been an essential condition
that Oldenhilt’s emperor had to uphold at all costs.  
But as time passed, the true significance of the covenant
was forgotten.  
The knowledge had only ever been passed verbally from
one emperor to the next, and over the centuries, much of it
had been lost.  
By Johann’s era, that ignorance had led to the disastrous
mistake of disguising an illegitimate heir as a legitimate
one.  
Cardale lazily smirked as he recalled Marius’s signature on
the covenant dissolution.  
That was why he had chosen Marius over Theresia.  
Because the Crown Prince was easier to manipulate than
the princess? Because Theresia was too troublesome?
Because Marius had once dared to touch Elise?  
While none of those reasons were entirely wrong, the true
reason was simpler,   
Cardale didn’t want Elise to suffer for the sake of their future
child.  
If their child became the next Duke of Vassenberg, Oldenhilt
would undoubtedly invoke the covenant and send them to
war.  
They wouldn’t hesitate to exploit a powerful war machine.  
After all, the empire’s wealth had always been built on
conquest and pillaging.  
And if Elise had to watch her only child be sent off to
slaughter, she would spend every waking moment in grief.  
Cardale had never particularly cared about heirs.  
He himself had grown up without love from his parents, so
he had expected to feel the same indifference toward his
own child.  
To him, heirs had always been nothing more than a means
to continue the bloodline.  
Even when he had deliberately ensured Elise would
conceive, it had been an act driven by possessiveness
rather than paternal affection.  
But there was one thing he had failed to account for…   
That Elise cherished this child far more than he had
anticipated.  
He remembered the words of her mother, Marissa, who had
tearfully clutched his sleeve.  
“Your Grace, it may be hard to believe, but… Elise… she was
never supposed to be able to bear children.”  
“The physician said that if she ever became pregnant, it
would be nothing short of a miracle.”  
A miracle.  
And so, Cardale decided,   
Even if it meant playing the role of a devoted father for a
lifetime, he would do it.  
Because he refused to watch his woman shed another tear.  
With that thought, he glanced at Elise as she held two balls
of soft yarn, pondering colors for the baby’s clothes.  
His gaze lingered on the diamond ring on her finger.  
The ring, gleaming on her left hand, was the Vassenberg
recognition medium, the mark of his one and only partner.

The marriage of Duke Vassenberg and Lady Elise was
officially announced in grand fashion.
Leading newspapers across the empire, as if in agreement,
simultaneously published the news on their front pages.
Inghel’s high society, which had been relatively quiet since
the Crown Prince’s engagement banquet, was instantly
thrown into a frenzy upon receiving the shocking news.
The Duke had been utterly unmoved by Princess Theresia’s
relentless pursuit, yet now, out of nowhere, he had gotten
married?
And to none other than Elise Schuvan, the woman once
rumored to be his mistress?
“I heard they’ve been engaged for quite some time, but no
one had any idea.”
The articles also detailed the story of their engagement.
During the royal hunting festival, Lady Elise had been
kidnapped as part of Raymond Hartmann’s conspiracy. It
was through this ordeal that the Duke of Vassenberg had
come to realize his deep affection for her. After rescuing her,
he formally proposed. A romantic tale fit for a novel.
“They even held a private wedding with only family and a
few close confidants in attendance. Such a shame. I’ve
heard the Duke’s estate is just as grand as the Imperial
Palace, and the gardens are stunning…”
“The ducal castle in the Brillion estate is even more
magnificent.”
Though they refrained from openly expressing it, many
nobles had secretly looked forward to a lavish wedding
celebration, one where they might be invited to the Duke’s
residence.
For nearly a decade, since Duchess Victoria Vassenberg had
been sent to live in exile on the estate, social visits to the
Duke’s residence had been nearly impossible.
“But now that the lady of the house has arrived, won’t
things change?”
Someone spoke in an excited tone.
“Once the Duchess has given birth, of course.”
Another major revelation had accompanied the
announcement: Elise Vassenberg, the newly titled Duchess,
was expecting a child.
The Duke had made it explicitly clear, this unborn child was
his firstborn and the rightful heir of House Vassenberg.
There was no longer room for doubt.
The Duke’s devotion to his wife, the woman once dismissed
as a mere mistress, was undeniable.
At the same time, any noble with even a shred of
intelligence couldn’t help but reflect on their own past
conduct.
Had they ever insulted the Duchess? Spoken carelessly
about her? Behaved in a way that might come back to haunt
them?
Every single one of them recalled at least one instance that
made them uneasy.
Perhaps they had never directly mocked or harmed her, but
many had, at the very least, silently condoned her
mistreatment or looked down on her with quiet contempt.
“Come to think of it, didn’t Baron Ruther say something at
the Crown Prince’s engagement banquet?”
There was no better way to cover one’s own faults than to
shift the blame elsewhere.
“You said something along the lines of, ‘She’s just a bastard
daughter anyway. The Duke will discard her soon enough.'”
“W-When did I ever say that?!”
The accused noble turned pale, pointing an accusatory
finger of his own.
“You’re one to talk! Didn’t you swear last year that she’d be
thrown out before the summer was over?”
“How dare you spout such nonsense!”
Soon, they were at each other’s throats, while the rest of
the nobles discreetly stepped away. All of them
contemplating similar thoughts.
“When is the expected due date? Perhaps she’ll return to
society next autumn?”
“I should prepare a grand gift on behalf of my family
immediately…”
With no Empress and no Princess in court, the Duchess of
Vassenberg was now the most noble woman in the empire.
Though they were late in realizing it, they now needed to
secure her favor.
It was the day that Elise Vassenberg’s name was
permanently etched into the minds of every noble in the
empire.
While the outside world buzzed with excitement, the
Schuvan estate remained peaceful and quiet, as if
untouched by the chaos beyond its walls.
This was thanks to Cardale’s thorough protection.
The estate was closely guarded, and no one could approach
within a certain radius without permission.
Many nobles had attempted to visit the newlyweds with
extravagant gifts, but all had been turned away without
exception.
They had likely considered their offerings valuable, but
nothing could meet Cardale’s standards.
More importantly, he had no intention of allowing his wife to
receive anything touched by others.
The only people he allowed near her were her mother and
brother, his absolute limit.
Of course, Elise was completely unaware of any of this.
Within the comfort of her family’s home, she lived
peacefully, spending each day preparing for the arrival of
her baby.
She read, took strolls, engaged in conversation,
embroidered, knitted, and occasionally helped Damian with
estate matters.
And every single day, Cardale visited her.
“Um… Duke, I have something to ask you.”
Elise, now visibly pregnant, placed both hands gently over
her belly and spoke hesitantly.
“Are you sure it’s alright for you to come here so often?”
“Hmm?”
“You have so many responsibilities. I worry that I might be
interfering with your duties as Duke…”
Cardale sighed inwardly.
She had been assisting her brother lately, and now new
concerns had surfaced in her mind.
It was laughably easy to guess her thoughts. He could
practically hear the anxious reasoning spinning in her head.
“If even Count Schuvan’s estate is this complex and difficult
to manage, then the Duke’s responsibilities must be
overwhelming… But he visits me every day. Does he have
enough time? Am I causing him trouble?”
And yet, the fact that she was worried about him was
nothing short of sweet.
Cardale smiled.
“Spending a little time with you is no problem at all.”
If anything, his work efficiency had increased several times
over since he was no longer drowning in miserable solitude.
“Honestly, my vassals will probably bend over backward in
gratitude the moment they meet their lady.”
“Pardon?”
“I mean, there’s nothing to worry about.”
Cardale chuckled at her flustered reaction.
But he wasn’t entirely joking.
Lately, his vassals had noticed his improved mood and had
taken the opportunity to confess mistakes they had been
hiding, cleaning up old problems while they still had the
chance.
“Are you sure you’re really alright?”
“Of course.”
“Then… that’s a relief, Ah!”
Just as she finally relaxed and nodded, Elise suddenly
gasped, her eyes widening as she looked down at her belly.
“Elise?”
Cardale shot up from his seat.
“What is it? Are you in pain?”
He hurried toward her, his movements quick and alarmed.
“No, it’s just…”
The moment his hand brushed against her soft skin, he
froze.
Elise took his hand gently, her touch tentative but
deliberate.
He widened his eyes.
She rarely reached for him on her own.
Slowly, she guided his hand, until it rested against her belly.
“It feels like bubbles,” she said, her eyes twinkling.
“I think the baby is trying to talk to us.”
Cardale didn’t miss the hopeful anticipation in her gaze.
And instinctively, he realized– 
This was his moment.
A chance to redeem himself, to atone for the past.
He recalled the books on pregnancy he had read for her.
“May I greet the baby?”
“Of course.”
He lowered himself, bringing his face close to her belly.
And in the softest, gentlest voice he could muster, he spoke.
He had no talent for this sort of thing, but his memory was
flawless. Rewording something he had read was a simple
matter.
“Listen to your mother well, and grow healthy. We look
forward to meeting you in the warm light of late spring.”
He patted her belly a few times before straightening.
Elise’s cheeks were tinged pink.
He knew then that he had succeeded.
“Thank you… The baby will be happy.”
“It’s nothing.”
He feigned indifference.
“As a father, I only did what I should do. What I wanted to
do.”
Her face lit up even more.
Her pure delight, her unfiltered joy, it was so perfectly her.
Cardale gazed at her fondly before something caught his
eye, the pendant resting on her slender, pale neck.
And then, a new desire stirred within him.
“Elise.”
“Yes?”
“Shall we commission a family portrait?”
Her eyes widened.
“A… family portrait?”
She hesitated before softly listing the members.
“Then… You and I…”
“And our baby.”
Her lips parted slightly.
“Our family…”
She whispered, her voice trembling.
Tears gathered faintly in her blue eyes.
But it wasn’t from sorrow.
It wasn’t from pain.
She looked at him with eyes full of excitement.
Cardale smiled and proposed the idea again.
“A large painting. One we can hang in our home. What do
you think?”
Elise nodded happily.

Sweat trickled down the painter’s back.
It was due to the Duke’s piercing gaze that stabbed into him
every time he glanced at the Duchess.
‘I felt this when working on the pendant’s portrait as well…’
But back then, the Duke’s stare hadn’t been quite so
blatantly murderous.
‘I swear upon my conscience and honor that I have not
harbored even the slightest improper thought, nor will I
ever…!’
Swallowing down the outcry he couldn’t voice, the painter
continued his trembling brushstrokes.
Of course, he was a perfectly healthy adult man, and as an
artist, he instinctively pursued beauty. To claim that his eyes
wouldn’t be drawn to an exquisite subject would be a lie.
However, in this case, he didn’t even dare to feel the
stirrings of desire. The Duke’s presence was simply too
terrifying.
His gaze was so chilling that it seemed to promise execution
should he harbor even a sliver of impure intent. The mere
thought of sneaking a lecherous glance at the Duchess or
indulging in inappropriate thoughts was unthinkable.
And so, the painter was genuinely grateful that it was
winter.
What if the Duchess had been wearing one of those sheer
muslin dresses so popular as of late? What if he had
inadvertently glimpsed her translucent silhouette?
The painter would have bet his entire fortune that his head
would be displayed on a pike in front of the mansion by
nightfall.
A shiver ran down his spine at the thought.
Fortunately, the Duchess was wrapped in a thick cloak and a
plush fur muffler that covered her neck. The only visible
parts of her skin were her pale face and delicate white
hands.
It was at that moment that the painter felt an unexpected
wave of gratitude.
“Your gaze is impure.”
“…Pardon?”
“Focus on the painting.”
The Duke’s abrupt warning left the painter utterly wronged.
He was painting a portrait. Of course, he had to look at his
subject. And more importantly, the one who commissioned
the painting was none other than the Duke himself!
But he lacked the courage to voice his grievances. Instead,
he swallowed his frustration and channeled his anxiety into
his art.
With unwavering professionalism, he worked through the
night, and the final portrait was nothing short of a
masterpiece.
“They say you’re the finest painter in Inghel… and indeed,
this is excellent.”
“My word, what a harmonious sight!”
Hearing the admiration of Count Schuvan and his mother,
the painter felt a surge of pride.
The Duchess, too, seemed pleased, smiling shyly in delight.
‘Another successful piece… huh?’
Just as he was basking in satisfaction, his body stiffened. He
had locked eyes with the Duke, whose expression was so
cold and rigid that it sent a chill through him.
Tap, tap.
The Duke beckoned him with his fingers, and though his feet
felt leaden, the painter managed to stumble forward. He
hadn’t done anything wrong, yet his legs trembled and his
throat went dry.
A question came immediately.
“This is your best work?”
The painter swallowed hard.
The one who commissioned the painting was the Duke. The
one who would pay for it was also the Duke.
No matter how much the world praised his work, if the Duke
was dissatisfied, it was meaningless.
“W-what about it displeases you…? If you tell me, I can
make corrections…”
The Duke let out a short, incredulous breath.
“In your wretched eyes, does my wife look merely like that?”
“…Pardon?”
“She is beyond compare–more beautiful, more noble, more
pure–”
“I understand, Your Grace.”
It was then that Count Schuvan suddenly interjected.
“But no painter in the world could truly capture Elise.”
With a persuasive air, he turned to the Duke.
“Our Elise is simply too lovely. It can’t be helped.”
“…Is that so.”
The painter’s jaw nearly dropped.
These two men, so severe and seemingly impenetrable,
were engaging in this conversation with utmost sincerity,
without a hint of doubt.
‘Well, the Duchess is indeed the most beautiful woman I’ve
ever seen. And she was incredibly kind and gentle, too.’
He had once wondered how someone as delicate as the
Duchess could possibly endure at the side of the formidable
Duke of Vassenberg.
But today, he realized his concerns had been entirely
misplaced.
‘Perhaps that’s why they suit each other so well.’
The painter gazed up at the portrait of the ducal couple he
had completed.
An arrogant and ruthless man who was strong and steadfast
for his wife, and a tender, fragile woman who possessed a
warm and gentle soul.
They looked like lovers straight out of a storybook.
Though he was no fortune teller, his years of experience had
given him a keen eye.
‘They will be together for a long, long time.’
A quiet smile formed on his lips.

“I’d like to commission another painting.”
After seeing the completed portrait, Damien made a new
request.
This time, it was to be a family portrait, including his
mother, sister, and himself.
“What about His Grace?” Elise asked.
Damien glanced at Cardale before smirking playfully. Then,
with an exaggeratedly regretful expression, he replied,
“Unfortunately, this time, it’ll just be us.”
The Duke, now excluded, was clearly displeased, but he
wisely kept his irritation hidden from Elise.
“I’m sorry.”
“There’s nothing to be sorry about. We’ll do another one
next time.”
Of course, he had carefully calculated his response,
ensuring that Elise would remember him as a broad-minded
and understanding husband.
“Don’t worry about me. Go on and take your place.”
“But…”
“I’ll wait right here. Let’s go for a walk afterward.”
His plan worked. Throughout the painting session, Elise
frequently glanced at him, and each time, he met her gaze
with a gentle smile.

One day, as Cardale was about to enter the room where the
portrait was being painted, he suddenly stopped at the
doorway upon hearing Elise’s laughter.
She was surrounded by her family, with Damien
demonstrating something to her.
“This is called a music box. If you wind it like this…”
A delicate waltz melody played as two miniature dancers
spun inside the box.
“It plays music on its own.”
“Wow, that’s amazing!”
Like a child seeing candy for the first time, Elise clasped her
hands together, eyes sparkling with curiosity.
Damien smiled and asked, “Shall we dance?”
“I… I’m not very good at dancing. And I have the baby…”
She hesitated, but Marissa encouraged her.
“It’s fine. Just move slowly. It’s only us here. No one will
mind if you make a mistake.”
After a moment of hesitation, Elise took Damien’s hand. As
Marissa wound the music box again, the melody began
anew.
They swayed gently, less a dance, more a series of subtle
movements.
Yet Elise’s face grew brighter, and soon, she laughed. A
pure, joyous laugh.
‘Elise.’
Cardale stood frozen in place, staring at the woman who
shone like summer sunlight.
Had she ever laughed like this before?
His heart pounded, shaken by the sheer brilliance of her
happiness.
When the song ended, Elise chuckled, dimples forming in
her flushed cheeks.
“That was the clumsiest dance I’ve ever done.”
“Let’s do it often,” Damien said.
“Isn’t it my turn now?” Cardale interjected.
Elise whirled around in surprise.
“Duke!”
For a moment, he had worried that her expression would
falter. But instead, her face lit up with a bright smile,
instantly dissolving his concerns.
“When did you arrive?”
“Just now.”
With an excited step, she approached him and held up the
music box.
“Damien gave me this as a gift! It’s called a music box, and
it’s new at the shop.”
Cardale glanced at the delicate craftsmanship. It was
precisely the sort of thing Elise would love.
He should have thought of it first.
“Tsk, what a shame.”
If someone else had made the first move, he would simply
take the lead next time.
“I was going to give you one as well.”
“…Really?”
Elise’s eyes widened.
“Of course. I even had one custom-made.”
It was a lie. He had just decided to commission one now.
Unfazed, Damien frowned. “But this was only just
invented…”
“Does that matter?” Cardale replied coolly. “There’s nothing
I can’t do.”
And so, that very evening, Elise received a custom-made
music box.
Under the flickering candlelight, she and Cardale danced
together to its melody.
For Elise, it was the warmest winter. For Cardale, the most
unforgettable one.

Even in the imperial capital of Inghel, located in the northcentral region of the empire, the changing of the seasons
was gradually becoming noticeable.  
At some point, the midday sunlight and the occasional
gentle breeze began to hint at the arrival of spring.  
As a result, the Duke’s residence became busy with
preparations to welcome its new mistress.  
For the first time in over a decade, the Duchess’s
bedchamber, tightly sealed since the Grand Madam was
practically chased out of the mansion, was reopened.  
And so, an extensive renovation project began to prepare
for its new occupant.  
“Houselady, what do you think this time?”  
The merchant delivering the materials anxiously rubbed his
hands together as he asked.  
He had previously brought in windowpanes of an absurd
thickness, nearly causing the entire contract to fall
through.  
Linda did not answer immediately. Instead, she took out a
measuring ruler.  
Her eyes were sharp and meticulous, as if she would not
tolerate even the slightest deviation.  
“I have ensured that it matches the exact specifications you
requested.”  
Sweat beaded on the merchant’s temples as though it were
the height of summer.  
He was well-versed in transactions with noble families and
had even supplied goods to the House of Vassenberg
multiple times. Yet, this deal was proving to be more
demanding than any other he had ever encountered with
them before.  
He could not afford to be careless with a single detail, to the
point that he had to personally inspect each item rather
than entrusting it to his staff.  
“This time, it’s a perfect match. Proceed with it.”  
Finally, approval was granted. The relieved merchant let out
a breath and exclaimed,  
“Yes, understood!”  
“How is the insulation work progressing? I emphasized it
from the very beginning of the contract, there must be
absolutely no drafts.”  
As Linda oversaw the renovation and interior arrangements
of the Duchess’s chamber, everyone else in the residence
found themselves working twice as hard as usual.  
Norman had to take on some of Linda’s responsibilities in
addition to his own, and as for Michael, there was no need
to even mention how swamped he was.  
The Duke was making relentless use of his sole aide, to a
degree that was almost admirable, allowing him no time to
rest.  
Michael even found himself wondering if his days as an
adjutant on the battlefield had actually been more leisurely
than this.  
Norman would often glance at him with a sympathetic
expression, but all he ever said, with his hands politely
clasped was,  
“This is for the madam. Please endure it just a little longer,
sir.”  
That was precisely why Michael endured the crushing
workload.  
Because he still harbored the self-loathing and guilt of
having once stood by and done nothing as she slowly
withered away in the mansion, unable to stop his master.  
He hoped that by enduring this, he might atone, even a
little.  
“Sir Walter! Are you listening?”  
But no matter how much time passed, dealing with retainers
old enough to be his father or grandfather never got any
easier.  
“I asked, when will we be able to meet the mistress?”  
With the arrival of warmer weather, the elders, who had
been sending letters every few days, seized the opportunity
to come up to the capital in person.  
Now, gathered in front of the mansion as if staging a
protest, they bombarded Michael with demands.  
Since the Duke was often away from the residence during
the day, his aide alone bore the brunt of their persistence.  
“Have you forgotten? The Duchess is with child, and the
physician has strictly advised that she must have complete
rest.”  
“That is why we are saying, we only wish to offer our
greetings!”  
“That will not be possible.”  
Michael rejected them outright.  
“If the mistress is startled by unfamiliar visitors, it could be
dangerous.”  
“Unfamiliar visitors? That is too harsh! We are the loyal
retainers and elders of House Vassenberg–”  
As a long-winded speech threatened to begin, Michael
already felt a headache creeping in.  
Of course, revealing that the Duchess was not actually
staying at the mansion was out of the question.  
If he did, these talkative elders would surely storm Count
Schuvan’s estate instead, and Michael did not even want to
imagine the chaos that would ensue.  
“Then, at least allow us to deliver the gifts we prepared.”  
“Leave them here, and I will ensure they are delivered on
your behalf.”  
“No, we simply wish to present them ourselves–”  
Today was a lost cause.  
As Michael glanced back, he caught sight of the elderly
butler’s gentle face. Today, his gaze of sympathy was more
blatant than ever.  
‘There’s no other way.’  
With a quiet sigh, Michael resigned himself to sacrificing his
own peace to maintain order in the mansion.  

In a quiet corner of the garden, Elise was bending forward
slightly, carefully observing something on the ground.  
Cardale approached her slowly.  
Unconsciously, he had softened his footsteps, failing to
realize that this might startle his timid wife.  
Because of this, when Elise suddenly noticed the tip of a
black boot in front of her, she flinched in surprise.  
“Ah…!”  
“Elise!”  
As she tried to straighten up, she lost her balance and
wobbled. Cardale quickly reached out and caught her.  
“I-I’m fine.”  
However, perhaps due to the shock, her legs had gone
weak, and she couldn’t stand properly.  
Cardale swiftly lifted her into his arms. He couldn’t ignore
how light she felt, even though she was carrying a child.  
“I’m sorry for startling you.”  
“No, it’s my fault… I got frightened over nothing.”  
Nestled in his arms, Elise tried to ease the awkward
atmosphere with a lighthearted remark.  
“The Duke’s shoes… They are always so spotless and
polished. Sometimes they even seem to shine.”  
  
For a moment, Cardale could not respond.  
To have noticed that…  
How many times must she have looked at my shoes?  
How often must she have seen them, over and over?  
She had always kept her head lowered, her gaze fixed on
the ground.  
He was the one who had forced her to kneel.  
He was the one who had spread her legs with the tip of his
boot, the one who had ordered her to lick it, the one who
had humiliated and trampled her.  
Memories surged in reverse, pulling him back.  
To that very first encounter.  
When she had pleaded for help for her ailing mother, and he
had merely tossed her a pouch of coins.  
Ah.  
Cardale finally remembered.  
The way she had hurriedly hidden her worn-out shoes
beneath her tattered skirts.  
‘Even back then…’  
A sharp realization struck his heart.  
They had never once stood as equals. From the very
beginning, he had been the one looking down, and she had
been the one forced to look up.  
The disparity in power had been so absolute that their
relationship had been built on dominance and submission.  
That was why, even now, despite carrying the heir of House
Vassenberg, despite being his wife, Elise still believed she
could be cast aside at any moment.  
Cardale had once scoffed at tragic love stories in operas.
Now, he could only laugh bitterly at his own foolishness.  
He had never paid attention to the countless orphans and
beggars in the slums.  
But when he saw Elise, it had been different. He had
stepped down from his carriage. He had spoken to her. He
had helped her, under the excuse of using her.  
Yet, he had refused to acknowledge his own feelings. And
because of that, their relationship had started on the wrong
foot from the very beginning.  
I won’t make you bow your head anymore.  
Not to me. Not to anyone.  
Hiding his emotions, Cardale sat down on a nearby bench
and gently cupped Elise’s cheek.  
“Elise.”  
“Yes?”  
Her gentle, doe-like eyes blinked up at him, framed by long
lashes.  
“What were you looking at?”  
“The sprouts.”  
“Sprouts?”  
She nodded, and both of their gazes naturally shifted to the
ground where Elise had just been looking.  
“My brother planted morning glory seeds for me a little
while ago.”  
Of all the flowers, why morning glories? Cardale found
himself wondering.  
As if she had read his thoughts, Elise continued speaking.  
“They grow at the Duke’s estate too. Along the garden
colonnade. In the summer, the purple morning glories bloom
in full.”  
At that moment, Cardale recalled seeing Elise sitting on a
bench near the colonnade, silently gazing at the flowers.  
“I saw them wither and dry up around winter… but I don’t
know if someone has replanted them this year.”  
“They must have sprouted.” He replied with a gentle smile.
“They bloom every year, after all.”  
“You’ve seen the morning glories in the colonnade too, my
lord?”  
Cardale had never paid any particular attention to such
flowers before, but he nodded as if he had always known
about them.  
After all, they would bloom again next year anyway, so what
did it matter?  
“That’s a relief.”  
Elise smiled, looking reassured.  
“When I saw them withered last winter… for some reason, it
made me feel a little sad.”

Cardale gazed at her quietly.  
Her eyes seemed filled with sorrow. Her lips trembled as she
spoke of the past. The delicate tips of her fingers fidgeted
restlessly.  
Elise.  
What did you see?  
In the morning glory that once shyly budded, that bloomed
in full splendor, that in the end, withered and crumbled
away?  
He pictured her sitting all alone, staring at the dead
flowers.  
He imagined the solitude and sorrow of a woman who had
determined her own end in a forest of beasts.  
Though his wife held no resentment, the anguish of her
past; her pain, carefully hidden away, returned to him,
cutting through him like a blade.  
Yet, for Elise’s sake, Cardale put on the warmest smile.  
“Rather than thinking of it as withering, just consider it as
the flower merely falling asleep for a while.”  
“Asleep?”  
“Yes. To prepare for the next spring. That’s why it bears fruit
and leaves behind seeds.”  
As her eyes blinked blankly, her face slowly brightened.
Cardale tightened his arms around her, holding her close.
Elise buried her face against his chest and murmured
softly.  
“In truth…”  
He patiently waited as she hesitated for a long time.  
“When I heard about the meaning of morning glories… I
thought it suited you, my lord.”  
“Me?”  
Elise nodded.  
“Butler Norman told me that purple morning glories
symbolize nobility.”  
Then she added that she had discovered another meaning
in a book.  
Nobility, composure, coldness.  
They were all fitting descriptions of him, yet Cardale found
himself displeased.  
At the very least, he did not want Elise to see him that way.  
“Elise.”  
“Yes, Duke?”  
This title still did not sit well with him.  
No matter what the world thought, Cardale wanted to be
seen as a warm and caring husband in his wife’s eyes. He
was simply waiting until she was ready to accept him that
way.  
Should he change the meaning of the flower instead?  
For a brief moment, he seriously considered the feasibility of
such a task.  

“Ah…!”  
At the sudden yelp, Cardale flinched and released his grip
on her calf.  
“Did that hurt?”  
“N-no, it’s fine.”  
Elise quickly wiped away the tear that had welled up at the
corner of her eye and hurriedly answered. But there was no
way Cardale hadn’t noticed.  
“…I’m sorry. I meant to be gentle, but I must have used too
much force.”  
“It’s really okay.”  
As her pregnancy progressed, Elise’s body swelled easily. By
evening, her legs would be so swollen that it was almost
pitiful to look at.  
“The Duke is the one working so hard because of me…”  
“What do you mean, ‘working hard’?”  
It was Cardale who had taken it upon himself to massage
her body. He did it willingly, almost obsessively, without
letting anyone else take over.  
After all, it was an opportunity to touch his woman as much
as he wanted, to spend time alone with her.  
However, there was one problem.  
Elise, already fragile to begin with, had become even more
delicate after conceiving. Meanwhile, his grip was absurdly
strong.  
Even though he barely applied any pressure, she would
wince, furrow her brows, or even break out in cold sweat
from the pain.  
“I’ll be gentler.”  
He reminded her to speak up if it hurt, then poured more oil
onto his hands and resumed massaging her.  
As he carefully kneaded and caressed her soft skin, Cardale
let out a quiet, almost imperceptible sigh laced with
restrained desire.  
Anywhere he kissed would surely taste sweet. The urge to
claim every inch of her, to brand her as his, burned within
him. But she had no idea how much he was holding himself
back.  
Yet, he concealed his longing effortlessly and continued the
massage with practiced ease.  
Until the swelling in her legs gradually subsided.  
Until her once-tense breaths turned soft and relaxed.  
By the time the room was filled with the warm, soothing
fragrance of the oil,   
“Duke…!”  
A small, surprised yet delighted voice called out.  
Cardale immediately recognized what it meant and quickly
straightened up, moving to sit beside her.  
One hand gently pulled her petite frame into his embrace,
while the other rested over her round belly.  
Thump.  
A tiny movement was felt from within.  
The baby kicked energetically, flailing its arms and legs as if
rejoicing, even rolling around inside her.  
“…It must be a lively one.”  
Elise smiled softly as she commented on the increasingly
frequent fetal movements.  
Every time he saw his wife with that blissful expression,
Cardale felt his heart ache unbearably.  
Because she was devastatingly precious. Because she was
so beautiful, he wanted to devour her whole.  
Thump, thump.  
The child moved tirelessly, as if trying to prove its existence
from within the womb.  
Cardale’s gaze sharpened slightly.  
He decided to send a subtle warning to the little Vassenberg
causing its mother undue exhaustion.  
Stay still. Don’t trouble your mother.  
To him, it was a remarkably gentle tone, considering that
the child carried half of Elise’s delicate blood.  
Of course, once it was born, the ruthless Vassenberg lineage
would surely devour all traces of its mother’s tenderness.  
‘…’
The baby suddenly went silent.  
“…Oh.”  
The abrupt stillness left Elise bewildered. She tapped her
belly lightly with her fingertips and whispered,  
“Baby…?”  
But the child remained completely unresponsive.  
Noticing its sulky reaction, Cardale let out an internal
chuckle.  
Even without being fully formed, a Vassenberg was still a
Vassenberg.  
Showing such a temper even before birth…  
“Baby, are you okay? You don’t know how worried Mommy
was…”  
Ordinarily, Cardale wouldn’t have cared whether the child
pouted or not.  
But he couldn’t stand to see Elise worried.  
So, just this once, he decided to take a step back.  
If you’re born healthy, I’ll play with you often.  
He offered a compromise, suppressing his usual sternness.  
Don’t make your mother upset.  
Then, he patiently waited.  
Surely, this was an enticing deal for the child.  
It seemed intelligent enough to recognize an advantageous
decision.  
A moment later,
A bubbling sensation, as if responding to him, could be felt.  
The negotiations were successful.  
The baby, who had gone completely still, moved again. The
previously halted fetal movements resumed, and Elise’s
expression, which had been darkening with concern,
brightened once more.  
“Baby, what happened? You don’t know how worried
Mommy was.”  
Not an ordinary child indeed.  
Cardale quietly rubbed his temple.  
Oblivious to his father’s thoughts, the baby now moved with
an almost cautious gentleness, as if being mindful of its
mother.  

A few days later, Cardale’s lips twisted into a smirk as he
read the urgent letter that had just arrived.  
It had been months since his master had worn such a cold
expression, and Michael stiffened instinctively at the frigid
tension rising from his feet.  
“…Your Grace.”  
“To think that someone couldn’t even handle the simple task
of watching one person.”  
Without another word, Cardale handed him the letter. As
Michael quickly scanned its contents, a low breath escaped
through his lips.  
Vanessa Lockseed had escaped.  
During the time when Damien Schuvan had seized control of
the Count’s estate, purging Gerhard Schuvan’s loyalists
without exception, Cardale had issued a separate order.  
Vanessa Lockseed, Gerhard Schuvan’s aide, was to be
secretly taken and sold into slavery at a mining site.  
For two reasons.  
First, because he had no intention of granting her an easy
death.  
Second, in case Elise ever decided to look for her.  
If not for the latter, Vanessa Lockseed would have remained
a slave until her dying breath.  
That is, assuming the mine owner had done his job
properly.  
“…Then, about the outing scheduled for two days from
now?”  
Cardale furrowed his brow.  
It was a day Elise had been eagerly anticipating.  
And so, he made his decision.  
“Proceed with the preparations as planned.”  
Michael’s eyes briefly widened in surprise, but he quickly
lowered his head in acknowledgment of the order.  
Cardale rose from his seat and approached the window. As
he looked down, he noticed the morning glory leaves,
sprouting and growing steadily.  
Perhaps this was for the best.  
It might even be an opportunity.  
Elise often showed concern for the weak and those left
behind.  
It was something Cardale could never fully comprehend, but
at the very least, he had come to understand his wife’s
nature and preferences almost perfectly.  
And he was more than willing to use that knowledge to win
her heart.

Elise’s bedroom, now well into her final month of pregnancy,
was overflowing with a dazzling array of colorful flowers.
Every single one of them a gift from Cardale.
Even during the winter, he had managed to find flowers for
her, and now that the weather had warmed, he was bringing
in armfuls of blossoms at every opportunity.
“At this rate, the bedroom will be completely filled with
flowers.”
Elise had voiced her concern, half in worry that there was no
more room left for them, but Cardale hadn’t even blinked
before replying:
“I’ll have to tell the Count to prepare another room for my
wife, then.”
Taking his words at face value, Elise had been startled, and
Cardale, seeing her expression, burst out laughing.
“D-Don’t tease me.”
“Sorry. You’re just too cute.”
“You’re teasing me right now…”
“I mean it.”
Elise touched her cheek with her fingertips where his lips
had pressed earlier. She could still vividly feel the warmth
and softness, more tender than any part of his body.
Suddenly, heat rushed to her face.
She hastily fanned herself to cool down.
Goodness, what am I thinking…
Yet she couldn’t stop her gaze from drifting to the flower
petals.
How does he always manage to bring such beautiful, vibrant
flowers?
The petals, glistening with morning dew, looked fresh and
alive. It felt as if each blossom held a piece of his heart,
making every one of them precious to her.
Clip-clop, clip-clop!
At that moment, the sound of hooves made Elise turn
toward the window.
The tightly shut gates of the Count’s estate were now wide
open, and a man on a black horse rode in.
Elise’s face lit up.
“The Duke is here…!”
She had been ready and waiting for him, but still, she
smoothed out her dress, wanting to look as pretty as
possible for the always-dashing man, at least today.
‘Though it’s still nowhere near enough…’
Would it have been better if she wore jewelry?
But ever since her belly had grown, she refrained from
adorning herself with heavy, ornate gems.
“Ah, if I don’t hurry, I’ll be late…!”
Just as she hurriedly tried to leave the room after checking
herself in the mirror, the door opened, and Cardale entered.
“You were about to come out to greet me again, weren’t
you.”
She had just seen him outside moments ago, when did he
get here?
His astonishing speed left her wide-eyed.
Damien followed Cardale into the room and caught sight of
his younger sister awkwardly standing there and scolded
her with a mock-stern face.
“You never listen to your brother, do you?”
Elise flinched like a child caught doing something wrong and
stammered her excuse.
“I was just going to the doorway.”
Then, her blue eyes tilting mischievously, she slipped
behind Cardale’s back. It was a near-instinctive move,
knowing he would always shield her without question.
“I’m just so excited about going out…”
Damien’s face showed his helpless exasperation, but
Cardale simply found his wife clutching his sleeve to be
adorable.
“Of course. It’s a day you’ve been looking forward to.”
And then he went one step further, redirecting the blame
toward Damien.
“It’s truly the fault of a brother trying to lock his sister away
under the pretense of safety.”
Damien, who had just yesterday advised Elise to stay
comfortably in her room with Cardale, looked unjustly
aggrieved.
“Your Grace, is that really necessary?”
“I have no idea what you’re talking about.”
Naturally, Cardale was someone who had long thrown away
any sense of conscience in pursuit of his wife’s affection,
and cared little for anyone else’s grievances.
“Before we leave, I have something to give you. Sit down for
a moment?”
Cardale lifted the hem of Elise’s skirt and took off her indoor
shoes, then pulled out a pair of shoes from his coat.
Damien raised an eyebrow.
“Your Grace is giving a very unusual gift for lovers.”
At his loaded remark, Elise asked curiously,
“Why, brother?”
“Shoes are rarely given as gifts. There’s a superstition that
the person will walk away to a better partner in those
shoes.”
Startled, Elise gasped and covered her mouth, but Cardale
remained perfectly calm.
“The Count believes in superstitions more than I thought.”
He personally slipped the shoes onto her feet. The soft
leather embraced her small feet warmly, having been kept
close to his body before now.
“And…”
After making sure the shoes fit her perfectly, Cardale
straightened up, twisting his lips into a crooked smile.
“Is there even anyone better than me?”
Damien was momentarily dumbstruck. When he recovered,
he opened his mouth to respond, but no words came out.
“So, Elise, wear your pretty shoes and come with me.”
Meanwhile, Cardale gently pulled Elise up by the hand and
embraced her firmly around the waist.
“Ah, I almost forgot.”
Just before they left the room together, he corrected one of
Damien’s earlier assumptions.
“You seem to have forgotten something.”
“…?”
“We’re not lovers. We’re husband and wife.”

At the raspberry stall in the town square, Elise’s face was
glowing with excitement.
“Let’s go!”
“Slow down.”
Cardale gently reined in her enthusiasm.
He had specially ordered shoes with soft soles and low heels
to help her walk longer distances, but with only a month left
until the due date, even short walks were hard.
“I wish I could carry you.”
“I’m fine, really.”
Despite his worries, the sight of her waddling along with his
child in her belly was heartbreakingly lovely.
“Wow…!”
Elise unfolded the paper filled with bright red raspberries
with delight.
“I’ve been craving these so much.”
Thanks to the perceptive stall keeper, who had picked only
the ripest berries, a sweet fragrance filled the air. Cardale
picked up one of the glistening berries.
“Say ah.”
Elise quickly shook her head.
“I can eat it myself.”
“I know. But I want to feed you.”
Her cheeks turned a shy peach-pink. Almost unconsciously,
her lips parted.
Cardale gently placed the raspberry on her tongue, then
watched her tiny mouth chew contentedly. He felt full even
without eating.
“You too, Your Grace.”
“Ah.”
He only noticed the berry offered to him after she thrust it
forward, he opened his mouth and at that moment, her
slender fingers popped the berry right in.

“Delicious, right?”
The woman who fed him so naturally beamed up at him with
a dazzling smile, pure and radiant despite her mischievous
act.
Cardale felt like he was under a spell.
“Yes. Delicious.”
Who knew a single raspberry could fill him with such
happiness?
“I hope they sell them again next year.”
“They will.”
He would make sure to stock up on the best raspberries at
their peak season and preserve them in honey, so she could
eat them even in the snowiest winter.
His crimson eyes, like the berries she clutched in both
hands, shimmered warmly.
‘I’m so embarrassed.’
Underneath her hooded cloak, Elise’s face blushed deeply.
All through their stroll around the clock tower plaza and
beyond, she had stayed nestled in Cardale’s arms. His
reason: she mustn’t overexert herself.
She would hide her face and peek out shyly at the passing
stares, but truthfully, she didn’t dislike it.
His warm, secure arms, his solid and masculine scent.
The time they spent together, the closeness of their bodies,
the murmured conversations, she loved it all so much that
time seemed to slip by in an instant.
“Is there anywhere else you want to go?”
“No… Ah.”
She had been about to shake her head when her gaze
caught something far ahead and she fell silent.
The slums.
A place where the abandoned of the world gathered. Where
the cold, hunger, and poverty were daily realities.
Yet to her, it was like a hometown; the place that had taken
her and her mother in when they fled the Count’s estate.
‘Elise.’
Suddenly, her mother’s recent words echoed in her mind.
‘One day, you’ll have to tell the Duke your story.’
…I don’t think that will ever happen, Mother.
Back then, Elise had thought, No one would ever care to
hear the wretched, disgraceful past of a lowborn bastard
girl.
She couldn’t bring herself to reveal her pitiful history in front
of a man who shone like the noble sun itself. Even if the
world had already seen how shabby and unworthy she was.
After all, it would only cause disgust and revulsion.
If he ever looked at her again with contempt… she wouldn’t
be able to endure it.
‘But…’
Slowly, Elise lifted her head and looked up at Cardale.
‘…Would he really listen to my insignificant story?’
Her eyes trembled with hesitant sadness, torn between
yearning and fear.
“Elise.”
“Your Grace…”
“Is there something you want to say?”
Yes.
It’s a shabby, miserable story, but it’s the life I’ve lived. And
I want to tell it to you.
And then… if, even after hearing all of it, would you still
want me?
Elise clenched her hands tightly.
She was terrified he might change, believing a bastard girl
like her was unworthy to be his wife. 
But she chose to trust in the warm, sincere gaze that held
her so completely.

The horrors of the slums were no shock to Cardale.
He had smelled far fouler stenches on the battlefield and
faced countless scenes of filth and squalor.
He had never felt sympathy or pity for anyone’s miserable
life.
In truth, Cardale was a man who lacked much of the tender
emotions of empathy or compassion.
Only one exception had been made.
Hearing the story of his woman, who had survived this
filthy, stinking place, caused the man’s expression to twist
faintly.
Still, he listened carefully, not missing a single detail.
He knew how much anguish and hesitation she must have
pushed past to summon the courage to open up.
He knew that she was only now carefully unlocking the final
barrier she had kept bolted out of fear of being wounded
again.
He would not betray that trust. He would not make her
regret choosing him, nor cause her to shed tears of sorrow
again, nor allow her to shrink back in fear.
Though he could not undo the sins of the past, his vow,
made with his soul, was steadfast and unshakable.
“Thank you for listening to me all the way to the end.”
Standing in a secluded alley of the slums, having laid bare
her entire life story, Elise spoke hesitantly.
“A-and I’m sorry. I must have bored you with such miserable,
dirty stories…”
“No, I’m the one who should thank you for telling me.”
Her worry was utterly unfounded.
From her story, Cardale had gathered more information
about his wife than ever before. The puzzle pieces of her
past words and actions, once scattered and confusing, now
fell into place, completing the picture of her.
At the same time, any lingering misunderstandings between
them dissolved, melting into pure affection.
The growing satisfaction and contentment deepened his
love for her even more.
“Actually… I once spent an entire night right here.”
“…What?”
The sudden confession hit Cardale so hard he responded
before even thinking.
Lowering her head, Elise whispered in a small, murmuring
voice.
“When I ran away from Viscount Hartman.”
His crimson eyes trembled violently. Cardale looked up at
the sunset-streaked sky, at the dirty, freezing walls where
rooms clung like barnacles, and then down at the pale nape
of the woman cradled in his arms.
“When night fell… I had nowhere to go.”

“Not anywhere…”
Elise was a fearful woman.
Even after they married, she would sometimes burrow into
his chest at night, afraid of the darkness despite being in
the same bed as him.
And yet, she had spent a night alone here?
Standing alone in these dangerous streets. Facing the biting
autumn wind with her frail body. Silently crying out of fear
that her pursuers might find her.
It was all his fault.
It was his cruelty that had left her no shelter, not even a
single safe room to rest her slender body.
If, by any chance…
By sheer luck, Elise had survived. But if she hadn’t. If
something vile and monstrous had snatched her away. If he
had lost her, the living, breathing woman he loved, forever…
His throat tightened painfully.
No, if he could, Cardale would have seized his own neck and
crushed it. Torn himself apart and cast the pieces to a pack
of dogs.
Even that wouldn’t have been enough to atone for his sins.
He struggled to compose himself, steadying his voice for her
sake, not his own.
“Weren’t you scared?”
“I was terrified.”
Elise’s voice quivered wretchedly as she recalled that night.
“It was cold, and I was hungry… but the scariest thing… was
that something might happen to my baby…”
Her body, trembling like a rain-soaked fawn, pressed against
him. Cardale tightened his arms around her and whispered
an apology.
“I’m sorry.”
Sorry for leaving you alone. For making you suffer. For
committing such a sin against you and our baby, that should
never have happened.
“I’m sorry, Elise.”
He whispered again and again.
Until her pitiful trembling calmed and the wetness left her
voice.
“I’m fine now.”
Wiping the tears from the corners of her eyes, Elise smiled
sweetly and clung to his arm.
“Every day feels like a dream lately… so full of joy and
happiness.”
“It’s all thanks to you,” she shyly added, gently cradling her
belly.
“Once our baby is born healthy, I won’t have any more
wishes.”
“You don’t need to worry.”
If there was anything Cardale could be sure of, it was that.
“Our baby is growing strong and smart, just like you.”
At his words, Elise’s face blossomed, as bright as a flower in
full bloom.
She always marveled at the beauty of the flowers he
brought her, but to Cardale, the most beautiful thing in the
world was Elise’s smiling face.
“I’m truly happy now.”
He stared at her, momentarily forgetting even how to
breathe.
Maybe that was why, just for a moment, the vigilance he
never once loosened slipped.
It happened in an instant.
Click, the chilling sound of a gun being cocked.
Bang!
The deafening noise, and Cardale instinctively twisted his
body at the same time. But because he had to protect
someone, he couldn’t dodge perfectly, the bullet pierced his
arm.
“Your Grace…!”
“I’m fine. It’s just a scratch.”
He sheltered the alarmed Elise and reassured her.
Shadows, Vassenberg’s men, who had been secretly
standing guard, burst out from their hiding places.
Bang! Bang!
Several meaningless shots rang out before the assailant was
subdued.
“Let me go!”
“Vanessa…?”
Recognizing the shrill voice, Elise’s face turned deathly pale.
She had no idea why Vanessa was here in the slums, or why
she looked so disheveled.
“It’s all your fault! I knew you’d ruin everything, you useless
filthy brat!”
The sudden torrent of abuse made Elise flinch.
“Silence her!”
Cardale shouted urgently, but it was a moment too late.
“Pregnant, are you? You’ll never even give birth properly!
You’ll die, or worse, give birth to some crippled thing just
like yourself–”
“Mmph!”
Dammit. A clear miscalculation.
He immediately gathered Elise and rushed her out of the
slums, boarding the carriage.
“She’s insane. Don’t listen to a word she said.”
But the woman trembling in his arms had already gone
deathly white.
“Your Grace, your arm…”
Even then, she worried about him. The bitter taste of defeat
filled him.
“Because of me…”
“No.”
Damn it. Clenching his teeth, Cardale fought down his rage.
It was his own carelessness. His complacency. He had failed
to eliminate the unpredictability around his wife.
No, he had even encouraged it.
He had anticipated that Vanessa Lockseed would return to
the capital and make some kind of move, so he had
purposely leaked their outing as bait.
He wanted to be a husband who protected his wife by taking
the bullet himself, and thus win her heart.
The security had been tight. Vassenberg’s men had been
aware of Vanessa’s presence; her murderous intent had
been so blatant it was impossible to miss.
And yet, he hadn’t stopped her foul mouth from spewing
that filth.
And now Elise was so shaken…
“Your Grace.”
A small voice broke through his spiraling thoughts. As their
eyes met, Cardale felt an ominous premonition.
“I have a favor to ask you.”

“Will you promise me you’ll grant it, no matter what?”
Something was wrong. He should have agreed immediately,
but strangely, his mouth wouldn’t open.
“What is it?”
“Can’t you promise first?”
Yet still, he couldn’t answer. After a long hesitation, Elise
finally spoke.
“If there comes a time when you have to choose between
saving me or our baby…”
“Stop.”
Cardale hastily cut her off. He didn’t need to hear the rest.
“Why…”
Why force me to make such a cruel choice, Elise? Why?
“Please promise me.”
His tightly sealed lips trembled.
This must be her punishment for the man who could never
let go of his selfish desires.
Cardale closed his eyes tightly.
If only he could offer up his own life in her place, he would.
For the first time, he truly wished he could.
When he opened his eyes again, he spoke to her with
unwavering resolve.
“Don’t worry. Both you and the baby will be perfectly fine.”
I’m sorry, Elise. I can’t grant your request. Even if I lose
everything else, I will never give up on you.
At that moment,
“Ah…!”
“Elise!”
Elise twisted in sudden pain, gasping out a tortured cry.
It was labor, earlier than expected.

It was a brutal labor.
Painful, piercing screams spilled endlessly from the birthing
room.

Cardale stood silently in the hallway, not even properly
treating the bullet wound in his arm.
His tense jaw, his tightly clenched fists bulging with veins,
everything about him showed how much he was enduring.
At times, the limit of his restraint felt unbearable.
The wound itself would eventually heal over time. But his
fragile wife…
“Elise.”
The moment he murmured her name–
The screaming stopped. A chilling silence fell.
It felt like his entire body was freezing from the extremities
inward. By the time he regained his senses, he had already
kicked the door open.
The sight of his woman, exhausted and pale after her long
struggle, was pitiful beyond words. Her lips were so torn
from biting down that they bled.
“Elise.”
Kneeling by her bedside, Cardale gently cupped her face
with trembling hands.
“There’s so much we have to do once our baby is born.”
He whispered softly into her ear, masking his desperation
and fear with a calm facade.
In spring, we’ll hold the baby’s hand and watch the flowers
and butterflies together.
In summer, we’ll sit under a giant tree and watch the baby
play.
Autumn will be perfect for riding across the wide grasslands.
And when winter comes, we’ll build three snowmen, one for
each of us, in the garden.
Tears welled up and sparkled in Elise’s eyes as she imagined
the dream-like future.
I think I’ll be so happy… I want to be happy…
Receiving her answer through her eyes, Cardale pulled her
into his arms.
“I love you.”
I love you, Elise. I love you. I love you.
The confession he had held back for so long overflowed,
unstoppable.
Pure, untainted by calculation or hesitation, his sincerity
flooded into Elise’s heart.
Her blue eyes shimmered with moisture, and tears slid down
to her ears.
Little one.
I want to protect you. I want to meet you. Please, find your
way safely to your mother and father.
With a cry of pain, Elise summoned all her remaining
strength.
“Waaaaah!”
At last, a strong newborn’s cry echoed through the mansion.
It was a rainy spring morning.
The baby’s hair was jet black, just like his father’s. His eyes
hadn’t opened yet, but everyone agreed they would be the
same vivid red.
“Leon…”
Even with her body utterly drained by labor, Elise held her
newborn in her arms, calling his name in a trembling voice.
The name Cardale had chosen. The precious name she had
engraved silently into her heart, terrified she might never
get to use it.
“…I’m your mother.”
And with the baby still in her arms, she drifted into sleep.
She was unaware of how Cardale, thinking she had fainted,
had furiously harassed the physician afterward.
Though it was a premature birth, both mother and child
were safe.
In fact, the baby was healthier than most full-term infants.
His loud cries and strong movements proved it.
The physician and midwife, relieved that things could have
been much worse if they had delayed any longer, left
detailed instructions and medicine to aid Elise’s recovery.
Cardale, refusing to leave her side, stayed at the Count’s
estate to care for her himself.
He claimed it was a husband’s duty to look after his wife
after childbirth.
He was meticulous. He cooled down hot soup spoon by
spoon to feed her, causing even the seasoned servants to
doubt their eyes. Even Damian shook his head in disbelief.
But Cardale didn’t care what anyone thought.
‘She must be exhausted.’
He gently wiped the sweat from her forehead and nape with
a warm cloth as she slept.
They had merely eaten and spoken briefly before Elise, still
frail, had quickly fallen asleep again.
Her body had been pushed to its limits. He hadn’t realized
how much pregnancy and childbirth could devastate a
woman’s body.
Because of that, Cardale concluded one child was enough.
He never wanted to feel this helplessness from watching her
writhe in agony again.
Moreover, Elise insisted on raising the baby herself without
a nanny, so Leon’s cradle was placed right in their room.
Remembering this fact, Cardale’s expression soured slightly.
He cast a glance at their sleeping son. The baby was
plumper now, his tiny features already hinting at a future
handsome face, a proud nose, long eyelashes, a fine
jawline.
But Cardale was dissatisfied.
‘He’s unnecessarily similar to me.’
Though he carried Vassenberg’s blood, it was almost
ridiculous how much he resembled Cardale. The only feature
that somewhat resembled Elise was his sleeping expression.
“Ugh…”
Hearing a faint whimper, Cardale hurried back to Elise’s
side.
“It’s my chest again…”
It was mastitis. Gently, Cardale laid her down comfortably
and began to massage the swollen breast. Elise’s face
flushed red.
“You don’t have to be embarrassed.”
“Still…”
As he massaged her tenderly, the hardness softened, and
soon a trickle of milk began to leak out.
“It’s too full. I’ll just ease a little.”
“N-no…”
The moment his tongue brushed the tip of her breast–
“Waaaaah!”
“Leon!”
The baby woke up and started crying. Damn it, no
cooperation whatsoever.
Suppressing a sigh, Cardale rose.
“I’ll calm him. You rest.”
He scooped the wailing Leon into his arms.
Hurry up and go back to sleep, Leonhardt Vassenberg.
Cardale subtly released a faint aura of dominance. The
Vassenberg line knew to sense and avoid strength naturally.
However, the baby was unfazed.
“Waaaaah!”
“He’s probably hungry.”
In the end, Cardale could only watch with jealous eyes as his
son nursed in Elise’s arms.
At some point, however, a heavy sensation stirred in his
lower body, and Cardale shot to his feet in self-disgust.
“Your Grace?”
“I’ll step out for a moment.”
He felt like garbage for desiring his wife, barely recovered
from childbirth.
Yet, her fuller breasts, the deepened blush of her n!pples,
her plump thighs and tender nape, all of it drove him wild.
But it wasn’t the time. Not yet.
Once burned, a hunter becomes even more cautious.
He would wait and endure, to make sure that next time, the
beautiful white deer would come to him of her own will.
Even if it meant suppressing his savage instincts for the rest
of his life.
Still, it wasn’t easy.
“Haa…”
A heated sigh scattered into the cool dawn air.

Summer was deepening.
The cicadas’ cries grew louder, seeking their mates. Sitting
in a rocking chair, Elise cradled Leon against her chest,
patting his back gently.
Though her body had recovered, she was still staying at the
Count’s estate.
“Actually, I’ve prepared the Duchess’s chamber.”
She recalled Cardale’s words from a recent walk together.
“Come see it when you have time?”
He had prepared a nursery and a chamber for her mother as
well. He had said she could live with her mother if she
wanted, and that she was free to move between the Count’s
and Duke’s estates whenever she liked.
“I want to invite you.”
So come whenever you want.
His voice, carried on the summer breeze, was warm and low.
His eyes had shimmered softly, cradling her in their light.
She had thought she could never reach him.
Just like a mere human couldn’t dare gaze at the blazing
sun.
How could she have believed in the promises of such a
noble being?
Yet, somewhere along the way, the cracks in her parched
heart had started soaking up sweetness.
The barren soil turned fertile.
The precious seed she had hidden away began to sprout.
And at last, just as summer bears its fruits, her heart had
blossomed, ripe and full.
Elise closed her eyes for a moment, then opened them.
Today, not a single cloud marred the bright blue sky.
“Mother.”
She smiled at Marisa, who was sipping tea across from her.
“It’s time I went.”
The carriage sped down the tree-lined road, where branches
arched overhead like a green cathedral.
Elise quietly took in the scenery, determined never to forget
this day.
Just like that day in the past.
Neigh!
A horse’s startled cry, and the carriage pulled to an abrupt
stop. She heard the coachman’s alarmed voice.
Slowly, Elise opened the door and stepped down.
Just setting foot on the ground made her heart pound
strangely.
Then she turned, and met the one who had halted her
carriage.
“…Elise?”
The man on horseback stared in shock.
He must have been heading to the Count’s estate to see
her, she had chosen this timing intentionally.
Cardale quickly dismounted and ran toward her.
“How did you…”
Elise thought back to when she had once knelt, wretched
and desperate, outside Gerhard’s estate, begging to save
her mother.
And how, even during their first meeting, this man had
radiated an overwhelming presence. His low voice, his
jewel-like crimson eyes.
It might have been mere charity to him, but to her, it was
warmth she had never forgotten.
“Your Grace invited me.”
And so she had come.
To his estate.
To their home.
Realization slowly dawned in his brilliant scarlet eyes.
Surprise gave way to overwhelming joy.
Seeing the magnificent man’s face alight with happiness,
Elise’s heart swelled unbearably.
Cardale reached out. Without hesitation, she took his hand,
their fingers interlacing tightly.
“Are there lots of morning glories blooming at the Duke’s
estate?”
“In full glory.”
Elise beamed.
It was a brilliant day, with purple morning glories blooming
in their full splendor.

In the autumn of the year their heir was born, the Duke and
Duchess of Vassenberg held a grand second wedding
ceremony.
Tables set with silver under dazzling chandeliers and
extravagant interior decorations showcased the height of
luxury.
Fountains gushed with clear streams and the gardens
bloomed with an explosion of autumn flowers, drawing sighs
of admiration from all who attended.
Yet none of it outshone the true stars of the day, the Duke
and Duchess themselves, who looked as if they had stepped
out of a masterpiece painting.
The Duke never strayed from his wife’s side as he greeted
the nobles.
“This is my wife, Elise Vassenberg.”
“Congratulations on your marriage, Duchess.”
He introduced each and every guest to his wife without
exception.
The keen-eyed nobles quickly understood what the Duke’s
actions meant:
It was a declaration of his complete support for the
Duchess, a promise that his protection would always be with
her. A warning that any harm aimed at her would not be
tolerated.
Their judgment was spot on.
Cardale had carefully planned this wedding to achieve the
maximum effect, one part of which was ensuring Elise’s
protection as she entered society life.
Hosting a selective tea party and opening up the parlor
beforehand had served the same purpose.
The invited noblewomen naturally observed the Duchess’s
standing. Evidenced by the quality of the tableware and
refreshments, the value of her garments and jewelry, and
the respectful behavior of the servants.
As Cardale had intended, rumors spread like wildfire
afterward, and the nobles of Inghel practically fought for
invitations to the Vassenberg couple’s grand ceremony.
At last, the ceremony began.
To elegant music, the couple walked together down the
wedding aisle.
“I’ve never seen a wedding so splendid!” one noblewoman
whispered.
“I would believe it if someone said this was the Crown
Prince’s wedding!”
“No, even the Crown Prince would struggle to match this,”
another murmured.
Voices exchanged low remarks about how the Vassenberg
family’s wealth was said to surpass even that of the royal
family.
“I heard the Duke didn’t even attend the recent hunting
festival because of the wedding preparations?”
At that, a young debutante’s eyes lit up.
“Actually…”
Heads clustered together, and soft whispers spread rapidly.
“Oh my!”
Gasped exclamations erupted from the crowd.
“Then the Duchess must not enjoy hunting!”
“But I heard the Duke loves it immensely.”
“He may still manage the forests out of duty, but it sounds
like he might give up hunting as a hobby.”
“Goodness…”
Several ladies covered their mouths with gloved hands.
“I’ve only ever seen men give up their hobbies for a woman
in opera stories…”
“To think such a man exists in real life!”
All eyes turned to the Duchess, admiration clear in every
gaze.
A voice summed it up for them all:
“How envious…”
Meanwhile, utterly unaware that she had become the
heroine of so many whispered fantasies, Elise stood beside
Cardale, stiff with nerves. Watching her, Cardale allowed a
small smile.
‘Hunting…’
Yes, once there had been a time like that.
Hunting ferocious beasts had been a cruel pleasure. The
more savage the prey, the greater the thrill. He had even
sought out the most brutal creatures just to kill them.
He had never tried to justify or excuse that bloodlust.
But since marrying Elise, he had never once gone hunting.
Hadn’t even thought of it, something he only now realized.
Maybe he had stopped even before fully acknowledging his
feelings for her.
He suddenly thought: perhaps his primal instincts would
remain suppressed for life.
But it didn’t matter.
The one thing he truly, desperately wanted would now
always be by his side, always within his reach.
“Your Grace, please lift the bride’s veil.”
A flicker of light passed through Cardale’s eyes.
His large, strong fingers reached for the edge of the
translucent lace.
The face he had longed to see slowly emerged, her lips, her
cheeks, her bright eyes, her forehead, every part of his
beautiful woman revealed anew.
“Now, seal your eternal vows with a kiss…”
The priest didn’t even finish the words.
Cardale moved faster as he pulled his slender wife into his
arms and devoured her lips.
The kiss quickly deepened, raw and consuming, the wet
sounds of mingling lips and tongues growing so intense that
watching guests blushed.
“Mmph…”
Elise, overwhelmed, tried to pull away in embarrassment.
Not a chance.
Cardale didn’t intend to stop. He even pulled the veil down
over their heads and deepened the kiss, greedily drinking
her in.
“Mmm…”
Thus, before all the nobility, they proved their union
unmistakably.
Only after satisfying himself did Cardale finally lift his lips
from hers. He looked at his wife, panting in small gasps,
with adoration and pressed his forehead to hers.
“I love you.”
The low, clear confession echoed through the hall.
Cheers and applause erupted.
“Your Grace, what does the sea look like?”
“Is it really filled with deep, endless blue water? I heard the
beach has soft, white sand that doesn’t hurt your feet even
without shoes…”
It was then that Cardale realized: Elise had never once seen
the sea.
When asked if she wanted to, she smiled awkwardly and
said it had been her mother’s wish. After a moment’s
hesitation, she had shyly admitted:
“Actually… I want to see it too.”
And just like that, their honeymoon destination was decided.
The Brillion Estate, owned by the Vassenberg family,
encompassed nearly the entire southeastern region of the
empire.
At its far southern end, where the land was warmest, there
was a beautiful coastal city.
“It’s so beautiful…”
The sunlight made the ocean sparkle like a field of silver
scales.
The white sand on the beach gleamed like tiny glass beads.
“Even more than I imagined…”
Elise’s eyes followed a seagull soaring across the bright blue
sky.
Cardale couldn’t even begin to comprehend the
overwhelming emotions she must be feeling, like a white
deer once trapped in a tiny pen now standing free.
So he simply waited quietly by her side.
Letting her take in the world she had long dreamed of, to fill
her heart completely.
Wishing that this joy would stay with her until they returned
again.
As sunset bled across the horizon…
Elise stared at the endless line where sky met sea.
The sun, now a burning ember, clung to the horizon.
Plop.
A droplet touched her cheek.
“Looks like it might rain,” Cardale murmured, gauging the
moisture in the air.
“Shall we head back?”
“Wait a moment.”
Elise stopped him.
It wouldn’t rain immediately.
And she wasn’t afraid of the rain anymore.
After all, it had rained on the day Leon was born too.
The spring rain had seemed to bless his arrival, and for the
first time, she had found it beautiful.
“I have a gift for you, Your Grace.”
“A gift?”
Elise pulled out a carefully prepared handkerchief. Surprise
flickered in Cardale’s eyes.
“When did you…?”
“In secret, little by little.”
She had kept it hidden carefully, with the help of Linda,
Norman, and the other loyal servants, so he wouldn’t
suspect.
“You tricked me completely,” he chuckled.
“You told them to prioritize my secrets, remember?”
“Well…”
It had been Cardale’s idea to assign her loyal hands and
eyes.
Elise beamed triumphantly.
“Why go through so much trouble?”
“Because this one’s different.”
Beside the Vassenberg crest, she had embroidered a purple
morning glory.
But it wasn’t just about the design.
‘Back then… I wasn’t happy.’
The old handkerchief had been stitched out of desperation,
trying to forget a miserable, painful reality.
This new one had been made differently.
With each thread she picked and stitched, she thought of
the mornings they spent together, of Leon’s baby coos, of
the fragrance of flowers in their home, pure joy filling every
stitch.
She wanted to gift him her happiness.
Tying the handkerchief around his wrist, she smiled
radiantly.
“Thank you for the gift, Elise.”
“But the real gift is something else.”
“What?”
Cardale, uncharacteristically flustered, asked.
“It’s not a thing, Cardale.”
For a moment, he stood frozen, unable to believe what he
heard.
Finally, stumbling, he whispered:
“Say it again?”
“Cardale.”
Elise buried her face against his chest, feeling his heart
pounding fiercely.
“The purple morning glory has another hidden meaning,”
she whispered.
Words she had once found in an old book:
“Unchanging love.”
Hearing Cardale groan from overwhelming emotion, she
confessed:
“I love you, Cardale.”
His brilliant scarlet eyes blazed hotter than ever before.
“Kiss me.”
A gentle yet sovereign command, one he could never
refuse.
Their lips met deeply, their bodies crushed together, until
Elise closed her eyes within his strong, warm embrace.
Where cold arrogance and loneliness had once ruled, at last,
an eternal love blossomed.

*

THE END!
